 ONE LIBERTY PROPERTIES Inc. declared a dividend of 40 cents a share on its $16.50 cumulative convertible preferred stock, payable Jan. 2 to stock of record Dec. 8.  But directors of the Great Neck, N.Y., real estate investment trust didn't act on the common stock dividend.  And they won't consider such a dividend, the trust added, before results are available for the first quarter of 1990.  In part, the trust cited the need to retain cash for possible acquisitions.  According to a spokesman, One Liberty will have paid out as dividends the required amount of its taxable income to maintain its legal status as a real estate investment trust.  Banks are continuing to go after individual investors, despite falling interest rates.  Yields on small-denomination certificates of deposit fell at about half the rate of so-called jumbo CDs this week, according to Banxquote Money Markets, an information service based here.  Investors can get slightly higher yields on deposits below $50,000 than they can on deposits of $90,000 and up.  "Banks want to remain competitive," said Norberto Mehl, chairman of Banxquote.  "October is a big rollover month and perhaps they anticipate greater demand . . . among people leaving the stock market."  Some bankers are reporting more inquiries than usual about CDs since Friday.  "Reports from branches are that there has been greater interest in the last day or so," said Steven Braitman, a vice president at Chemical Bank in New York.  Chemical said deposits Monday were about $5 million higher than usual and it expects more activity as investors receive the proceeds from sales of stock.  "This is no time to be playing in the street . . . the Dow has more ups and downs than an elevator," proclaimed an advertisement Monday in New York newspapers, touting Lincoln Savings Bank's one-year CD. Harold Jones, Lincoln's chief retail banking officer, said there hasn't yet been "a discernible response," although the ad included a coupon that could arrive later in the week.  Friday's market rout came smack in the middle of the heaviest month for CD rollovers, when a number of banks and thrifts already have promotions under way.  First National Bank of Boston, for example, is offering certain new depositors an extra quarter of a percentage point on six-month and 12-month CDs.  Some banks actually boosted yields on the shortest term CDs in the latest week.  New York's Citibank, for instance, increased the yield on small-denomination three-month CDs to 8% from 7.9%.  On average, however, three-month CDs at major banks are yielding a tenth of a percentage point less than they were a week ago.  Average yields on CDs aimed at individual investors fell less than half as much as yields on Treasury bills sold at Monday's auction.  Six-month CDs of $50,000 and less yielded an average 8.02% in the week ended Tuesday, down from 8.10%, according to Banxquote.  The yield on six-month T-bills fell to 7.82% on Monday, from 8.01% the week before.  Meanwhile, the average yield on six-month CDs of more than $90,000 fell to 7.93% in the latest week, according to Banxquote, from 8.10% the week before.  Mr. Mehl noted that actual rates are almost identical on small and large-denomination CDs, but yields on CDs aimed at the individual investor are boosted by more frequent compounding.  CDs sold by major brokerage houses, which like jumbo CDs tend to closely follow interest rate trends, also posted larger drops in yields.  A six-month, broker-sold CD, for example, was yielding an average 8.09% in the latest week, a fifth of a percentage point lower than the week before.  In late April, when interest rates were at their recent highs, short-term CDs sold by brokers were offering yields half a percentage point or more higher than banks.  CD yields are generally expected to fall further in coming weeks.  "What happened in the stock market and the bigger trade deficit" reported yesterday "make it unlikely that short-term interest rates will rise" any time soon, said Mr. Mehl of Banxquote.  "Even before the market drop, rates were down about half a percentage point," said Robert J. Hutchinson, senior vice president for retail marketing at Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co. in New York.  "That puts pressure on CD rates."  Conservatives have an important decision to make this fall.  At the recent meetings of the World Bank and International Monetary Fund, the Bush administration announced its intention to decide by yearend the size of the next increase in the IMF's capital base.  While the U.S. share of the increase probably will not reach the $12 billion or more implicit in the IMF's request for a doubling of its $90 billion capital, the administration probably will agree to a multibillion-dollar increase.  This would be consistent with its unwavering support for the Brady Plan and G-7 exchange-rate intervention, and with its financial commitment to Mexico, Poland and others.  The IMF has several reasons for requesting the increase.  Its role in the economies of developing countries has grown steadily since the 1970s.  The size and pace of disbursements will accelerate further under the Brady Plan, which promises larger and earlier disbursements to approved countries.  At least three other factors have encouraged the IMF to insist on increased capital.  First, it argues that its capital base must be increased in order to maintain its size relative to world financial markets, for which it feels some responsibility.  Second, the World Bank's recent $75 billion capital increase -- $14 billion from the U.S. -- has left the IMF feeling less than first fiddle among international financial institutions.  Third, the IMF would like to meet Japan's request for increased ownership (currently 4.5%).  Japan has supported a larger role for the IMF in developing-country debt issues, and is an important financial resource for IMF-guided programs in developing countries.  While international politics may argue for the capital increase, there is a clear economic case against it.  Opponents of the increase argue that the IMF practices central planning while supporting ineffective governments.  They question whether the IMF has any role in developing countries, given its original mandate to assist industrial countries in balance-of-payments emergencies.  Opponents show that there are already more funds available than commendable reform efforts.  They worry that new IMF funding of developing countries will simply end up substituting IMF debt for reschedulable commercial bank debt, a bad trade all around.  They believe microeconomics, which addresses the problems of markets, investment climate and management practices, is the key to developing-country growth, not the IMF's Keynesian focus on trade deficits, quarterly targets and government debt.  They point at the numerous developing-country governments that have inflated, taxed and regulated themselves into despair under successive IMF programs.  Decisions on increases in the IMF's capital base traditionally are made by the administration, with subsequent authorization by Congress.  The last U.S. congressional authorization, in 1983, was a political donnybrook and carried a $6 billion housing program along with it to secure adequate votes.  The politics of the 1990 congressional authorization are likely to be similar to those of previous authorizations.  Liberals may support the stabilizing, quasi-governmental role of the IMF on two conditions: that the administration give assurances that liberal Democrats' support will not be used against them in congressional re-election campaigns; and that the legislation address -- with dollars -- social and environmental concerns.  Conservative Republicans will be given the choice of supporting or fighting their party's popular president in an election year.  A U.S. decision to refuse the IMF its capital increase, or limit it to 25%, would bring a major change in international economic policy, and could not be taken lightly.  Commentators would fret over the implications for the G-7 coordination process and the stability of world financial markets.  Because commercial banks and the developing-country governments believe they will get a piece of any capital increase, a scaled-down IMF mission would leave both feeling shortchanged.  Furthermore, a U.S. rejection of the capital increase (and transfer of shares to Japan) would give Japan an argument against future calls for economic burden-sharing.  On the other hand, a decision to increase the IMF's capital would reinforce the central economic role of multilateral institutions in developing countries.  With the increase, even more developing-country energy and talent would be diverted from creating profitable economic systems to setting up economic planning ministries that generate IMF-approved economic plans.  Upping the ante could slow economic development even further, as countries delay market-opening steps in anticipation of richer multilateral support.  Conservatives should take a position prior to the administration's year-end deadline.  The issues are too important to be left to the financial and budget ministries fighting over the size of the capital increase, rather than its purpose.  If conservatives don't support an increase in the IMF's capital, then it is incumbent on them to speak up now and explain the alternative. ---  Mr. Malpass directs the Republican staff of the Joint Economic Committee of Congress.  The Chicago Mercantile Exchange fined and suspended two commodities traders accused of making prearranged trades with each other that allegedly cheated a customer.  Merc officials said Gary N. Roberts was disciplined following the exchange's investigation of his trading in several commodities pits from July to November 1988.  The Merc said Mr. Roberts withheld from the market certain orders in cooperation with another trader, David Stein.  The Merc fined Mr. Roberts $15,000 and suspended his trading membership for three years.  Also, he and Mr. Stein were ordered to make restitution of $35,000 to a customer.  Mr. Stein was fined $25,000 and suspended for three years.  Messrs.  Roberts and Stein couldn't be reached for comment.  The Merc said that as part of the disciplinary settlement, neither man admitted, nor denied the alleged violations.  Neither was among the 46 traders indicted last August in a federal investigation of traders at both the Merc and the Chicago Board of Trade.  In a move that could pose a new competitive challenge to Time Warner Inc.'s powerful Home Box Office, cable giant Tele-Communications Inc. agreed to buy half of Showtime Networks Inc. from Viacom Inc. for $225 million.  The purchase comes after nearly three years of on-again off-again talks between TCI and Viacom, which has also discussed the sale of an interest in Showtime with other cable operators.  Showtime is a distant No. 2 to Home Box Office, and in May filed a $2.5 billion antitrust suit against Time Warner, charging the company and its HBO and American Television cable units with conspiring to monopolize the pay TV business.  HBO has close to 24 million subscribers to its HBO and Cinemax networks, while Showtime and its sister service, The Movie Channel, have only about 10 million, according to Paul Kagan Associates, a Carmel, Calif., research firm.  For TCI, the investment in Showtime puts it in an unusual position; as the largest cable operator, with control of close to 12 million of the nation's 52 million cable subscribers, TCI is HBO's largest customer.  But TCI President John Malone has long been concerned about HBO's dominance of the pay TV business, and has been eager to keep Showtime as a healthy competitor.  "It is important to the cable industry that we have a vibrant and competitive pay-television marketplace," Mr. Malone said in a statement.  In a telephone interview, Robert Thomson, TCI senior vice president, said Showtime's suit against HBO "doesn't involve us, and nothing we're doing here bears any relationship to that."  He added, "We don't intend to be drawn into it," noting that TCI won't play any active role in the management of Showtime.  Linking up Showtime with the largest cable operator in the U.S. could sharply boost its subscribers.  TCI said it may bring in other cable operators as investors, a practice it has employed in the past with investments in other cable networks, such as The Discovery Channel.  Additional cable partners could boost subscribers even further.  Time Warner declined comment.  In addition to owning HBO, Time Warner owns American Television & Communications Inc., the nation's second largest cable operator after TCI. Viacom also owns cable systems, but it is the 14th largest operator of such systems, with less than one million subscribers.  The TCI investment is a big victory for Viacom's chief executive officer, Frank Biondi, and Winston H. Cox, president of the Showtime unit.  "This takes any question of Showtime's viability and puts it away once and for all," Mr. Biondi said in a telephone interview.  The fight between HBO and Showtime is particularly acrimonious because Mr. Biondi is the former chief executive of HBO, and Mr. Cox served as chief of marketing for the service.  They were both hired by Sumner Redstone, the Boston billionaire who took control of Viacom three years ago in a leveraged buy-out.  Time Warner has vigorously denied all of Viacom's allegations.  Boeing Co., already struck by its Machinists union, briefly called off contract talks with its engineers and labeled their demands "grossly excessive."  Later, however, the company agreed to meet on Monday with the Seattle Professional Engineering Employees Association after a federal mediator intervened, according to the union.  A spokesman for the engineers said the company asked the union to reduce its demands, which included a 19% pay hike in the first year and 8% in the second and third years.  The union represents about 28,000 engineers and technical workers.  Its contract expires Dec. 1.  Meanwhile, a federal mediator is scheduled to meet today with Boeing officials and representatives of 55,000 striking Machinists.  "It will take several meetings to resolve this," said a spokesman for the Machinists union.  "We don't want to bring back something the members will reject."  Machinists already have rejected a package that would have provided a 10% pay raise plus bonuses over the three-year life of the contract.  It also would have reduced mandatory overtime.  Investor Asher Edelman increased his stake in Intelogic Trace Inc. and cleared the way for additional purchases.  It wasn't clear, however, whether the actions were related to a battle between the corporate raider and New York attorney Martin Ackerman for control of Datapoint Corp., a San Antonio, Texas-based data-processing systems maker.  Intelogic Trace, a computer services company, was spun off to Datapoint holders in 1985, after Mr. Edelman gained control.  After Mr. Ackerman announced he was soliciting consents from shareholders in order to wrest control of Datapoint from Mr. Edelman, the corporate raider purchased 30% of Datapoint's shares.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Mr. Edelman said from Sept. 29 to Oct. 13, he acquired 309,500 shares of Intelogic common shares for $2.25 to $2.375 each.  The purchases increased his stake to 16.2% of the shares outstanding.  The filing also said certain provisions which apply to persons acquiring 20% or more of Intelogic common stock, were waived by Intelogic for Mr. Edelman, who is chairman of the company.  Mr. Edelman couldn't be reached for comment.  The federal government should make free, voluntary testing for the AIDS virus the cornerstone of an expanded campaign to stop the spread of acquired immune deficiency syndrome, the Hudson Institute recommended.  "By encouraging massive, routine, voluntary testing we can enable society to voluntarily segregate itself sexually into two groups: those who carry the virus and those who do not," the Indianapolis research organization said in a new report.  The report takes a more alarmed view of AIDS and recommends a more sweeping response than many other analyses.  It warns that the AIDS epidemic "may reduce the rate of growth of the work force, curb productivity gains and slow economic growth."  It contends that current government policy is failing to stem the AIDS epidemic because it suggests the use of condoms can make sex "safe."  But the report says: "The only safe sex is sex between uninfected partners," and testing is the only way to learn of infection.  Hudson's researchers estimated that it would cost less than $650 million a year to test the entire population between the ages of 12 and 65 years old.  In addition, the report recommends that federal and state governments provide free treatment to all who test positive.  An unexpectedly sharp widening in the U.S. trade gap for August dragged the dollar lower Tuesday, but profit-taking on short positions helped the currency rebound to close mixed against major counterparts.  While the market kept careful tabs on Wall Street's gyrations, it shrugged off a modest downturn in equities to bid the dollar well above the day's lows.  Soon after the release of the U.S. trade figures, the dollar plunged to an intraday low of 140.95 yen.  It also declined against the mark but didn't reach its intraday low of 1.8435 marks until two hours later.  The unit stabilized about midday New York time at around 1.85 marks and 141 yen, prompting unconfirmed rumors that the U.S. Federal Reserve had intervened to blunt the unit's tumble.  The dollar finished at its intraday highs.  Dealers noted that the foreign exchange market's initial bearish reaction to the U.S. trade figures was tempered later by a "calmer reassessment of the data."  The U.S. Commerce Department reported a $10.77 billion deficit in August, compared with a revised July deficit of $8.24 billion.  Economists had expected a $9.1 billion gap.  The August figure reflected a 6.4% rise in imports and a 0.2% drop in exports.  Marc M. Goloven, an economist with Manufacturers Hanover Trust in New York, said that while the figures appear to indicate a sadly deteriorating U.S. trade performance, there's still enough positive news in the data to justify buying dollars.  He said that while the U.S. trade gap with Canada has widened significantly, the trade deficit with Western Europe and Japan continues to narrow.  And he added that manufactured goods exports are still rising.  The dollar's near-term path remains foggy, according to currencny analysts, who characterize the market as "bewildering."  In late New York trading yesterday, the dollar was quoted at 1.8667 marks, down from 1.8685 marks late Monday, and at 142.75 yen, up from 141.85 yen late Monday.  Sterling was unchanged at $1.5753.  In Tokyo Wednesday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 142.55 yen, unchanged from Tuesday's Tokyo close.  Later, the U.S. currency fell to about 142.25 yen on news reports of the San Francisco earthquake.  Some analysts remain bullish and point out that the dollar continues to be well bid despite key rate increases in Europe and Japan, several weeks of aggressive dollar sales by the world central banks -- some traders estimate that the barrage of sales topped $12 billion -- and a 190-point plunge on the New York Stock Exchange.  They note that the U.S. unit is trading at the upper end of the presumed target zones established by the Group of Seven trading partners.  The G-7 comprises West Germany, the U.S., France, the U.K., Italy, Canada and Japan.  The so-called Louvre accord was seen to have set ranges of 1.70 marks to 1.90 marks and 120 yen to 140 yen.  They say that the recent injection of liquidity into the U.S. banking system has been modest, and they don't anticipate significant easing by the U.S. Federal Reserve.  The Fed arranged $1.5 billion of customer repurchase agreements Tuesday, the second repurchase agreement in two days.  The move, which injects capital into the system, is seen as an effort to reassure the finanicial markets that the U.S. central bank is ready to provide the ample liquidity.  But other analysts contend that while the Fed's move to loosen credit hasn't been aggressive, it nevertheless sends a clear signal that, at least for now, the Fed has relaxed its grip on credit.  They add that the Fed has allowed the key federal funds interest rate to dip to about 8 5/8% from its levels of just below 9% last week.  The federal funds rate is the overnight lending rate that banks charge each other.  Market participants said that the mark continues to post the most significant gains against the dollar.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $367.40 an ounce, up 10 cents.  Estimated volume was a moderate 3.5 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Wednesday, gold was at $366.55 an ounce.  National Semiconductor Corp. said it settled a four-year-old patent infringement case against Linear Technology Corp. by accepting a $3 million payment from Linear in exchange for granting Linear irrevocable licenses for all products involved.  The two companies also agreed to settle any future property rights issues over the next 10 years through binding arbitration, both companies said.  The products are so-called analog integrated circuits that have applications in the consumer electronics, automobile and electronic instrumentation markets.  Linear Technology, Milpitas, Calif., called the settlement "positive," since products covered by the disputed patents account for about 20% of its annual sales.  The electronics concern said it already has paid $2 million of the settlement to National Semiconductor, Santa Clara, Calif., and will pay the remaining $1 million in equal installments over the next eight quarters.  The payments aren't expected to have an impact on coming operating results, Linear added.  NBC's winning streak has been canceled.  The National Broadcasting Co., a unit of General Electric Co., had its record-breaking 68-week reign as the prime-time ratings leader snapped yesterday by ABC-TV, a subsidiary of Capital Cities/ABC Inc.  In the ratings compiled by the A.C. Nielsen Co., ABC, which broadcast the World Series, topped the competition with a 14.8 rating and 25 share.  NBC was second with a 13.9 rating and 24 share followed by CBS Inc.'s television network with a 12.5 rating and 21 share. (A ratings point represents 904,000 television households; shares indicate the percentage of sets in use.)  The first two games of the World Series between the Oakland Athletics and San Francisco Giants didn't finish in the top 10; instead they landed in 16th and 18th place.  The highest-rated show continues to be ABC's "Roseanne."  NBC had five of the top 10 shows; ABC had four and CBS had one.  CBS held the previous record for consecutive No. 1 victories -- 46 weeks -- during the 1962-63 season.  Procter & Gamble Co., Cincinnati, expanding its presence in the food service market, said it acquired Maryland Club Foods, a coffee supplier, from an investor group led by F. Philip Handy of Winter Park, Fla.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Houston-based Maryland Club Foods, which had sales of about $200 million last year, sells coffee under the Maryland Club and Butter-Nut brands to restaurants, hotels, offices and airlines.  The acquisition "gives us additional production capacity for the food service coffee business and a stronger distribution network," a P&G spokesman said.  P&G already sells its Folgers ground roast coffee to food service concerns, but not to as many markets as Maryland Club.  For example, P&G up until now hasn't sold coffee to airlines and does only limited business with hotels and large restaurant chains.  Maryland Club also distributes tea, which fits well with P&G's Tender Leaf brand, and hot cocoa products.  The company said the acquisition has been completed and reviewed by the Federal Trade Commission.  The purchase includes a coffee-roasting plant in Omaha, Neb., and a leased facility in Houston.  MACMILLAN BLOEDEL Ltd. said it borrowed 215 million Dutch guilders (US$102 million) from a group of Dutch institutional investors.  MacMillan Bloedel, a Vancouver, British Columbia, forest products concern, said the 8.1% loan is due Oct. 16, 1996.  Funds will be used to repay existing short-term debt and to finance capital spending, it said.  President Bush will veto a bill funding the Departments of Labor, Education and Health and Human Services because it would allow federal funding of abortions for victims of rape and incest, the White House said.  Mr. Bush had threatened a veto previously.  But he put off a firm decision while his aides and legislators searched for a compromise that would tighten requirements for such abortions in a way acceptable to the president.  White House Press Secretary Marlin Fitzwater said negotiations between Bush aides and lawmakers ended Monday without success.  Most lawmakers think it will be extremely difficult for Mr. Bush's opponents on the abortion issue to round up the votes needed to override the veto.  But there still may be prolonged debate and political maneuvering that holds up the $156.7 billion funding bill for the fiscal year that began Oct. 1.  Mr. Bush has said he personally approves of abortions in the cases of rape, incest and danger to the life of the mother.  But he has opposed Medicaid funding of abortions for poor women who say they are victims of rape and incest, arguing that those exceptions are enforced so loosely that they open the way for abortions for other women.  NEWSPAPERS: Media General Inc. intends to sell two of its West Coast weekly newspaper chains, Golden West Publishing Inc. and Highlander Publications, which together comprise 31 papers.  Media General said it has had inquiries from potential buyers and expects to complete a sale in 1989.  It wouldn't discuss a price.  Lee Dirks & Associates is to sell the chains.  J.P. Morgan & Co., New York, will help the statutory managers of DFC New Zealand Ltd. to evaluate the failed investment bank's condition.  Earlier this month, the Reserve Bank of New Zealand, the country's central bank, appointed the managers to run the investment bank and pay creditors.  DFC asked the central bank to appoint managers after it revised loan-loss provisions to around the same level of shareholders' funds of 180 million New Zealand dollars (US$105.4 million).  DFC is held 80% by National Provident Fund, New Zealand's largest pension fund, and 20% by Salomon Brothers Inc., the investment-bank and securities-firm subsidiary of Salomon Inc. in New York.  A spokeswoman for J.P. Morgan, parent of the bank Morgan Guaranty Trust Co., confirmed its appointment to assist the managers but declined to elaborate.  The managers said in a brief statement yesterday that Morgan will help evaluate DFC's position and help determine alternatives.  The managers don't expect to complete the evaluation until Nov. 30.  An experimental vaccine can alter the immune response of people infected with the AIDS virus, a prominent U.S. scientist said.  However, that doesn't mean they can benefit from the vaccine.  Its effectiveness can't be determined until a large clinical trial is undertaken by the Army in January, according to Robert Redfield, chief of acquired immune deficiency syndrome research at Walter Reed Army Institute of Research.  Dr. Redfield's report on early experiments using an AIDS vaccine made by MicroGeneSys Inc. of West Haven, Conn., came at a meeting of AIDS vaccine researchers in Florida late Monday.  The vaccine, VaxSyn HIV-1, has been safely given to 14 people, some of whom are experiencing substantial increases in certain antibodies.  "The conventional wisdom used to be that you couldn't modify the immune response of an infected individual" by innoculating them with synthetic viral proteins, Dr. Redfield said.  "We've demonstrated that you can."  He said certain volunteers developed kinds of antibodies associated with early AIDS. Other antibodies sparked by the preparation are of a sort rarely present in large quantities in infected or ill individuals, he added.  One of the mysteries of AIDS remains why infected people produce large quantities of antibodies, but deteriorate nonetheless.  Cross & Trecker Corp. said it reached an agreement to sell its Wiedemann division to recently created Murata Wiedemann Inc., a U.S. affiliate of Murata Machinery Ltd. of Kyoto, Japan.  The agreement also includes the purchase of Cross & Trecker's Warner & Swasey (Switzerland) AG unit by a European affiliate of Murata Machinery.  Cross & Trecker is also selling its equity interest in a Japanese joint venture, Murata Warner Swasey, to Murata Machinery.  Cross & Trecker, a Bloomfield Hills, Mich., machine-tool maker, said the net sales price of the total transaction is $24 million.  The Wiedemann division was one of three businesses put up for sale in Cross & Trecker's restructuring program announced in July.  Cross & Trecker said negotiations are under way for the sale of another company, RobertsCorp.  The average interest rate fell to 8.292% at Citicorp's $50 million weekly auction of 91-day commercial paper, or corporate IOUs, from 8.483% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $465 million were submitted, and accepted bids were at 8.292%.  Citicorp also said that the average rate fell to 7.986% at its $50 million auction of 182-day commercial paper from 8.1255% at last week's sale.  Bids totaling $415 million were submitted, and accepted bids were at 7.986%.  The bank holding company will auction another $50 million of commercial paper in each maturity next Tuesday.  Matra S.A. reported its 1989 first-half profit soared 88%, and indicated that its previous estimate of a 50% rise in earnings for all of 1989 will be exceeded by a wide margin.  The French electronics and defense group said attributable consolidated net profit for the first six months of 1989 totaled 244 million francs ($38.4 million), compared with 130 million francs ($20.5 million) in the corresponding period of 1988.  Operating profit climbed 51%, to 572 million francs from 378 million in the first half of 1988.  Matra said the sharp improvement in net profit partly reflected a decline of 59 million francs in the group's net loss from nonrecurring items in the first half of this year to 104 million francs from 163 million a year earlier.  There was also a decline in the group's net financial costs to 25 million francs from 50 million a year before.  These movements were offset, however, by a steep rise in corporate income tax payments to 199 million francs from 35 million in the first six months of 1988.  Matra said the sharp rise in its first-half earnings was based on a 15% gain in consolidated revenue to 10.16 billion francs from 8.85 billion a year earlier.  Rep. Lee Hamilton (D., Ind.) said he and Rep. Byron Dorgan (D., N.D.) are backing away from their proposal to make the Treasury Secretary a voting member of the Federal Reserve panel that sets monetary policy.  Rep. Hamilton said the bill will be modified substantially to call for two meetings each year between the Fed's open market committee and the Treasury Secretary, the chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers and the director of the Office of Management and Budget.  The original bill was strongly opposed by the Fed and publicly criticized by friends of the Fed as an attempt to undermine the central bank's independence.  Fed critics, however, hailed it as a long overdue attempt to bring a measure of openness and democracy to the setting of monetary policy.  Rep. Hamilton said the purpose of the meetings would be to "improve communications and perhaps coordination between the executive branch and the Fed."  Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan meets regularly for lunch with Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady and talks frequently with Budget Director Richard Darman and Michael Boskin, chairman of the Council of Economic Advisers.  The administration officials don't ordinarily meet with the entire membership of the open market committee.  B.F. Goodrich Co. said third-quarter profits dropped 34% because of lower prices for polyvinyl chloride materials, the company's largest product group.  Net fell to $40.1 million, or $1.50 a share, from $60.7 million, or $2.32 a share, a year earlier.  Sales for the quarter slipped 2.7% to $601.3 million from $618.1 million.  Polyvinyl chloride capacity "has overtaken demand and we are experiencing reduced profit margins as a result," said John D. Ong, chairman and chief executive.  Prices for general-purpose PVC resin have dropped more than 15% since last December, he said.  The plastic resin is used in a wide range of products, including siding, pipe and electrical wire insulation.  Goodrich's vinyl-products segment reported operating profit for the quarter of $30.1 million, less than half the $64.1 million of the year-earlier quarter.  Third-quarter operating profit of the specialty-chemicals group declined slightly to $24.3 million from $24.9 million.  But operating profit from aerospace products rose nearly 50% to $15 million from $10.1 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, shares of the Akron, Ohio-based company fell $1.375 to $49.125.  Fiat S.p.A., Italy's leading industrial group, is conducting "concrete" talks with West Germany's Daimler-Benz AG on a series of projects in the aerospace sector, Fiat officials said.  However, the officials said it was too early to disclose the nature of the proposed projects or indicate when the talks might be concluded.  Daimler-Benz Chairman Edzard Reuter told Milan's financial daily Il Sole 24 Ore that talks are taking place between both companies' aerospace units.  "While Mr. Reuter's comments please us very much, there currently are no talks in progress regarding the automotive industry," a Fiat spokeswoman said.  In the interview, Mr. Reuter said he is thinking foremost of cooperation in the truck sector, but "in the long run, I don't want to rule out that we can also come a bit closer in personal cars."  Roberto Morelli, Italy analyst for County Natwest Securities in London, said that right now "the market isn't being influenced by that kind of news," referring to the conditional nature of the talks mentioned by Mr. Reuter and by the uncertainty surrounding world stock exchanges this week.  Paul Tanner was named president, chief executive officer and chairman of this oil and natural gas company.  He succeeds John A. Boudreau, who resigned for personal reasons.  Mr. Tanner had been president of Penn Pacific's National Southwest Capital Group subsidiary.  Mr. Boudreau will remain with Penn Pacific as a director and a member of the executive committee.  He has also agreed to become president of a new subsidiary to be formed to make future acquisitions, the company said.  Spooked investors, despite their stampede to dump takeover stocks, should hold on tight to their Jaguar shares.  That's the view of some analysts here who argue that Britain's leading maker of luxury cars still may have two U.S. auto giants battling for it.  Yesterday, Ford Motor disclosed that it has raised its holding in Jaguar to 10.4% from 5%.  Both Ford and its rival General Motors recently set their sights on grabbing significant minority stakes in the British company.  Ford's latest move increases the pressure on GM to complete its current talks with Jaguar quickly.  GM is likely to reach the cooperative operating pact it has been seeking in about two weeks, knowledgeable individuals say.  At that point investors may face a long, bumpy ride.  A victor in the fight for Jaguar may not emerge until after the expiration late next year of British government takeover restrictions.  The curbs prevent a buyer from purchasing more than 15% of Jaguar shares without permission.  "This is an exceptionally odd takeover battle," says London analyst Christopher Will of Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Jaguar's American depositary receipts were up 3/8 yesterday in a down market, closing at 10 3/8. (Jaguar's ADRs make the company one of the most widely held United Kingdom stocks in the U.S., with more than one-fourth of its shares owned there.)  Jaguar topped the most-active list for the U.S. over-the-counter market Monday.  And on London's Stock Exchange Monday, 18.5 million shares were traded, far above the usual volume.  Ford's share purchases undoubtedly accounted for much of Monday's heavy trading.  Last week, many Jaguar shareholders took their money and ran.  Fears that Ford's ardor might be cooling put Jaguar shares into reverse after GM confirmed its friendly negotiations with Jaguar.  But yesterday's announcement indicates that Ford hasn't lost interest.  Both Shearson's Mr. Will and Stephen Reitman, European auto analyst at the London brokerage firm UBS-Phillips & Drew, recently switched their Jaguar recommendations to hold from buy.  "Sit tight" through the coming volatility, Mr. Reitman suggests, though he concedes that many small investors will find Jaguar's zigzags "too hard to swallow."  But a crucial point is how Ford reacts when GM, the world's largest auto maker, firms up its proposed deal with Jaguar.  At the moment, Ford executives will say little beyond reiterating their desire to raise Ford's Jaguar stake to about 15%.  GM is expected to inject roughly #200 million ($316 million) by acquiring some Jaguar shares, and then win Jaguar management's promise of an eventual 30% stake.  Analysts believe the car makers also will create joint ventures to develop new executive models, doubling Jaguar's yearly output of 50,000 cars.  Jaguar shareholders would have to bless such a far-reaching accord.  Ford might challenge the proposal by offering a full bid if holders and the U.K. government agreed to drop the anti-takeover barrier early.  "I think Ford is going to come out with full guns blazing," Mr. Reitman says.  "Ford wants {Jaguar} very much."  U.S. takeover-stock speculators, who may own between 20% and 30% of Jaguar, could give Ford enough votes to block the GM deal.  GM might counterbid.  Then, Mr. Will says, "you get a bidding war between two very rich, very determined international companies."  He believes Jaguar's share price could zoom to between #8 and #10 ($12.60 to $15.80).  "There's quite a bit of value left in the {Jaguar} shares here even though they have run up" lately, says Doug Johnson, a fund manager for Seattle-based Safeco Asset Management.  At the moment, he intends to keep the firm's 180,000 Jaguar shares.  The risk is that Jaguar's share price could slump if GM's agreement with Jaguar effectively locks out its U.S. rival.  "Ford's appetite to attack {Jaguar} could gradually wane over time, particularly if Saab is a reasonably attractive proposition," says John Lawson, an auto analyst at London's Nomura Research Institute.  He thinks Saab-Scania AB on Friday will announce the sale of 50% of its car division to Ford; the companies have been discussing closer cooperation for months.  Clifford Stahl, president and chief investment officer of C-S Capital Advisors Inc., two weeks ago sold his Cincinnati firm's 107,100 Jaguar ADRs at about 10 each, making a tidy profit on a holding purchased at 4 7/8 in early May.  "I thought the probabilities of {a bidding war} happening were less," he says.  Of course, that was before Ford's latest move.  ---  Jaguar  (OTC; Symbol: JAGRY)  Business: Luxury cars  Year ended Dec. 31, 1988:  Revenue: $1.71 billion  Net income: $44.9 million; or 25 cents a share  First half ended, June 30, 1989:  Net loss: $1.7 million vs. net income: $21.2 million; or 12 cents a share  Averae daily trading volume:  1,432,326  Ordinary shares outstanding: 182.9 million  NOTE: All figures are translated into U.S. dollars based on current exchange rates.  A.F. Sloan, 60 years old, announced that he will retire next April as chairman and chief executive officer of this snack food and bakery products maker.  No replacement was immediately named.  Mr. Sloan plans to remain on the board until his current term expires in April 1991, a Lance spokesman said.  Newport Electronics Inc. of Santa Ana, Calif., said Milton B. Hollander, who holds a 49.4% stake, requested a special shareholders' meeting next Wednesday to remove four current directors and elect an alternative slate.  Mr. Hollander's High Technology Holding Co. of Stamford, Conn., acquired most of its stake last August in an $11-a-share tender offer for Newport, a maker of electronic-measuring devices.  Newport said Mr. Hollander is asking shareholders to retain only one director, James R. Lees, a Newport vice president.  The board isn't proposing a slate of its own and the other four current directors don't want to serve beyond the special meeting date, Newport said.  Mr. Hollander "is the new owner and wants to exercise control," said Barret B. Weekes, Newport's chairman.  Sandoz AG, a major Swiss chemical and pharmaceutical group, said that its group sales rose 25% to 9.482 billion francs ($5.80 billion) in the first nine months of this year, with strong gains in all divisions.  A year earlier sales totaled 7.567 billion francs.  Positive currency rates and strong sales growth led to a substantial rise in consolidated profit in the period, although the company didn't provide figures, as is customary with Swiss companies.  Sandoz said it expects a "substantial increase" in consolidated profit for the full year, barring major currency rate changes.  Amstrad PLC, a British maker of computer hardware and communications equipment, posted a 52% plunge in pretax profit for the latest year.  The #76.6 million ($120.6 million) in pretax profit for the 12 months to June 30 was down from #160 million ($252 million) a year earlier and below market expectations of #80 million and #90 million.  The slump in profit, which came despite steady sales, was attributed to increased costs for parts and problems with model introductions.  Amstrad's profit after taxes fell a similarly steep 51%, to #51.1 million from #105 million a year earlier.  Sales edged up fractionally to #626.3 million from #625.4 million a year earlier.  Microsoft Corp.'s earnings growth continued to outstrip that of most of its competitors and customers in the personal-computer industry, as it reported a 36% jump in fiscal first-quarter earnings on a 33% revenue gain.  The Redmond, Wash. company, a bellwether provider of operating systems and software for personal-computer makers and users, reported net income for the quarter ended Sept. 30 of $49.6 million, or 87 cents a share, up from $36.6 million, or 65 cents a share, in the year-ago period.  Revenue rose to $235.2 million, from $176.4 million.  Microsoft previously indicated it would have a strong quarter by forecasting its revenue gain on Oct. 4, causing a $6.50 a share jump in its stock.  But its stock jumped again yesterday as it disclosed surprisingly strong margins on those sales.  Microsoft's stock rose $2.875 a share in national over-the-counter trading to $78.625.  The stock had hit a high of $81 a share early last week but collapsed to $73.50 in the Friday stock plunge.  The company had been experiencing softening margins because of increased sales of software applications, which have lower margins than do operating systems.  But the company said that trend was offset in the first quarter by better economies of scale and efficiencies in manufacturing.  As a result, Microsoft's cost of goods, as a percentage of sales, fell 17% from the year-ago quarter and 13% from the previous period.  The trend drove up the aftertax margin -- net income as a percentage of revenues -- to 21.1% in the quarter, compared with 20.7% a year earlier.  Microsoft officials said the strong results also reflected continuing high demand for its software applications and operating systems.  While it has predicted that overall growth in unit sales of personal computers is slowing to about a 10% yearly rate, its own products are selling at a much faster rate because many are geared to the high-performance end of the market.  That segment continues to post strong quarter-to-quarter gains, while the low-end, or commodity segment, of the industry is experiencing sluggish growth or even sales declines.  Compared with its previous quarter, the final period of its 1989 fiscal year, net rose 9%, and sales rose 7%.  Control Data Corp., Minneapolis, signed a joint development agreement with MIPS Computer Systems Inc. to incorporate an emerging computing architecture in future machines.  MIPS is a leader in what is known as reduced-instruction set computing, or RISC, a technology combining microprocessors and sophisticated software.  In joining MIPS, Control Data follows several competitors in embracing RISC as a new design approach.  Digital Equipment Corp., Tandem Computers Inc., NEC Corp. and Group Bull, among others, have similar arrangements with MIPs, based in Sunnyvale, Calif.  Control Data said it expects its first RISC-based mainframe machine to be introduced next year.  The accord with MIPS calls for Control Data to share its expertise in data storage, the companies said.  Control Data also said it is developing what it called a "supermainframe" computer, the Cyber 2000, intended for scientists, engineers and other users of generalpurpose high-performance computers.  UAL'S STOCK SKIDDED an additional $24.875, to $198, as British Airways indicated it may balk at any hastily revised version of the aborted $6.79 billion buy-out of United Air's parent.  UAL has fallen $87.25, or 31%, in the three trading days since disclosure of the buy-out's collapse jolted the stock market.  Meanwhile, investor Marvin Davis said he remains interested in UAL, but he dropped his earlier $300-a-share back-up bid.  ---  Stock prices fell broadly in heavy trading, dominated by futures-related program selling and further declines by UAL and other airline stocks.  The Dow Jones industrials closed off 18.65 points, at 2638.73, after plunging over 60.25 points in the morning.  Bond prices ended lower after an early rally, while the dollar was mixed.  ---  The U.S. trade deficit swelled to $10.77 billion in August, prompting worries that the nation's export drive had stalled.  Exports declined for the second month in a row, while imports rose to a record.  An analyst called it one of the worst trade reports since the dollar bottomed out in 1987.  ---  Industrial output fell 0.1% in September, the latest sign manufacturing is slowing.  An analyst cited weaker capital spending and exports.  ---  Bankers Trust added $1.6 billion to reserves for Third World loans, the latest big bank to take such a step.  It expects a $1.42 billion quarterly loss.  Citicorp posted a 9% drop in quarterly profit.  Manufacturers Hanover had a loss due to a big reserve addition.  Bank of New England plans to sell some operations and lay off 4% of its work force after a year of weak earnings and mounting loan problems.  ---  Eastern Airlines' creditors have begun exploring alternative approaches to a Chapter 11 reorganization because they are unhappy with the carrier's latest proposal.  ---  Tele-Communications agreed to buy half of Showtime Networks from Viacom for $225 million.  The move could pose a new challenge to Time Warner's Home Box Office. ---  The CFTC plans to curb dual trading on commodities markets, in which traders buy and sell both for their own account and for clients.  The move is likely to anger traders.  ---  FDIC Chairman Seidman said that Lincoln Savings & Loan of California should have been seized in 1986 to contain losses he estimated will cost taxpayers as much as $2 billion.  ---  A $67 billion spending bill was approved by House-Senate conferees that includes major provisions affecting the federal mortgage market.  ---  Hooker's U.S. unit is expected to agree in principle this week to sell its Merksamer Jewelers chain to management, according to executives.  ---  The deficit-reduction bill became snagged over efforts to streamline the House version of the legislation in advance of a House-Senate conference.  ---  Integrated Resources said talks have ended with another potential buyer of its core businesses.  ---  Three big drug makers posted robust third-quarter earnings.  Merck's profit climbed 25%, Warner-Lambert's 22% and Eli Lilly's 24%.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 224,070,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2638.73, off 18.65; transportation 1254.27, off 49.96; utilities 214.54, off 0.19.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3377.43, off 16.08.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.72, unchanged; spot index 129.97, off 0.19.  Dollar: 142.75 yen, up 0.95; 1.8667 marks, off 0.0018.  Paul Ely, general partner of Alpha Partners, a venture-capital firm based in Menlo Park, Calif., was named a director of this computer company.  Mr. Ely, 57 years old, temporarily increases the board to seven members.  However, director Thomas O'Rourke has said he won't seek re-election at the company's annual meeting next month.  BroadBeach Associates Inc., the Los Angeles investment partnership whose $62-a-share bid for McGill Manufacturing Co. was topped recently by a competing offer from a Swedish concern, disclosed that it sold its entire 7% McGill stake.  McGill, a Valparaiso, Ind., ball-bearing manufacturer, had rebuffed BroadBeach's proposal.  It has since asked holders not to immediately tender their shares under a recent $72-a-share, or $104 million, bid from AB SKF of Sweden, until McGill directors have completed their evaluation.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, BroadBeach said it sold the 101,000 McGill shares for $7.3 million in a private transaction on Oct. 12.  BroadBeach didn't identify the buyer of the shares, but the date of the selloff followed by one day the Swedish concern's tender offer, and the indicated price of the shares sold equals SKF's $72-a-share tender offer price.  A BroadBeach spokeswoman said the company sold the stock in the open market and thus couldn't identify the buyer or buyers.  Luis Nogales, 45 years old, has been elected to the board of this brewer.  Mr. Nogales, former president of United Press International and the Univision Spanish-language network, most recently co-founded Nogales Castro Partners, a California-based media acquisition firm.  Mr. Nogales, the first Hispanic person to serve as a Coors director, is an addition to the board, increasing its membership to nine.  Hachette S.A., a European media and publishing group, reported a small rise in its attributable first-half group profit, excluding exceptional items, to 133.8 million francs ($21.1 million) from 130.1 million francs a year earlier.  The Paris-based group said its earlier projection -- that group profit for all of 1989 would be close to the 322.7 million francs posted for 1988 -- remains valid.  Taking into account nonrecurring gains and losses, Hachette's group net income for the first six months of this year totaled 246.6 million francs, practically double the year-earlier figure of 124.5 million francs.  Analysts said Hachette's earnings in the second half might be boosted by a capital gain from the sale of the Paris headquarters of a newspaper-delivery company that is 49% owned by Hachette.  Oncor Inc., Gaithersburg, Md., said it received approval from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to market a genetic test that will assist in diagnosis and treatment of leukemia and lymph cancer.  The B/T gene rearrangement test is more accurate than existing tests for diagnosing the type of cancer, whether it has spread or whether there is a recurrence following treatment, said Oncor President Stephen Turner.  Mr. Turner said the test initially will be used in conjunction with biopsies and other tests, but eventually might become the benchmark for tumor analysis.  Mr. Turner said the test will be shipped in 45 days to hospitals and clinical laboratories.  Dr. Wyndham Wilson, a cancer treatment specialist at the National Cancer Institute, said the test is widely used in research centers but isn't having a major impact because it is only occasionally useful in choosing the most effective treatment.  But the test may prove to be more sensitive in determining whether a tumor has spread or returned following treatment, Dr. Wilson said.  "We don't know yet how useful it's going to be," he said.  Oncor, a six-year-old developer of genetic medical tests, projects that the cancer test will help it to post its first-ever profit during the first quarter of 1990, Mr. Turner said.  The company will charge $35 for a test and projects about $2 million in revenue from the test during the first 12 months of marketing, he said.  Unilab Corp., Norcross, Ga., said it acquired the clinical laboratories of closely held Central Diagnostic Laboratory Inc. in a cash and securities transaction valued at $85 million.  Unilab said its wholly owned MetWest Inc. unit paid $25 million in cash, provided $30 million in notes and $30 million in preferred stock to acquire Central's labs in the Western U.S.  Unilab, which provides clinical laboratory services, competed with Central, based in Tarzana, Calif., in a number of areas.  Beyond removing a competitor, the combination should provide "synergies," said Fred Harlow, Unilab's chief financial officer.  It also will hand Unilab new markets.  In Los Angeles, for example, Central has had a strong market position while Unilab's presence has been less prominent, according to Mr. Harlow.  Consumers may want to move their telephones a little closer to the TV set.  Couch-potato jocks watching ABC's "Monday Night Football" can now vote during halftime for the greatest play in 20 years from among four or five filmed replays.  Two weeks ago, viewers of several NBC daytime consumer segments started calling a 900 number for advice on various life-style issues.  And the new syndicated "reality" show "Hard Copy" records viewers' opinions for possible airing on the next day's show.  Interactive telephone technology has taken a new leap in sophistication, and television programmers are racing to exploit the possibilities.  Eventually viewers may grow bored with the technology and resent the cost.  But right now programmers are figuring that viewers who are busy dialing up a range of services may put down their remote control zappers and stay tuned.  "We've been spending a lot of time in Los Angeles talking to TV production people," says Mike Parks, president of Call Interactive, which supplied technology for both ABC Sports and NBC's consumer minutes.  "With the competitiveness of the television market these days, everyone is looking for a way to get viewers more excited."  One of the leaders behind the expanded use of 900 numbers is Call Interactive, a joint venture of giants American Express Co. and American Telephone & Telegraph Co. Formed in August, the venture weds AT&T's newly expanded 900 service with 200 voice-activated computers in American Express's Omaha, Neb., service center.  Other long-distance carriers have also begun marketing enhanced 900 service, and special consultants are springing up to exploit the new tool.  Blair Entertainment, a New York firm that advises TV stations and sells ads for them, has just formed a subsidiary -- 900 Blair -- to apply the technology to television.  The use of 900 toll numbers has been expanding rapidly in recent years.  For a while, high-cost pornography lines and services that tempt children to dial (and redial) movie or music information earned the service a somewhat sleazy image, but new legal restrictions are aimed at trimming excesses.  The cost of a 900 call is set by the originator -- ABC Sports, for example -- with the cheapest starting at 75 cents.  Billing is included in a caller's regular phone bill.  From the fee, the local phone company and the long-distance carrier extract their costs to carry the call, passing the rest of the money to the originator, which must cover advertising and other costs.  In recent months, the technology has become more flexible and able to handle much more volume.  Before, callers of 900 numbers would just listen and not talk, or they'd vote "yes" or "no" by calling one of two numbers. (People in the phone business call this technology "900 click.") Now, callers are led through complex menus of choices to retrieve information they want, and the hardware can process 10,000 calls in 90 seconds.  Up to now, 900 numbers have mainly been used on local TV stations and cable channels.  MTV used one to give away the house that rock star Jon Bon Jovi grew up in.  For several years, Turner Broadcasting System's Cable News Network has invited viewers to respond nightly to topical issues ("Should the U.S. military intervene in Panama?"), but even the hottest controversies on CNN log only about 10,000 calls.  The newest uses of the 900-interactive technology demonstrate the growing variety of applications.  Capital Cities/ABC Inc., CBS Inc. and General Electric Co.'s National Broadcasting Co. unit are expected to announce soon a joint campaign to raise awareness about hunger.  The subject will be written into the plots of prime-time shows, and viewers will be given a 900 number to call.  Callers will be sent educational booklets, and the call's modest cost will be an immediate method of raising money.  Other network applications have very different goals.  ABC Sports was looking for ways to lift deflated halftime ratings for "Monday Night Football."  Kurt Sanger, ABC Sports's marketing director, says that now "tens of thousands" of fans call its 900 number each week to vote for the best punt return, quarterback sack, etc.  Profit from the calls goes to charity, but ABC Sports also uses the calls as a sales tool: After thanking callers for voting, Frank Gifford offers a football videotape for $19.95, and 5% of callers stay on the line to order it.  Jackets may be sold next.  Meanwhile, NBC Sports recently began "Scores Plus," a year-round, 24-hour 900 line providing a complex array of scores, analysis and fan news.  A spokesman said its purpose is "to bolster the impression that NBC Sports is always there for people."  NBC's "On-Line" consumer minutes have increased advertiser spending during the day, the network's weakest period.  Each weekday matches a sponsor and a topic: On Mondays, Unilever N.V.'s Lever Bros. sponsors tips on diet and exercise, followed by a 30-second Lever Bros. commercial.  Viewers can call a 900 number for additional advice, which will be tailored to their needs based on the numbers they punch ("Press one if you're pregnant," etc.).  If the caller stays on the line and leaves a name and address for the sponsor, coupons and a newsletter will be mailed, and the sponsor will be able to gather a list of desirable potential customers.  Diane Seaman, an NBC-TV vice president, says NBC has been able to charge premium rates for this ad time.  She wouldn't say what the premium is, but it's believed to be about 40% above regular daytime rates.  "We were able to get advertisers to use their promotion budget for this, because they get a chance to do couponing," says Ms. Seaman.  "And we were able to attract some new advertisers because this is something new."  Mr. Parks of Call Interactive says TV executives are considering the use of 900 numbers for "talk shows, game shows, news and opinion surveys."  Experts are predicting a big influx of new shows in 1990, when a service called "automatic number information" will become widely available.  This service identifies each caller's phone number, and it can be used to generate instant mailing lists.  "Hard Copy," the new syndicated tabloid show from Paramount Pictures, will use its 900 number for additional purposes that include research, says executive producer Mark B. von S. Monsky.  "For a piece on local heroes of World War II, we can ask people to leave the name and number of anyone they know who won a medal," he says.  "That'll save us time and get people involved."  But Mr. Monsky sees much bigger changes ahead.  "These are just baby steps toward real interactive video, which I believe will be the biggest thing yet to affect television," he says.  Although it would be costly to shoot multiple versions, TV programmers could let audiences vote on different endings for a movie.  Fox Broadcasting experimented with this concept last year when viewers of "Married . . .  With Children" voted on whether Al should say "I love you" to Peg on Valentine's Day.  Someday, viewers may also choose different depths of news coverage.  "A menu by phone could let you decide, `I'm interested in just the beginning of story No. 1, and I want story No. 2 in depth," Mr. Monsky says.  "You'll start to see shows where viewers program the program."  Integrated Resources Inc., the troubled financial-services company that has been trying to sell its core companies to restructure debt, said talks with a potential buyer ended.  Integrated didn't identify the party or say why the talks failed.  Last week another potential buyer, Whitehall Financial Group -- which had agreed in August to purchase most of Integrated's core companies for $310 million -- ended talks with Integrated.  Integrated said that it would continue to pursue "other alternatives" to sell the five core companies and that a group of senior executives plans to make a proposal to purchase three of the companies -- Integrated Resources Equity Corp., Resources Trust Co. and Integrated Resources Asset Management Corp.  A price wasn't disclosed.  Integrated also said it expects to report a second-quarter loss wider than the earlier estimate of about $600 million.  The company didn't disclose the new estimate but said the change was related to Integrated's failure to sell its core businesses, as well as "other events," which it didn't detail, that occurred after its announcement last week that it was in talks with the unidentified prospective buyer.  Meanwhile, a number of top sales producers from Integrated Resources Equity will meet this afternoon in Chicago to discuss their options.  The unit is a loosely constructed group of about 3,900 independent brokers and financial planners who sell insurance, annuities, limited partnerships, mutual funds and other investments for Integrated and other firms.  The sales force is viewed as a critical asset in Integrated's attempt to sell its core companies.  Whitehall cited concerns about how long Integrated would be able to hold together the sales force as one reason its talks with Integrated failed.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Integrated closed at $1.25 a share, down 25 cents.  Integrated has been struggling to avoid a bankruptcy-law filing since June, when it failed to make interest payments on nearly $1 billion of debt.  Integrated senior and junior creditors are owed a total of about $1.8 billion.  AN EARTHQUAKE STRUCK Northern California, killing more than 50 people.  The violent temblor, which lasted about 15 seconds and registered 6.9 on the Richter scale, also caused the collapse of a 30-foot section of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge and shook Candlestick Park.  The tremor was centered near Hollister, southeast of San Francisco, and was felt as far as 200 miles away.  Numerous injuries were reported.  Some buildings collapsed, gas and water lines ruptured and fires raged.  The quake, which also caused damage in San Jose and Berkeley, knocked out electricity and telephones, cracked roadways and disrupted subway service in the Bay Area.  Major injuries weren't reported at Candlestick Park, where the third game of baseball's World Series was canceled and fans evacuated from the stadium.  ---  Bush vowed to veto a bill allowing federal financing for abortions in cases of rape and incest, saying tax dollars shouldn't be used to "compound a violent act with the taking of an unborn life."  His pledge, in a letter to Democratic Sen. Byrd, came ahead of an expected Senate vote on spending legislation containing the provision.  ---  East Germany's Politburo met amid speculation that the ruling body would oust hard-line leader Honecker, whose rule has been challenged by mass emigration and calls for democratic freedoms.  Meanwhile, about 125 refugees flew to Duesseldorf, West Germany, from Warsaw, the first airlift in East Germany's refugee exodus.  ---  The World Psychiatric Association voted at an Athens parley to conditionally readmit the Soviet Union.  Moscow, which left the group in 1983 to avoid explusion over allegations that political dissidents were being certified as insane, could be suspended if the misuse of psychiatry against dissenters is discovered during a review within a year.  ---  NASA postponed the liftoff of the space shuttle Atlantis because of rain near the site of the launch pad in Cape Canaveral, Fla.  The flight was rescheduled for today.  The spacecraft's five astronauts are to dispatch the nuclear-powered Galileo space probe on an exploratory mission to Jupiter. ---  Senate Democratic leaders said they had enough votes to defeat a proposed constitutional amendment to ban flag burning.  The amendment is aimed at skirting a Supreme Court ruling that threw out the conviction of a Texas flag-burner on grounds that his freedom of speech was violated.  ---  Federal researchers said lung-cancer mortality rates for people under 45 years of age have begun to decline, particularly for white males.  The National Cancer Institute also projected that overall U.S. mortality rates from lung cancer should begin to drop in several years if cigarette smoking continues to abate.  ---  Bush met with South Korean President Roh, who indicated that Seoul plans to further ease trade rules to ensure that its economy becomes as open as the other industrialized nations by the mid-1990s.  Bush assured Roh that the U.S. would stand by its security commitments "as long as there is a threat" from Communist North Korea.  ---  The Bush administration is seeking an understanding with Congress to ease restrictions on U.S. involvement in foreign coups that might result in the death of a country's leader.  A White House spokesman said that while Bush wouldn't alter a longstanding ban on such involvement, "there's a clarification needed" on its interpretation.  ---  India's Gandhi called for parliamentary elections next month.  The balloting, considered a test for the prime minister and the ruling Congress (I) Party, comes amid charges of inept leadership and government corruption.  Gandhi's family has ruled independent India for all but five years of its 42-year history.  ---  The Soviet Union abstained from a U.N. General Assembly vote to reject Israel's credentials.  It was the first time in seven years that Moscow hasn't joined efforts, led by Moslem nations, to expel Israel from the world body, and was viewed as a sign of improving Soviet-Israeli ties.  Israel was seated by a vote of 95-37, with 15 abstentions.  ---  Black activist Walter Sisulu said the African National Congress wouldn't reject violence as a way to pressure the South African government into concessions that might lead to negotiations over apartheid.  The 77-year-old Sisulu was among eight black political activists freed Sunday from prison.  ---  London has concluded that Austrian President Waldheim wasn't responsible for the execution of six British commandos in World War II, although he probably was aware of the slayings.  The report by the Defense Ministry also rejected allegations that Britain covered up evidence of Waldheim's activities as a German army officer.  ---  An international group approved a formal ban on ivory trade despite objections from southern African governments, which threatened to find alternative channels for selling elephant tusks.  The move by the Convention on Trade in Endangered Species, meeting in Switzerland, places the elephant on the endangered-species list.  ---  An assassin in Colombia killed a federal judge on a Medellin street.  An anonymous caller to a local radio station said cocaine traffickers had slain the magistrate in retaliation for the extraditions of Colombians wanted on drug charges in the U.S.  ---  Libyan leader Gadhafi met with Egypt's President Mubarak, and the two officials pledged to respect each other's laws, security and stability.  They stopped short of resuming diplomatic ties, severed in 1979.  The reconciliation talks in the Libyan desert town of Tobruk followed a meeting Monday in the Egyptian resort of Mersa Metruh.  Alpine Group Inc. revised its exchange offer for $43.7 million face amount of 13.5% senior subordinated debt due 1996 and extended the offer to Oct. 27 from Oct. 12.  The Hackensack, N.J., company said holders would receive for each $1,000 face amount, $750 face amount of a new issue of secured senior subordinated notes, convertible into common stock at an initial rate of $6.50 a share, and 50 common shares.  The new notes will bear interest at 5.5% through July 31, 1991, and thereafter at 10%.  Under the original proposal, the maker of specialty coatings and a developer of information-display technologies offered $400 of notes due 1996, 10 common shares and $175 in cash for each $1,000 face amount.  Completion of the exchange offer is subject to the tender of at least 80% of the debt, among other things.  Alpine, which said it doesn't plan to further extend the offer, said it received $615,000 face amount of debt under the original offer.  The stock of UAL Corp. continued to be pounded amid signs that British Airways may balk at any hasty reformulation of the aborted $6.79 billion buy-out of United Airlines' parent.  UAL stock plummeted a further $24.875 to $198 on volume of more than 2.8 million shares in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  The plunge followed a drop of $56.875 Monday, amid indications the takeover may take weeks to be revived.  The stock has fallen $87.25, or 31%, in the three trading days since announcement of the collapse of the $300-a-share takeover jolted the entire stock market into its second-worst plunge ever.  "This is a total bloodbath" for takeover-stock traders, one investment banker said.  Los Angeles financier Marvin Davis, who put United in play with a $5.4 billion bid two months ago, last night proffered both a ray of hope and an extra element of uncertainty by saying he remains interested in acquiring UAL.  But he dropped his earlier $300-a-share back-up bid, saying he must first explore bank financing.  Even as Citicorp and Chase Manhattan Corp. scrambled to line up bank financing for a revised version of the lapsed labor-management bid, British Airways, a 15% partner in the buying group, indicated it wants to start from scratch.  Its partners are United's pilots, who were to own 75%, and UAL management at 10%.  Adding insult to injury, United's 25,000-member Machinists' union, which helped scuttle financing for the first bid, yesterday asked UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf and other UAL directors to resign.  A similar demand was made by a group that represents some of United's 26,000 noncontract employees.  John Peterpaul, Machinists union general vice president, attacked Mr. Wolf as "greedy and irresponsible" for pursuing the buy-out.  Although Mr. Wolf and John Pope, UAL's chief financial officer, stood to pocket $114.3 million for stock and options in the buy-out, UAL executives planned to reinvest only $15 million in the new company.  The blue-collar machinists, longtime rivals of the white-collar pilots, say the buyout would load the company with debt and weaken its finances.  Confusion about the two banks' hurried efforts to round up financing for a new bid that the UAL board hasn't even seen yet helped send UAL stock spiraling downward.  And rumors of forced selling by takeover-stock traders triggered a 25-point downdraft in the Dow Jones Industrial Average around 11:15 a.m. EDT yesterday.  Yesterday's selling began after a Japanese news agency reported that Japanese banks, which balked at the first bid, were ready to reject a revised version at around $250 a share, or $5.65 billion.  Several reports as the day progressed gave vague or conflicting indications about whether banks would sign up.  Citicorp, for example, said only that it had "expressions of interest of a transaction from both the borrowers and the banks," but didn't have an agreement.  Late in the day, Mr. Wolf issued a onepage statement calling Mr. Peterpaul's blast "divisive and uncalled for."  But he gave few details on the progress toward a new bid, saying only, "We are working toward a revised proposal for majority employee ownership."  Meanwhile, in another sign that a new bid isn't imminent, it was learned that the UAL board held a telephone meeting Monday to hear an update on the situation, but that a formal board meeting isn't likely to be convened until early next week.  In London, British Airways Chairman Lord King was quoted in the Times as declaring he is "not prepared to take my shareholders into a hasty deal."  Observers said it appeared that British Air was angered at the way the bid has degenerated into confusion, as well as by the banks' effort to round up financing for what one called "a deal that isn't a deal."  The effort to revive the bid was complicated by the unwieldy nature of the three-party buying group.  The pilots were meeting outside Chicago yesterday.  But British Air, which was to have supplied $750 million out of $965 million in equity financing, apparently wasn't involved in the second proposal and could well reject it even if banks obtain financing.  A group of United's noncontract employees said in a statement, "The fact that Wolf and other officers were going to line their pockets with literally millions of dollars while instituting severe pay cuts on the nonunion employees of United is not only deplorable but inexcusable."  The machinists also asked for an investigation by the Securities and Exchange Commission into possible securities-law violations in the original bid for UAL by Mr. Davis, as well as in the response by UAL. Last week, just before the bank commitments were due, the union asked the U.S. Labor Department to study whether the bid violated legal standards of fairness governing employee investment funds.  In his statement, Mr. Wolf said, "We continue to believe our approach is sound, and that it is far better for all employees than the alternative of having an outsider own the company with employees paying for it just the same."  Mr. Wolf has eschewed merger advice from a major Wall Street securities firm, relying instead only on a takeover lawyer, Peter Atkins of Skadden Arps Slate Meagher & Flom.  The huge drop in UAL stock prompted one takeover stock trader, George Kellner, managing partner of Kellner, DiLeo & Co., to deny publicly rumors that his firm was going out of business.  Mr. Kellner said that despite losses on UAL stock, his firm's health is "excellent."  The stock's decline also has left the UAL board in a quandary.  Although it may not be legally obligated to sell the company if the buy-out group can't revive its bid, it may have to explore alternatives if the buyers come back with a bid much lower than the group's original $300-a-share proposal.  At a meeting Sept. 1 to consider the labor-management bid, the board also was informed by its investment adviser, First Boston Corp., of interest expressed by buy-out funds including Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. and Forstmann Little & Co., as well as by Robert Bass, Morgan Stanley's buy-out fund, and Pan Am Corp.  The takeover-stock traders were hoping that Mr. Davis or one of the other interested parties might re-emerge with the situation in disarray, or that the board might consider a recapitalization.  Meanwhile, Japanese bankers said they were still hesitant about accepting Citicorp's latest proposal.  Macmillan Inc. said it plans a public offering of 8.4 million shares of its Berlitz International Inc. unit at $19 to $21 a share.  The offering for the language school unit was announced by Robert Maxwell, chairman and chief executive officer of London-based Maxwell Communication Corp., which owns Macmillan.  After the offering is completed, Macmillan will own about 56% of the Berlitz common stock outstanding.  Five million shares will be offered in the U.S., and 3.4 million additional shares will be offered in concurrent international offerings outside the U.S. Goldman, Sachs & Co. will manage the offering.  Macmillan said Berlitz intends to pay quarterly dividends on the stock.  The company said it expects to pay the first dividend, of 12.5 cents a share, in the 1990 first quarter.  Berlitz will borrow an amount equal to its expected net proceeds from the offerings, plus $50 million, in connection with a credit agreement with lenders.  The total borrowing will be about $208 million, the company said.  Proceeds from the borrowings under the credit agreement will be used to pay an $80 million cash dividend to Macmillan and to lend the remainder of about $128 million to Maxwell Communications in connection with a promissory note.  Proceeds from the offering will be used to repay borrowings under the short-term parts of a credit agreement.  Berlitz, which is based in Princeton, N.J., provides language instruction and translation services through more than 260 language centers in 25 countries.  In the past five years, more than 68% of its sales have been outside the U.S. Macmillan has owned Berlitz since 1966.  In the first six months of this year, Berlitz posted net income of $7.6 million on sales of $106.2 million, compared with net income of $8.2 million on sales of $90.6 million.  Right away you notice the following things about a Philip Glass concert.  It attracts people with funny hair (or with no hair -- in front of me a girl with spiked locks sat beside a boy who had shaved his).  Whoever constitute the local Left Bank come out in force, dressed in black, along with a smattering of yuppies who want to be on the cutting edge.  People in Glass houses tend to look stoned.  And, if still conscious at the evening's end, you notice something else: The audience, at first entranced and hypnotized by the music, releases its pent-up feelings in collective gratitude.  Currently in the middle of a four-week, 20-city tour as a solo pianist, Mr. Glass has left behind his synthesizers, equipment and collaborators in favor of going it alone.  He sits down at the piano and plays.  And plays.  Either one likes it or one doesn't.  The typical Glass audience, which is more likely to be composed of music students than their teachers, certainly does.  The work, though, sounds like Muzak for spaceships.  Philip Glass is the emperor, and his music the new clothes, of the avant-garde.  His success is easy to understand.  Softly introducing and explaining his pieces, Mr. Glass looks and sounds more like a shaggy poet describing his work than a classical pianist playing a recital.  The piano compositions, which have been labeled variously as minimalist, Oriental, repetitive, cyclical, monophonic and hypnotic, are relentlessly tonal (therefore unthreatening), unvaryingly rhythmic (therefore soporific), and unflaggingly harmonious but unmelodic (therefore both pretty and unconventional).  It is music for people who want to hear something different but don't want to work especially hard at the task.  It is E-Z listening for the now generation.  Mr. Glass has inverted the famous modernist dictum "less is more."  His more is always less.  Far from being minimalist, the music unabatingly torments us with apparent novelties not so cleverly disguised in the simplicities of 4/4 time, octave intervals, and ragtime or gospel chord progressions.  But the music has its charm, and Mr. Glass has constructed his solo program around a move from the simple to the relatively complex.  "Opening" (1981), from Glassworks, introduces the audience to the Glass technique: Never straying too far from the piano's center, Mr. Glass works in the two octaves on either side of middle C, and his fingers seldom leave the keys.  There is a recognizable musical style here, but not a particular performance style.  The music is not especially pianistic; indeed, it's hard to imagine a bad performance of it.  Nothing bravura, no arpeggios, no ticklish fingering problems challenge the performer.  We hear, we may think, inner voices, but they all seem to be saying the same thing.  With "Planet News," music meant to accompany readings of Allen Ginsberg's "Wichita Vortex Sutra," Mr. Glass gets going.  His hands sit farther apart on the keyboard.  Seventh chords make you feel as though he may break into a (very slow) improvisatory riff.  The chords modulate, but there is little filigree even though his fingers begin to wander over more of the keys.  Contrasts predictably accumulate: First the music is loud, then it becomes soft, then (you realize) it becomes louder again.  "The Fourth Knee Play," an interlude from "Einstein on the Beach," is like a toccata but it doesn't seem to move much beyond its left-hand ground in "Three Blind Mice."  When Mr. Glass decides to get really fancy, he crosses his hands and hits a resonant bass note with his right hand.  He does this in at least three of his solo pieces.  You might call it a leitmotif or a virtuoso accomplishment.  In "Mad Rush," which came from a commission to write a piece of indeterminate length (Mr.  Glass charmingly, and tellingly, confessed that "this was no problem for me"), an A section alternates with a B section several times before the piece ends unresolved.  Not only is the typical Glasswork open-ended, it is also often multiple in its context(s).  "Mad Rush" began its life as the accompaniment to the Dalai Lama's first public address in the U.S., when Mr. Glass played it on the organ at New York's Cathedral of St. John the Divine.  Later it was performed on Radio Bremen in Germany, and then Lucinda Childs took it for one of her dance pieces.  The point is that any piece can be used as background music for virtually anything.  The evening ended with Mr. Glass's "Metamorphosis," another multiple work.  Parts 1, 2, and 5 come from the soundtrack of Errol Morris's acclaimed film, "The Thin Blue Line," and the two other parts from incidental music to two separate dramatizations of the Kafka story of the same name.  When used as background in this way, the music has an appropriate eeriness, as when a two-note phrase, a descending minor third, accompanies the seemingly endless litany of reports, interviews and confessions of witnesses in the Morris film.  Served up as a solo, however, the music lacks the resonance provided by a context within another medium.  Admirers of Mr. Glass may agree with the critic Richard Kostelanetz's sense that the 1974 "Music in Twelve Parts" is as encyclopedic and weighty as "The Well-Tempered Clavier."  But while making the obvious point that both composers develop variations from themes, this comparison ignores the intensely claustrophobic nature of Mr. Glass's music.  Its supposedly austere minimalism overlays a bombast that makes one yearn for the astringency of neoclassical Stravinsky, the genuinely radical minimalism of Berg and Webern, and what in retrospect even seems like concision in Mahler. ---  Mr. Spiegelman is professor of English at Southern Methodist University and editor of the Southwest Review.  Honeywell Inc. said it hopes to complete shortly the first of two sales of shares in its Japanese joint venture, Yamatake-Honeywell, for about $280 million.  The company wouldn't disclose the buyer of the initial 16% stake.  Proceeds of the sale, expected to be completed next week, would be used to repurchase as many as 10 million shares of Honeywell stock, the company said.  Honeywell said it is negotiating the sale of a second stake in Yamatake-Honeywell, but indicated it intends to hold at least 20% of the joint venture's stock long term.  A 20% stake would allow Honeywell to include Yamatake earnings in its results.  Honeywell previously said it intended to reduce its holding in the Japanese concern as part of a restructuring plan which also calls for a reduction of dependence on weapons sales.  Yesterday a spokeswoman said the company was "pleased with our progress" in that regard and "hopes to provide additional details soon."  Honeywell said its Defense and Marine Systems group incurred delays in shipping some undisclosed contracts during the third quarter, resulting in lower operating profit for that business.  Overall, Honeywell reported earnings of $74.4 million, or $1.73 a share, for the three months ended Oct. 1 compared with a loss of $41.4 million, or 98 cents a share, a year earlier.  The previous period's results included a $108 million pretax charge related to unrecoverable contract costs and a $12.3 million pretax gain on real estate sales.  Sales for the latest quarter were flat, at $1.72 billion.  For the nine months, Honeywell reported earnings of $212.1 million, or $4.92 a share, compared with earnings of $47.9 million, or $1.13 a share, a year earlier.  Sales declined slightly to $5.17 billion.  Once again, your editorial page misstates the law to conform to your almost beatific misperceptions.  In an excursus of little relevance to his central point about private enforcement suits by environmental groups, Michael S. Greve informs your readers, ". . . the Clean Water Act is written upon the presumption -- the pretense, rather -- that nothing but zero risk will do; it establishes a legal standard of zero discharge" ("Congress's Environmental Buccaneers," Sept. 18).  This statement surely buttresses your editorial viewpoint that environmental protection is generally silly or excessive, but it is simply wrong.  The Clean Water Act contains no "legal standard" of zero discharge.  It requires that "discharges of pollutants" into the "waters of the United States" be authorized by permits that reflect the effluent limitations developed under section 301.  Whatever may be the problems with this system, it scarcely reflects "zero risk" or "zero discharge."  Perhaps Mr. Greve was confused by Congress's meaningless statement of "the national goal" in section 101, which indeed calls for the elimination of discharges -- by 1985, no less.  This fatuous statement was not taken seriously when enacted in 1972, and should not now be confused with the operative provisions of the statute.  Thus, you do the public a great disservice when Mr. Greve suggests, even facetiously, that the Clean Water Act prohibits the preparation of a scotch and water; your tippling readers may be led to believe that nothing but chance or oversight protects them, as they cower in the night with their scotch and waters, from the hairyknuckled knock of the Sierra Club at their doors.  Robert J. McManus  Washington  National Geographic, the sixth-largest U.S. magazine, is attracting more readers than ever and offers the glossy, high-toned pages that upscale advertisers love.  So why did advertising pages plunge by almost 10% and ad revenue by 7.2% in the first half?  To hear advertisers tell it, the magazine just hasn't kept up with the times.  Despite renewed interest by the public in such topics as the environment and the Third World, it hasn't been able to shake its reputation as a magazine boys like to flip through in search of topless tribe women.  Worse, it lagged behind competitors in offering now-standard gimmicks, from regional editions to discounts for frequent advertisers.  But now, the magazine is attempting to fight back, with an ambitious plan including a revamped sales strategy and a surprisingly aggressive ad campaign.  Advertisers don't think of the magazine first, says Joan McCraw, who joined in April as national advertising director.  "What we want to do is take a more aggressive stance.  People didn't believe we were in tune with the marketplace, and in many ways we weren't."  The 101-year-old magazine has never had to woo advertisers with quite so much fervor before.  It largely rested on its hard-to-fault demographics: 10.8 million subscribers in the first half, up from 10.5 million a year ago; an average age of 42 for readers -- at the height of their consuming years; loyalty to the tune of an 85% average subscription renewal rate.  The magazine had its best year yet in 1988, when it celebrated its centennial and racked up a 17% gain in ad pages, to 283.  But this year, when the hullabaloo surrounding its centennial died, so too did some advertiser interest.  The reason, ad executives say, is that the entire magazine business has been soft -- and National Geographic has some quirks that make it especially unattractive during a soft market.  Perhaps the biggest of those factors is its high ad prices -- $130,000 for a four-color page, vs. $47,000 for the Smithsonian, a comparable publication with a far smaller circulation.  When ad dollars are tight, the high page cost is a major deterrent for advertisers, who generally want to appear regularly in a publication or not at all.  Even though National Geographic offers far more readers than does a magazine like Smithsonian, "the page costs you an arm and a leg to develop any frequency,"says Harry Glass, New York media manager for Bozell Inc.  To combat that problem, National Geographic, like other magazines, began offering regional editions allowing advertisers to appear in only a portion of its magazines -- for example, ads can run only in the magazines sent to subscribers in the largest 25 markets.  But the magazine was slower than its competitors to come up with its regional editions, and until last year offered fewer of them than did competitors.  Time magazine, for example, has more than 100 separate editions going to different regions, top management, and other groups.  Another sticking point for advertisers was National Geographic's tradition of lumping its ads together, usually at the beginning or end of the magazine, rather than spreading ads out among its articles, as most magazines do.  And National Geographic's smaller-than-average size means extra production costs for advertisers.  But Ms. McCraw says the magazine is fighting back.  It now offers 30 regional editions, it very recently began running ads adjacent to articles, and it has been beefing up its sales force.  And it just launched a promotional campaign to tell chief executives, marketing directors, and media executives just that.  The centerpiece of the promotion is its new ad campaign, into which the magazine will pour about $500,000, mostly in the next few weeks.  The campaign, created by Omnicom Group's DDB Needham agency, takes advantage of the eye-catching photography that National Geographic is known for.  In one ad, a photo of the interior of the Sainte-Chapelle in Paris is paired with the headline, "The only book more respected than ours doesn't accept advertising."  Another ad pictures a tree ant, magnified 80 times, with the headline, "For impact far beyond your size consider our regional editions."  Ms. McCraw says she wants the campaign to help attract advertisers in 10 categories, including corporate, financial services, consumer electronics, insurance and food.  Her goal: to top 300 ad pages in 1990, up from about 274 this year.  Whether she can meet that ambitious goal is still far from certain.  "The ad campaign is meant to contemporize the thought of National Geographic," she says.  "We want it to be a '90s kind of image."  ---  WCRS Plans Ad-Unit Sale  WCRS Group hopes to announce, perhaps today, an agreement to sell the majority of its ad unit to Paris-based Eurocom, a European ad executive said.  WCRS has been in discussions with Eurocom for several months.  However, when negotiations bogged down recently, WCRS's chief executive, Peter Scott, met in Paris with another French firm, Boulet Dru Dupuy Petit, or BDDP.  According to the executive, BDDP's involvement prompted renewed vigor in the WCRS-Eurocom talks and the two agencies were hoping to hammer out details by today.  Executives of the two agencies couldn't be reached last night.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: Procter & Gamble Co., Cincinnati, awarded the ad accounts for its line of Professional Crisco vegetable shortening and oil products to Northlich, Stolley, LaWarre, Cincinnati.  Billings weren't disclosed.  Professional Crisco products are specially made for the foodservice industry.  WHO'S NEWS: Stephen Novick, 49, was named executive vice president, deputy creative director at Grey Advertising, New York.  He was executive vice president, director of broadcast production.  The Commodity Futures Trading Commission plans to restrict dual trading on commodity exchanges, a move almost certain to infuriate exchange officials and traders.  The CFTC said it will propose the restrictions after the release of a study that shows little economic benefit resulting from dual trading and cites "problems" associated with the practice.  Dual trading gives an exchange trader the right to trade both for his own account and for customers.  The issue exploded this year after a Federal Bureau of Investigation operation led to charges of widespread trading abuses at the Chicago Board of Trade and Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  While not specifically mentioned in the FBI charges, dual trading became a focus of attempts to tighten industry regulations.  Critics contend that traders were putting buying or selling for their own accounts ahead of other traders' customer orders.  Traders are likely to oppose such restrictions because dual trading provides a way to make money in slower markets where there is a shortage of customer orders.  The exchanges contend that dual trading improves liquidity in the markets because traders can buy or sell even when they don't have a customer order in hand.  The exchanges say liquidity becomes a severe problem for thinly traded contracts such as those with a long time remaining before expiration.  The CFTC may take those arguments into account by allowing exceptions to its restrictions.  The agency didn't cite specific situations where dual trading might be allowed, but smaller exchanges or contracts that need additional liquidity are expected to be among them.  Wendy Gramm, the agency's chairman, told the Senate Agriculture Committee that she expects the study to be released within two weeks and the rule changes to be completed by Thanksgiving.  The study, by the CFTC's division of economic analysis, shows that "a trade is a trade," a member of the study team said.  Whether a trade is done on a dual or non-dual basis, the member said, "doesn't seem to have much economic impact."  Currently, most traders on commodity exchanges specialize in trading either for customer accounts, which makes them brokers, or for their own accounts as socalled locals.  "The tests indicate that dual and non-dual traders are similar in terms of the trade executions and liquidity they provide to the market," Mrs. Gramm told the Senate panel.  Members of Congress have proposed restricting dual trading in bills to reauthorize CFTC operations.  The House's bill would prohibit dual trading in markets with daily average volume of 7,000 contracts or more, comprising those considered too difficult to track without a sophisticated computer system.  The Senate bill would force the CFTC to suspend dual trading if an exchange can't show that its oversight system can detect dual-trading abuses.  So far, one test of restricting dual trading has worked well.  The Chicago Merc banned dual trading in its Standard & Poor's 500-stock index futures pit in 1987.  Under the rules, traders decide before a session begins whether they will trade for their own account or for customers.  Traders who stand on the pit's top step, where most customer orders are executed, can't trade for themselves.  A Merc spokesman said the plan hasn't made much difference in liquidity in the pit.  "It's too soon to tell . . . but people don't seem to be unhappy with it," he said.  He said he wouldn't comment on the CFTC plan until the exchange has seen the full proposal.  But at a meeting last week, Tom Donovan, the Board of Trade's president, told commodity lawyers: "Dual trading is definitely worth saving.  It adds something to the market."  Japanese Firms Push  Posh Car Showrooms  JAPANESE luxury-car makers are trying to set strict design standards for their dealerships.  But some dealers are negotiating looser terms, while others decline to deal at all.  Nissan Motor Co.'s Infiniti division likes to insist that every dealer construct and furnish a building in a Japanese style.  Specifications include a polished bronze sculpture at the center of each showroom and a tile bridge spanning a stream that flows into the building from outside.  "Infiniti has it down to the ashtrays," says Jay Ferron, a partner at J.D. Power & Associates, an auto research firm.  Toyota Motor Corp.'s Lexus division also provides specifications.  But only two-thirds of Lexus dealers are constructing new buildings according to the Lexus specs.  Some are even coming up with their own novel designs.  In Louisville, Ky., for example, David Peterson has built a Lexus dealership with the showroom on the second floor.  Yet some dealers have turned down Infiniti or Lexus franchises because they were unwilling or unable to meet the design requirements.  Lee Seidman of Cleveland says Infiniti "was a bear on interiors" but at least let him retrofit an existing building -- without the stream.  Mr. Seidman says he turned down a Lexus franchise in part because "the building was gorgeous but very expensive."  To head off arguments, Infiniti offers dealers cash bonuses and low-interest construction loans.  Dictation Device's Saga  Plays Back a Lesson  PRODUCTS DON'T have to be first to be winners.  That's the lesson offered through one case study featured in a design exhibit.  Dictaphone Corp. was caught off guard in 1974 when its main competitor, Lanier Office Products of Japan, introduced a microcassette dictation recorder half the size of standard cassette devices.  Blocked by patent protection from following suit, Dictaphone decided to go a step further and cut the cassette in half again -- down to the length of a paperclip.  By 1979, designers and engineers at Dictaphone, a Pitney Bowes subsidiary, had produced a working model of a "picocassette" recorder.  By 1982, however, the patent status of the Lanier microcassette had changed, permitting Dictaphone to develop its own competitive micro system, which it did.  Marketing and sales departments then urged abandonment of the pico project.  But others said pico should proceed.  Both were right.  Dictaphone went ahead and introduced the pico in 1985, but it hasn't sold well.  To date, says Emil Jachmann, a Dictaphone vice president, it has "broken even or shown a small loss."  Nevertheless, the device has been successful in other ways.  It helped Dictaphone attract better engineers, and it provided new technology for other company products.  The picocassette recorder also helped transform the company's reputation from follower to leading-edge innovator.  "It gave me great pride to see the inventor of the microcassette in Japan look at the pico and shake his head and say `unbelievable,'" says Mr. Jachmann.  Dictaphone's picocassette recorder is one of 13 case studies in the TRIAD Design Project, sponsored by the Design Management Institute of Boston and Harvard Business School.  The studies are on exhibit at Harvard this month and will travel to Chicago's Institute of Design and the University of California at Berkeley.  A Rake's Progress  Means Branching Out  ONE DAY Carl Barrett of Mobile, Ala., was raking some sycamore leaves, but the rake kept riding up over the piles.  The harder he tried to push them into large piles, the closer he came to breaking the rake and straining his back.  So Mr. Barrett, then vice president of the Alabama Steamship Association, took a steel-toothed garden rake and taped it to the underside of a leaf rake about nine inches up.  His crude device worked: The lower teeth gathered the leaves into a pile, while the higher, harder teeth moved the top of the pile.  Now incorporated into a polypropylene rake, the four-inch prongs, or "wonderbars," also are supposed to aid in picking up leaves.  One customer, Donald Blaggs of Mobile, says the Barrett Rake allowed him to do his lawn in 2 1/2 hours, two hours less than usual.  But other rake makers have their doubts.  Richard Mason, president of Ames Co. in Parkersburg, W. Va., says the Barrett rake "makes sense," but it would be "tough" to explain to consumers.  John Stoner, marketing director for True Temper Corp., a subsidiary of Black & Decker, says people don't want to move a leaf pile.  "They either pick it up," he says, "or they start pulling from a fresh direction."  Odds and Ends NO MORE STUBBED toes or bruised shins, promises Geste Corp. of Goshen, Ind., the designer of a bed support to replace traditional frames.  Four tubular steel "Bedfellows," each roughly in the shape of a "W," are attached to the bottom of the box spring in a recessed position. . . .  Nearly half of U.S. consumers say they'll pay up to 5% more for packaging that can be recycled or is biodegradable, according to a survey commissioned by the Michael Peters Group, a design consultant.  The Pentagon is a haunted house.  Living there for six years was really scary.  The ghosts of the past are everywhere: They are kept at bay only by feeding them vast quantities of our defense budget.  Some can be bought off relatively cheaply.  During the Korean War, Gen. Douglas MacArthur demanded and got, in addition to his U.N. command in Korea, his own naval command in Japan, NavforJapan.  Those obsolete operations cost less than $2 billion a year, and keep Mac's ghost quiet.  That's about all it costs to appease Adm. Erich Raeder's ghost.  In 1941, Raeder and the German navy threatened to attack the Panama Canal, so we created the Southern Command in Panama.  The Southern Command has grown even bigger since the war because Raeder's ghost sometimes runs through the E ring dressed like Gen. Noriega.  The Command's huge bureaucracy is needed to analyze whether leaders of coups against Gen. Noriega meet the War Powers Act's six points, Cap Weinberger's seven points, the Intelligence Committee's 32 points and Woodrow Wilson's 14 points necessary to justify U.S. support.  So far no one has.  The ghost of the Soviet brigade discovered in Cuba back in the '70s costs just a few hundred million: the price of the Caribbean Command in Key West that President Carter created in 1980.  The brigade hasn't been heard from since, but we keep the staff around just in case.  George Marshall's ghost is much more difficult to keep happy.  We keep a lot of shrines to him around the Pentagon: statues, busts, relics and such.  The Army headquarters on the third deck of the Pentagon used to burn a lot of incense to him, but the Navy headquarters on the fourth deck made them stop it.  You see, Marshall had this thing about the Navy and the Marines -- he wanted to make them part of the Army but Secretary of the Navy James Forrestal blocked him.  Now his ghost won't let up till it's done.  To keep him quiet we invent a new unified command every year or so run by the Army or the Air Force and put more of the Navy and Marines under it.  But we still hear him moaning at night because the Navy has a few ships left, and to satisfy him the Navy's sea lift forces were given to a new Air Force bureaucracy in Illinois, its space operations to another command in Colorado, the frogmen to a new Army bureaucracy in Fort Bragg, and the Navy's Indian Ocean and Persian Gulf forces to an Army bureaucracy in Florida.  Which brings up the worst and meanest ghost of all -- the ghost of the shah of Iran.  When the shah died, President Carter was so scared that the shah's ghost would blame him for shoving him out to make way for the ayatollah that he declared the Carter Doctrine.  Mr. Carter said he would go to war to stop anyone from trying to grab Iran.  But that ghost wouldn't settle for words, he wanted money and people -- lots.  So Mr. Carter formed three new Army divisions and gave them to a new bureaucracy in Tampa called the Rapid Deployment Force.  But that ghost wasn't fooled; he knew the RDF was neither rapid nor deployable nor a force -- even though it cost $8 billion or $10 billion a year.  After Mr. Carter was defeated in 1980, the shah's ghost claimed the credit and then went after President Reagan and Cap Weinberger.  I saw what he did to them firsthand.  It made my shoelaces dance with terror.  Why, he used to lay in wait for Cap; suddenly he'd leap from behind some statue of Marshall onto Cap's chest and grab him by the throat and choke him till he coughed up an additional $2 billion or so.  Cap added four more divisions to the Army, two active and two reserve; two carrier groups to the Navy; a division -- equivalent to the Marines; and the C-5B, KC-10, C-17 and a thousand tactical aircraft to the Air Force.  He bought $4 billion in prepositioning ships and $7 billion in ammo and equipment to fill them, and parked them at a new $6 billion base at Diego Garcia in the middle of the Indian Ocean.  He dedicated all these new forces to the Persian Gulf.  One night both Marshall's ghost and the shah's ghost together caught Cap and threw him to the ground.  Before they let him go he added a thousand bureaucrats to the RDF in Tampa and renamed it Central Command.  He gave those bureaucrats charge of all naval operations in the Persian Gulf and Indian Ocean.  Marshall figured it would be good training for those soldiers -- someday maybe they would get the whole Navy.  They had fun moving the carriers around, but it turned out that they had forgotten all about mine sweepers.  But the shah still kept leaping out at Cap, so Cap bought a hundred merchant ships more and $7 billion of loading barges, ramps, etc., in order that those seven new Army divisions and three Marine brigades could unload from all those new ships and aircraft and go to war in the Zagros mountains.  Then suddenly Ike's ghost came to visit and said, "What the hell are you doing planning for a land war in Asia 12,000 miles away?  We'd get our asses kicked."  Lucky for Cap, Ike was easygoing and soon went away, while the shah -- he kept coming back.  So the U.S. found itself paying about $2 billion in baksheesh to various Arab potentates for basing rights around the Indian Ocean.  We had great success in Somalia.  But then it turned out that President Siad Barrah was not at all a nice person and the Navy pointed out that the base he promised us in Berbera had silted up about a hundred years ago and anyway was 1,244 miles from the mouth of the Gulf. (But who's counting.) Still, Berbera was the best we could get, so we stay in bed with President Barrah.  All these reports about him committing genocide are probably exaggerated anyway.  But wouldn't you know, now that we are spending jillions of dollars, and have built those new divisions and new air wings, and have positioned all these ships and supplies to fight the Russians in Iran, the Russians seem to have lost interest in the whole subject.  Meanwhile, Congress is cutting huge chunks out of the rest of the defense budget.  Predictably, some Navy guys said: "Do we still need to keep all 18 Army divisions on active duty and all those extra land-based aircraft without bases and all those Army guys playing admiral in Tampa?  Couldn't we save $20 billion or $30 billion a year by shifting that stuff to the reserves?  And why not save the costs of a thousand bureaucrats by abolishing Central Command and putting responsibility for Gulf naval operations back where it belongs, afloat with the task force commander in the Gulf?  And where were all our handsomely paid Indian Ocean allies last year when our convoys were being attacked?"  Questions like that really stir up Marshall's ghost.  He appeared late one night in the bedroom of the new defense secretary, Dick Cheney.  Marshall came clanking in like Marley's ghost dragging those chains of brigades and air wings and links with Arab despots.  He wouldn't leave until Mr. Cheney promised to do whatever the Pentagon systems analysts told him.  So next day Mr. Cheney went out and did just that: He canceled the 600-ship Navy and cut back one carrier and 20 frigates.  Then he canceled production of the Navy's most important carrier aircraft, the F-14 and the A-6.  On the other hand, Mr. Cheney retained all those new land forces.  Marshall's ghost is satisfied for now, but he'll be back.  What with Halloween coming and bigger defense cuts looming, more and more Pentagon bureaucrats are crawling under their desks.  They know that they can hold off the ghosts only a little while longer by cutting carriers and ships.  Then the whole thing will start to collapse, just as it did in the 1970s, and the ghosts and banshees will be howling through the place turning people's hair white.  Gives me the willies just thinking about it.  ---  Mr. Lehman, a Reagan Navy secretary, is a managing director of PaineWebber.  The metal and marble lobby of CenTrust Bank's headquarters is grander than your average savings and loan.  For one thing, there is an old master on the wall -- "Samuel Anointing David," a big baroque canvas painted by Mattia Preti, a 17th-century Neapolitan.  At the moment, however, the painting is a nagging reminder of the problems that have engulfed CenTrust and its flamboyant chairman and chief executive, David L. Paul.  In an international buying spree that began barely two years ago, Mr. Paul amassed a collection of about 30 pre-18th-century works, including the Preti, at a total cost of $28 million.  By midnight Oct. 6, all of the paintings were supposed to have been sold off, under orders from Florida's comptroller, whose office regulates the state's S&Ls.  CenTrust didn't meet the deadline.  The collection was at the heart of a grandiose plan Mr. Paul had in which the art was to do double duty -- as an investment for CenTrust and as decoration for the S&L's new office tower, designed by I.M. Pei.  The rub is that the $28 million was plucked from the funds of this federally insured institution even as CenTrust was losing money hand over fist.  Mr. Paul had no right to buy art for the S&L in the first place -- it isn't on the comptroller's "permissible" list -- without seeking a special dispensation, which he did not do.  Besides that, some of the paintings that were to grace the walls of CenTrust actually ended up hanging in the chairman's estate on La Gorce Isle off Miami Beach.  Last spring, the comptroller's office called a halt to Mr. Paul's fling, giving him six months to sell the paintings.  The acquisitions, officials said in a letter to Mr. Paul, were "unsafe, unsound and unauthorized."  So far, Mr. Paul has unloaded but three of his masterpieces, he won't say to whom.  The comptroller's office says it is "monitoring the situation."  Though the agency could remove Mr. Paul, it has no current intention to do that.  "It's not like selling Chevrolets," Mr. Paul says, as he takes a drag on a goldbanded St. Moritz cigarette.  "The last six months has established the quality of the collection.  There's no fire sale here."  Despite Mr. Paul's characteristic hauteur, the 50-year-old, chain-smoking dynamo is finding that getting CenTrust -- Florida's largest thrift institution -- out of its riskiest investments is much tougher than getting into them had been.  Paintings are just part of the picture.  Although Mr. Paul has pared a $1.35 billion junk-bond portfolio to less than $900 million since April, the high-yield debt market has plummeted.  Divesting itself of what is left, as is required of all thrift institutions by July 1994 under the new federal S&L bailout law, may well prove difficult.  And CenTrust has other problems.  Late last week federal regulators ordered the thrift institution to stop paying dividends on its preferred stock -- a move that suggests deep concern about an institution.  Mr. Paul has a plan to bring in $150 million by selling off 63 of CenTrust's 71 branches, but it has yet to be approved by regulators.  It is Mr. Paul's art venture, however, that has drawn the most attention from investors and regulators, not to mention galleries throughout the world.  Embittered shareholders (some of whom are suing) say the chairman and his collection epitomize the excesses of speculation that set off the national S&L crisis. (CenTrust shares have fallen sharply in price from a high of $15.125 in 1986 to close yesterday at $2.875.) Gallery directors, meanwhile, say Mr. Paul and others of his ilk have left an indelible mark on the art world -- and not for the better.  Collectors don't say "It's a van Gogh" anymore, laments Harry Brooks, the president of Wildenstein & Co., a New York gallery.  "They say, `Johnny Payson got $53 million for his, so certainly $10 million isn't too much for mine.' The great collectors we depended on, such as Paul Mellon or Norton Simon, have stopped buying, and the new buyers are brilliant men who made money in the stock market or in takeovers and rushed into collecting. . . ."  Mr. Payson, an art dealer and collector, sold Vincent van Gogh's "Irises" at a Sotheby's auction in November 1987 to Australian businessman Alan Bond. (Trouble is, Mr. Bond has yet to pay up, and until he does, Sotheby's has the painting under lock and key.)  When Mr. Paul moved in on the art market, he let it be known that virtually no piece was too costly to be considered by CenTrust.  He established his reputation as a freespender in January last year at Sotheby's auction of the Linda and Gerald Guterman collection in New York.  There, on one of his first shopping trips, Mr. Paul picked up several paintings at stunning prices.  He paid $2.2 million, for instance, for a still life by Jan Jansz. den Uyl that was expected to fetch perhaps $700,000.  The price paid was a record for the artist. (Some 64% of items offered at the Guterman auction were sold, at an average price of $343,333.  The rest were withdrawn for lack of acceptable bids.) Afterward, Mr. Paul is said by Mr. Guterman to have phoned Mr. Guterman, the New York developer selling the collection, and gloated.  "He says he `stole them,'" recalls Mr. Guterman.  "And he tells me, `If you want to see your paintings, you'll have to come to my house in Florida.'" Mr. Paul denies phoning and gloating.  "It's just not true," he says.  Mr. Paul quickly became more aggressive in his collecting, with the help of George Wachter, a Sotheby's expert in old masters whom he met at an exhibition of the Guterman items.  Mr. Wachter, who became his principal adviser, searched galleries in London, Paris and Monaco.  And, according to one dealer, Mr. Wachter had a penchant for introducing Mr. Paul with the phrase: "He can buy anything."  Nicholas Hall, the president of the Colnaghi U.S.A. Ltd. gallery in New York, sold Mr. Paul "Abraham and Sarah in the Wilderness" by Giovanni Battista Tiepolo.  Mr. Hall says Mr. Paul "was known to spend a lot of money.  People were interested in seeing him, but it was recognized that the route was through Sotheby's and particularly George Wachter."  Mr. Paul thus developed a close, symbiotic relationship with Sotheby's.  Mr. Paul was eager to assemble a collection for the headquarters CenTrust has been moving into for the greater part of a year.  Sotheby's, the auction house founded in London 1744 and now under the umbrella of Sotheby's Holdings Inc., was hoping to stir up interest in old masters as it strove to build its U.S. business.  European dealers continued to dominate the action in old masters, which Sotheby's North America had lately been touting in this country.  For several months, there was optimism all around.  Last October, Mr. Paul paid out $12 million of CenTrust's cash -- plus a $1.2 million commission -- for "Portrait of a Man as Mars."  The painting, attributed to Flemish artist Peter Paul Rubens, was purchased privately through Sotheby's, not at auction.  In March 1989, just 15 months into his campaign, Mr. Paul was named by Art & Antiques magazine as one of the top 100 individual collectors in the U.S.  "An unknown quantity to most of the art world, Paul is no stranger to lavish spending," the magazine said, noting that he doesn't stop at paint on canvas but also spends big on art you can eat.  "He recently bid $30,000 at a Paris charity auction for a dinner cooked by six of the world's great chefs, but the final party cost closer to $100,000." (Mr.  Paul says it wasn't that high.)  The art collection might have come to rival the Medicis' had the Florida comptroller's office not got wind of Mr. Paul's aesthetic adventure.  In its letter to him, dated March 2 and shared with reporters, Alex Hager, the chief of the thrift-institution bureau in the comptroller's office, expressed puzzlement that the S&L could be so profligate when it had reported losses of more than $13 million in its two preceding quarters.  The state gave CenTrust 30 days to sell the Rubens.  The comptroller's office eventually extended the deadline to six months but broadened its demands, ordering that the "book value of the collection {be} reduced to zero."  In other words: Get rid of all the pictures.  The state obliquely noted that unsafe banking practices are grounds for removing an officer or director and closed with the admonition to Mr. Paul: "Govern yourself accordingly."  The state agency was particularly vexed to learn that the Rubens and a half-dozen other paintings listed among the bank's "furniture and fixtures," were actually hanging in the chairman's house.  Mr. Paul says that at one point he did indeed have eight or nine of the paintings at home and that the rest were in storage at Sotheby's.  He explains that he was "merely storing the paintings at home -- with some display -- because of the special dehumidified environment" required for their safekeeping, until CenTrust's new building was ready for them.  Still, the incident was embarrassing.  It came on the heels of a number of local newspaper articles suggesting that Mr. Paul has benefited handsomely from his association with CenTrust.  For instance, he got a $3 million loan from the S&L, negotiated at a below-market rate.  He owns 43% of CenTrust's shares.  Adding to Mr. Paul's problems, dealers (some with vested interests) insist that he, relying rather too heavily on Sotheby's advice, paid much too much for several pieces in the CenTrust collection.  The $12 million lavished on the Rubens, for example, was a record price for the artist and maybe twice its value, given a dispute among scholars about its provenance.  David Tunick, the president of David Tunick Inc., a New York gallery, says scholars question the authenticity of the Rubens.  It may have been painted instead by a Rubens associate.  "The feeling among many experts on the commercial side is that the price paid at the time was excessive in any event," Mr. Tunick says.  "It sounds like with the Rubens he got absolutely taken to the cleaners."  Victor Wiener, the executive director of the Appraisers Association of America, agrees that Mr. Paul paid very dearly for the Rubens and adds that getting rid of it any time soon for a similar sum would be quite a feat.  "It's not beyond credibility the Rubens will someday be worth $12 million, but whether it could be sold for that amount tomorrow remains to be seen."  Still, predicting is tricky.  "I'm forever dumbfounded by what I see making these high prices."  Jonathan H. Kress, the son of the painting's former owner, Mrs. Rush Kress, dismisses the price talk as "sour grapes."  Dealers contemptuous of the purchase price, he says, were themselves interested in buying the Rubens but lost out.  Mr. Paul, for his part, defends the Rubens price, saying a lot of the experts have never seen the thing itself.  "Most of them weren't even born the last time the painting was displayed publicly," he says.  Art prices are skyrocketing, but a good deal of legerdemain is involved in compiling statistics on sales.  Salomon Brothers Inc., the investment-banking firm, in its annual tally of investment returns, reported that old masters appreciated 51% in the year ended June 1, the greatest return of any of 13 assets it tracked. (Impressionist and modern paintings, not tracked by Salomon, are ranked even higher at 74% by Sotheby's.)  Salomon, moreover, gets its data on art appreciation from Sotheby's, whose prices go up with clients like Mr. Paul in its thrall.  The percentages omit from consideration the many paintings that go begging at auction.  Art indexes track winners, not losers.  But art that has fallen sharply in value is rarely put up for sale.  Also, at any of Sotheby's auctions of old masters, roughly one-third to one-fifth of what is offered doesn't sell at any price.  It's not that there aren't any bids, but the bids don't meet the minimum "reserve" prices set by the sellers.  In January, the Preti painting that now hangs at CenTrust was expected to bring no more than $700,000 at auction until Mr. Paul came along with his $1.15 million.  Mr. Hall of the Colnaghi gallery says $1.15 million "would have been an impossible price for anyone to ask for a Preti four years ago."  But from his vantage point, it isn't that Mr. Paul, a customer of his too, overpaid for the work, "a gargantuan painting by an artist who is not a household word." (The painting is 10 feet wide, seven feet high.) Rather, "It just shows things have changed."  Mr. Paul boasts that he spotted bargains in old masters just before they took an upward turn.  "They went up 51% last year, and they'll do it again this year," he declares.  "They were a sleeper.  Everybody was out buying Monets."  Sotheby's vice president Diana Levitt says the auction house has been "assisting" Mr. Paul in selling the paintings.  And while Sotheby's chief rivals in the art world, private art dealers, "won't be happy to hear it," she adds, "a number of {the artworks} have already been sold, and at a substantial profit."  Mr. Paul claims to have sold three paintings, at more than a 10% profit.  That isn't 51%, and the claim isn't documented.  He furthermore denies that he relied too heavily on Sotheby's or Mr. Wachter.  Mr. Paul says he had not one but four advisers and that he never bid impulsively.  After all, he had the counsel of "curators from the most reputable museums in the world."  He says he expects to sell the collection -- including the controversial Rubens -- "carefully and prudently, just as it was put together."  But in art-world parlance, Mr. Paul's holdings are "burnt."  That is, he is being compelled to put them on the market too soon, and has already gotten offers that are less than he paid for some of the art works.  "After a few years, you can argue there has been natural appreciation," says Susan Theran, the publisher of Leonard's Annual Price Index of Art Auctions.  But quick turnover in artwork is "like pawning your jewelry -- you end up with 50%.  People hold out and try to get a bargain."  Sotheby's defends itself and Mr. Paul in the matter.  Mr. Wachter says Mr. Paul was a quick study who worked intensely and bought the best pictures available at the moment.  "On occasion, he paid a high price," Mr. Wachter concedes, but he says those who bid less and dropped out were dealers who would then have marked up the paintings to resell them at a profit to collectors.  Naomi Bernhard Levinson, a fine-arts appraiser at Bernhard Associates in San Francisco, considers it "definite conflict of interest for an auction house to both advise a client on purchases and to set price estimates on the paintings to be purchased."  Sotheby's, she says, is "wearing both hats."  "I can't see why there would be a conflict of interest," says Sotheby's Ms. Levitt.  "Estimates are based on the previous price of similar works sold at auction and current market conditions, and are not affected by any knowledge of who the potential buyer could be."  Frequently, clients express interest in paintings but don't end up bidding, she adds, "so we don't know who the potential buyer will be."  Mr. Paul, in selling off his paintings, is seeking at least a 15% return on the bank's investment, so as to prove that the venture was sound.  Mr. Paul says that he has feelers out over much of the globe and that potential buyers from as far away as Japan and Italy have examined the collection.  Because of the pressure on CenTrust to sell, dealers and collectors have been trying to get the paintings at bargain-basement prices.  But so far, Mr. Paul and his advisers are holding fast.  One dealer, Martin Zimet of French & Co. in New York, says he "would have loved to buy" a Jan Davids de Heem painting from the bank.  "I tried to steal the picture -- to buy it attractively -- and {Sotheby's} wouldn't do it.  They were protecting his interests."  Meanwhile, Mr. Paul and CenTrust executives are getting squeamish about opulence.  Mr. Paul has been characterized as "the Great Gatsby or something," complains Karen E. Brinkman, an executive vice president of CenTrust.  The media, she says, have distorted his personal life.  Mr. Paul nods in agreement.  "I don't think I have a life style that is, frankly, so flamboyant," he says.  But at just that moment, he is interrupted in his office by a servant in tuxedo who pours coffee from silver into a cup of china and dabs the brim with linen.  Mr. Paul says, yes, the ceiling in his executive suite is gold-leaf inlay.  The offices are done in hardwood and oriental rugs, leatherbound books and, of course, a $12 million Rubens.  But he implores that the splendor be played down.  "Don't say it's a gold ceiling.  Just say the offices are tastefully appointed," he says.  "Otherwise, the regulators will take it for decadence, and nowadays everything's got to be pristine."  ---  @ CenTrust Now  @ And in the Future?  @Assets  @ Sept. 30 ................................ $8.98 billion  @ After proposed branch sale .............. $6.7 billion  @Tangible net worth  @ Sept. 30 ................................ -$42 million  @ After proposed branch sale .............. +$90 million  @Branches  @ Currently ............................... 71  @ After proposed branch sale .............. 8  @Earnings  @ Third quarter ended June 30 (net loss) .. ($5 million)  @ Nine months (net loss) .................. ($21.3 million)  ---  @ Results of Sotheby's Old Master Paintings Auctions  @ # of Average Average  @ Lots Percent Price Per Price  @ Offered # Sold Unsold Sold Lot All Lots*  @January 1987 156 117 25% $78,662 $58,997  @January 1988 169 112 34% $92,854 $61,536  @January 1989 190 132 33% $107,233 $74,498  @NOTE: A lot is one, two or more related artworks auctioned together  @*Both sold and unsold  @Source: Sotheby's Holdings Inc.  ---  @ Which Assets Have Performed Best?  @Rates of investment return through June 1, 1989, ranked by the latest 12-month return.  @Type of Asset 1 Year 5 Years 10 Years 20 Years  @Impressionist Paintings 74% 33% 23% N.A.  @Old Masters 51 18 10 11%  @Chinese Ceramics 40 12 9 13  @Coins 30 15 13 17  @Stocks 25 20 17 10  @Diamonds 16 11 8 10  @Bonds 11 18 11 9  @Treasury Bills 8 7 10 9  @Housing 7 5 6 8  @U.S.  Farmland 6 - 5 0 6  @Oil 3 -11 1 8  @Foreign Exchange -13 7 1 4  @Gold -20 - 2 3 12  @Silver -23 -11 - 5 6  @Consumer Price Index 5% 4% 6% 6%  @NOTE: Compound annual rates, rounded to nearest whole number.  Figures don't include taxes or transaction costs.  @Sources: Salomon Brothers Inc.; Sotheby's Holdings Inc.  Companies listed below reported quarterly profit substantially different from the average of analysts' estimates.  The companies are followed by at least three analysts, and had a minimum five-cent change in actual earnings per share.  Estimated and actual results involving losses are omitted.  The percent difference compares actual profit with the 30-day estimate where at least three analysts have issues forecasts in the past 30 days.  Otherwise, actual profit is compared with the 300-day estimate.  @ ESTIMATE  @ (# of analysts)  @ ACTUAL --------------- %  @ COMPANY NAME EPS 30-DAY 300-DAY DIFF.  @ POSITIVE  @ NCNB Corp. $1.45 $1.17 (3) $1.16 (14) 23.93  @ PaineWebber Group .41 ... .27 (6) 51.85  @ Genl Publ Util 1.87 ... 1.61 (6) 16.15  @ Touchmark Corp. 1.02 ... .93 (8) 9.68  @ Loctite Corp .80 ... .76 (9) 5.26  @ NEGATIVE  @ Intl Bus Mach $1.51 $1.81 (5) $1.71 (8) 16.57  @ Genetics Instit (.33) ... (.22)(8) 50.00  @ IBP Inc. .25 ... .45 (3) 44.44  @ Washington Water .20 ... .33 (3) 39.39  @ Kansas Gas & El .94 ... 1.28 (4) 26.56  @ Square D Co. 1.27 ... 1.42 (8) 10.56  @ Pentair Inc. .64 ... .71 (3) 9.86  @ Alcan Alum Ltd. .77 ... .85 (9) 9.41  @ Reynolds Metals 2.10 ... 2.30 (10) 8.70  @ Burr-Brown Corp. .21 ... .23 (3) 8.70  @ So Carolina Natl .67 ... .72 (3) 6.94  @ Engraph Inc. .15 ... .16 (3) 6.25  Source: Zacks Investment Research  {During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.}  CREATIVE ACCOUNTING, mostly by conglomerates, forced CPAs to change their way of setting standards to be followed by corporations reporting financial results, standards that had become all too flexible.  The new Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) was created in 1972 to replace the Accounting Principles Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.  All of the former board's members were CPAs, provoking conflict-of-interest criticism because they were writing rules while handling clients' books at the same time.  The new board's seven-member structure kept four CPAs, but the others were from industry and academia.  Francis M. Wheat, a former Securities and Exchange Commission member, headed the panel that had studied the issues for a year and proposed the FASB on March 30, 1972.  The former board had produced "21 opinions and 1,000 critics" in its 12-year life, its chairman had conceded.  The climate was right for the new FASB.  In the late 1960s some CPAs failed to correct such abuses as clients picking permissive rules that hyped earnings and stock prices.  And in November 1970 Congress had passed a special act to overrule one board rule.  Also, James Needham, an SEC commissioner, in April 1972 had warned that the industry might face a "federal agency writing accounting rules" if they rejected the FASB idea.  Keepers of the books, dubbed "figure filberts," loathed the threat.  The FASB had its initial meeting on March 28, 1973.  On Dec. 13, 1973, it issued its first rule; it required companies to disclose foreign currency translations in U.S. dollars.  The FASB since then has issued 102 rules, and some still rile industry.  Since late 1987, for example, it has put off a rule dealing with deferred income taxes because of the continuing controversy over the issue.  Amcast Industrial Corp. said it plans to repurchase 500,000 shares, or about 7% of its shares outstanding, in open market transactions.  The metal products concern currently has 7.2 million common shares outstanding.  Amcast previously had said it planned to repurchase shares, but didn't disclose when or how many shares it intended to buy back.  The company named Dillon Read & Co. as its exclusive agent for the stock buy-back program.  A seat on the Chicago Board of Trade was sold for $390,000, down $5,000 from the previous sale last Tuesday.  Seats currently are quoted at $353,500 bid, $405,000 asked.  The record price for a full membership on the exchange is $550,000, set Aug. 31, 1987.  An associate member seat was sold for $228,000, up $8,000 from the previous sale Oct. 4.  Associate member seats currently are quoted at $225,000 bid, $256,000 asked.  The record price for associate membership is $275,000, set Aug. 30, 1988.  CAE Industries Ltd. said its Link Flight Simulation division was awarded a contract by the U.S. Army for two helicopter simulators, which the company valued at as much as 37 million Canadian dollars (US$31.5 million).  CAE said the fixed price for the first of the AH-64 Apache combat mission simulators is C$19 million.  It is scheduled for delivery in late 1991.  The price of the second simulator ranges between C$16.4 million and C$18 million, CAE said, depending on when the Army exercises its option.  CAE is a Toronto-based maker of commercial and military aircraft simulators and training equipment.  Helionetics Inc. said it agreed to team with a unit of Minneapolis-based Honeywell Inc. to provide power amplifiers for a new military sonar system being proposed by Honeywell.  Total value of the contract could be $100 million, Helionetics said, and work on the project would be about evenly divided.  As previously reported, Helionetics emerged from Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law protection in February.  This Los Angeles company and its Union Federal Savings Bank subsidiary said more than 99% of their 7 1/4% convertible subordinated debentures due 2011 were tendered for conversion into UnionFed common stock.  The conversion increased total equity capital by about $38.5 million to a total of $156.8 million.  Union Federal, a federally insured savings bank, has $2.4 billion in assets.  David D. Lung was appointed president and chief operating officer of this maker of building materials for manufactured homes and recreational vehicles.  As president, Mr. Lung, 42 years old, succeeds his father, Mervin D. Lung, 66, who founded the company in 1959.  Mervin Lung remains chairman and chief executive officer.  David Lung has been with Patrick since 1970, and has served as vice president for administration and purchasing since 1987.  General Dynamics Services Co., a unit of General Dynamics Corp., won a $48.2 million Army contract to establish maintenance facilities for tracked vehicles in Pakistan.  Grumman Corp. was given a $15 million Navy contract for aircraft-electronics improvements.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a unit of General Motors Corp., got a $10.3 million Air Force contract for airborne-radar equipment.  Reynolds Metals Co. said third-quarter net income dropped nearly 10% to $123.7 million, or $2.10 a share, from $137.2 million, or $2.56 a share, a year earlier.  The latest earnings reflect an increase of about 5.5 million in common shares outstanding.  Revenue rose 3% to $1.52 billion from $1.48 billion.  Reynolds is the third big aluminum company since Friday to report disappointing earnings.  The No. 1 domestic aluminum producer, Aluminum Co. of America, Friday said its earnings fell 3.2% to $219 million, or $2.46 a share.  And Alcan Aluminium Ltd. yesterday reported net income slid 30% to $180 million, or 77 cents a share, from $258 million, or $1.07 a share.  Analysts on average had been expecting about $2.70 for Alcoa and $1 for Alcan.  "It's a good indication that level of profitability has peaked for the industry," says Vahid Fathi, metals analyst with Prescott, Ball & Turben Inc., who had estimated Reynolds would earn about $2.35 a share.  The nation's No. 2 aluminum company said earnings were hurt by lower prices for certain fabricated aluminum products, which typically follow price fluctuations of primary ingots.  The base metal price has dropped 30.3% from a year earlier to 78 cents a pound.  Much of the price decline has been blamed on a slowing economy and the third quarter is typically the industry's slowest period.  But William O. Bourke, chairman and chief executive officer, said the ingot price "appears to have bottomed out."  He said shipments are continuing at a "healthy" pace and the company has no excess inventory.  Aluminum shipments of 329,600 metric tons were nearly equal to the year-earlier period, the company said.  Nevertheless, the company said that in the latest quarter there were increased material and labor costs, including a new employee profit-sharing plan.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Reynolds closed at $55.375, up $1.25.  No strikeout, but certainly no home run.  That's how the stock-picking game is shaping up for the months ahead, according to money managers and a few brokers.  Yesterday's 88-point recovery from Friday's megadrop in the Dow Jones industrials had many brokerage houses proclaiming that stocks are a good bargain again.  But quite a few money managers aren't buying it.  Weakening corporate earnings, they say, are no prescription for a bull market.  "The stock market ain't going to do much of anything" for a while, says John Neff of Wellington Management, who runs the $8.3 billion Windsor Fund.  He suspects that Friday's market decline may have a second leg, perhaps a 10% to 15% drop later on.  Mr. Neff says the stock market has lost some powerful driving forces, namely earnings growth and the "LBO sweepstakes" -- buy-out fever that induced investors to bid up whole groups of stocks, such as media and airlines.  After sitting with 20% of his fund in cash before Friday's sell-off, Mr. Neff says he bought "a narrow list of stocks" yesterday.  With flat corporate profits on the horizon for 1990, money managers say price-earnings multiples that look cheap today might go on being cheap for a long time.  "This is not a grossly overvalued market, but it's not cheap either," says George Collins, president of the mutual fund company T. Rowe Price Associates in Baltimore.  According to Institutional Brokers Estimate System, Wall Street market strategists see only a 2.4% jump in company profits in 1990 -- unlike in 1987, when profits a year out looked good (they did soar 36% in 1988).  Bulls say the market is an incredible bargain, priced at only about 12 times estimated 1989 earnings for stocks in the Standard & Poor's 500 index.  Before the 1987 crash, the P/E was more than 20.  The common view, says Abby Cohen, strategist for Drexel Burnham Lambert, is that there will be "mild economic growth, modest profit expansion, and things are going to be hunky-dory.  Our view is that we may see a profit decline."  Some think investors should sell into rallies.  The market "is going to wind down," says Gerald W. Perritt, a Chicago money manager.  "Things are a little less overpriced" after Friday's jolt in the market.  He expects stocks to decline an additional 5% to 30%, with the Dow perhaps bottoming out between 2000 and 2100 "between now and June."  After Friday's decline, Mr. Perritt's firm ran statistical tests on 100 high-quality stocks, using old-fashioned value criteria devised by Benjamin Graham, an analyst and author in the 1930s and 1940s who is widely considered to be the father of modern securities analysis.  He found 85 still overvalued and 15 fairly valued.  Nicholas Parks, a New York money manager, expects the market to decline about 15%.  "I've been two-thirds in cash since July, and I continue to think that having a defensive position is appropriate," he says.  Companies that piled on debt in leveraged buy-outs during the past two years "will continue to surface as business problems."  "Generalizations about value aren't useful," says New York money manager John LeFrere of Delta Capital Management.  For instance, he says, International Business Machines and Unisys might look cheap, but investors might continue to do better with stocks like Walt Disney, Procter & Gamble and Coca-Cola, strong performers in recent years.  Money manager Robert Ross, head of Duncan Ross Associates Ltd. in Vancouver, British Columbia, says stocks would have to fall 15% to 20% before they are competitive with less risky investment alternatives.  Fredric Russell, a money manager in Tulsa, Okla., says Friday's cave-in "is going to have more of a permanent impact on the psyche of many investors than Wall Street would want to admit."  There are still bulls out there.  "I still think we will have a 3000 Dow, whether it's six months or 12 months from now I don't know," says David Dreman, managing partner of Dreman Value Management in New York.  "We're doing a little buying" in some stocks "that have really been smashed down."  Many brokerage house officials also are optimistic.  Yesterday, Goldman Sachs, Merrill Lynch and Dean Witter all increased the proportion of assets they recommend investors commit to stocks.  Dean Witter now recommends 85%, Goldman 65% and Merrill Lynch 50%.  Some investors say Friday's sell-off was a good thing, because it deflated a lot of crazy takeover speculation.  "It was a healthy cleansing," says Michael Holland, who runs Salomon Brothers Asset Management in New York.  From here out, these investors see a return to old-fashioned investing, based on a company's ability to show profit growth.  "The fundamentals are pretty strong," Mr. Dreman says.  "I don't see this as a bear market at all.  It's a recognition that there was much too much fluff in the LBO market."  Friday's big fall was "just a blunder by the stock market," says John Connolly, chief strategist for Dean Witter.  "It was an overreaction to an event {the failure of a management and union group to get bank financing for a takeover of UAL} that doesn't mean that much to lots of stocks."  Many investors have nagging worries, however.  Newspapers are full of headlines about companies defaulting on their debts and banks writing off real estate loans.  That hurts investors' confidence in the economy and stocks.  Not even all the brokerage firms see clear sailing ahead.  "Disappointing profits are likely to get worse in the next two quarters," says Mary Farrell, a market strategist at PaineWebber.  She thinks the market could drop about 10% in the next few months, then recover and go higher.  Companies with steady earnings growth could do well, she says, while others with high debt or poor earnings could see their shares decline far more than 10%.  The turmoil on Wall Street may benefit some retailers attempting to lead leveraged buy-outs of their specialty and department-store chains, investment bankers and retailers said.  Managers at five chains have said in recent weeks that they intend to bid for their companies.  The chains include Bloomingdale's, owned by Campeau Corp., Toronto; Saks Fifth Avenue and Marshall Field's, owned by B.A.T Industries PLC, London; and B. Altman & Co. and Sakowitz Inc., owned by Hooker Corp., which is now being managed by a court-appointed provisional liquidator.  Hooker is based in Sydney, Australia.  The combination of so many chains available for sale, the recent failures of such retailing LBO's as Miller & Rhoads Inc. and declining investor confidence will drive down prices, retailing observers said.  "The pricing will become more realistic, which should help management," said Bruce Rosenthal, a New York investment banker with Nathan S. Jonas & Co. "Investors aren't going to be throwing money at any of the proposed LBOs, but doing deals on the basis of ridiculous assumptions never made sense, either."  Earlier this year, bankers and other investors were willing to provide financing because they assumed there would be major gains in both profitability and sales, Mr. Rosenthal added.  Those days are over now, he believes.  "Competition from third parties who have cash and are prepared to buy has always existed and will continue," added Mr. Rosenthal.  "But when prices were crazy, it was even harder to do an LBO. Bankers believed in the greater-fool theory that says somebody else is always willing to pay more.  This is no longer true today."  At Saks Fifth Avenue, Paul Leblang, senior vice president, marketing, agreed that lower prices will help his management team in their proposed LBO.  "Having to take on less debt would certainly be an advantage," said Mr. Leblang.  "It would also help us in our search for equity partners.  To make an LBO work, now we are going to need more than just junk bonds."  None believe the proposed management LBOs will be easy to complete, especially at B. Altman & Co., which is under Chapter 11 bankruptcy protection.  Not only could the Wall Street gyrations damp Christmas sales if consumers lose confidence in the economy, but potential junk-bond buyers are sure to demand even stronger covenants and greater management equity participation.  Further, many institutions today holding troubled retailers' debt securities will be reticent to consider additional retailing investments.  "It's called bad money driving out good money," said one retailing observer.  "Institutions that usually buy retail paper have to be more concerned."  However, the lower prices these retail chains are now expected to bring should make it easier for managers to raise the necessary capital and pay back the resulting debt.  In addition, the fall selling season has generally been a good one, especially for those retailers dependent on apparel sales for the majority of their revenues.  "What's encouraging about this is that retail chains will be sold on the basis of their sales and earnings, not liquidation values," said Joseph E. Brooks, chairman and chief executive officer of Ann Taylor Inc., a specialty chain.  "Retailers who had good track records of producing profits will have a better chance to buy back their companies."  Still, most retailing observers expect that all the proposed retailing LBOs will depend partly on the sale of junk bonds, a market already in tumult, in part because of concerns associated with bonds issued by the Federated and Allied units of Campeau.  "Prices for retail chains are lower today than they were last week, which will help management," said Gilbert Harrison, chairman of Financo Inc., an investment-banking firm specializing in retailing acquisitions.  "But the hurdle of financing still has to be resolved.  Potential bondholders will either look for greater equity participation on behalf of management, or insist the equity component of the deals be substantially greater than in the past."  Sony Corp. won a pretrial order blocking U.S. sales of Justin Products Inc.'s "My Own" line of portable audio players for children.  Judge John E. Sprizzo issued the order in Manhattan federal court, where Sony has accused the tiny company of illegally knocking off the "My First Sony" line.  The judge held that the combination of colors used for the Sony products is distinctive and subject to protection under New York state law, rather than federal law.  The legal fight was the subject of a Wall Street Journal story yesterday.  Justin's attorney, Charles E. Baxley, said Justin would ask an appeals court to set aside the order temporarily, pending an expedited appeal.  He also repeated Justin's denial of Sony's charges.  "Their likelihood of reversing us is very slim," said Lewis H. Eslinger, Sony's attorney, who said he doubts Justin will go ahead with a trial.  CONTINENTAL MORTGAGE & EQUITY TRUST said it will resume dividend payments with a 10-cent-a-share payout on Nov. 6 to shares of record Oct. 25.  The Dallas real estate investment trust last paid a dividend on Dec. 31, 1987, when shareholders received $1 a share.  Despite continuing troubles with problem assets and nonperforming loans, the trust said it expects to be able to maintain or increase the rate of distributions because of operations of joint-venture properties.  A federal appeals court struck down a natural-gas regulation that had prevented pipeline companies from passing to customers part of $1 billion in costs from controversial "take-or-pay" contracts.  The court, in a 3-0 ruling, threw out a deadline set by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission for settling old contract disputes over gas that the pipeline companies reserved but didn't use.  FERC's regulation had given pipelines until March 31, 1989, to pass on to customers as much as 50% of the costs of buying out their broken contracts, which were made with producers when gas prices were high and supplies short.  A majority of old contracts were renegotiated by the deadline and settled at steep discounts.  But pipeline companies estimate they still face $2.4 billion in liabilities from unresolved disputes, including $1 billion they fear they won't be able to pass on to customers.  According to industry lawyers, the ruling gives pipeline companies an important second chance to resolve remaining disputes and take advantage of the cost-sharing mechanism.  The court left open whether FERC could reimpose a new deadline later.  The court, agreeing with pipeline companies, found the March 31 deadline was "arbitrary and capricious" and "highly prejudicial to the bargaining power of pipelines" that were forced to negotiate settlement of the old take-or-pay contracts to meet the deadline.  A report last month by the Interstate Natural Gas Association of America found that pipelines' settlement costs had jumped in the three months before the deadline to 39 cents on the dollar, from 22 cents on the dollar in 1988.  The court ordered FERC to justify within 60 days not only its cost-sharing deadline, but other major elements of its proposed regulation for introducing more competition into natural-gas transportation.  The court also questioned a crediting mechanism that could be used to resolve take-or-pay liabilities.  The complex regulation, known in the industry as Order 500, has been hotly contested by all sides, including natural-gas producers, pipelines, local distribution companies and consumers.  The court's decision would allow FERC to change some of its provisions, but ensures it will be reviewed again quickly by the court.  MEDUSA Corp. said it voluntarily prepaid $7 million on its original $75 million term loan, bringing the total debt reduction for the year to $18 million.  After the payment, the Cleveland company owes $57 million on the loan.  The cement producer said the payment was made from excess cash flow.  NATIONAL INCOME REALTY TRUST said it will resume dividend payments with a 12-cent-a-share dividend to be paid Nov. 6 to shares of record Oct. 25.  The mortgage and equity real estate investment trust last paid a dividend on Aug. 1, 1988, when holders received 75 cents a share.  Despite continuing troubles with problem properties and nonperforming loans, the Dallas trust said it has rebuilt reserves, abandoned properties with little potential and experienced improved operating results from joint ventures.  MLX Corp. said it reached a preliminary agreement with senior lenders to its refrigeration and air-conditioning group to restructure the $188.5 million of credit facilities the lenders provide to the group.  MLX, which also makes aircraft and heavy-duty truck parts, said the debt was accumulated during its acquisition of nine businesses that make up the group, the biggest portion of which was related to the 1986 purchase of a Hillman Co. unit.  Among other things, the restructured facilities will substantially reduce the group's required amortization of the term loan portion of the credit facilities through September 1992, MLX said.  Certain details of the restructured facilities remain to be negotiated.  The agreement is subject to completion of a definitive amendment and appropriate approvals.  William P. Panny, MLX chairman and chief executive, said the pact "will provide MLX with the additional time and flexibility necessary to complete the restructuring of the company's capital structure."  MLX has filed a registration statement with the Securities and Exchange Commission covering a proposed offering of $120 million in long-term senior subordinated notes and warrants.  Dow Jones & Co. said it acquired a 15% interest in DataTimes Corp., a subsidiary of Oklahoma Publishing Co., Oklahoma City, that provides electronic research services.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Customers of either DataTimes or Dow Jones News/Retrieval are able to access the information on both services.  Dow Jones is the publisher of The Wall Street Journal.  Flowers Industries Inc. said it will report a charge of eight cents to 10 cents a share for its fiscal first quarter, ended Sept. 23, from the sale of two bakeries, in High Point, N.C., and Gadsden, Ala.  The convenience-food company said it sold the bakeries to Mills Family Bakery for an undisclosed amount.  It said the sales were part of a 1983 Federal Trade Commission Consent Order.  A year earlier, Flowers had fiscal first-quarter net income of $8 million, or 23 cents a share, on revenue of $170.4 million.  Raw-steel production by the nation's mills decreased 0.8% last week to 1,828,000 tons from 1,843,000 tons the previous week, the American Iron and Steel Institute said.  Last week's output rose 1.4% from the 1,802,000 tons produced a year earlier.  The industry used 82.2% of its capability last week, compared with 82.8% the previous week and 84% a year ago.  ---  @ The American Iron and Steel Institute reported:  @ Net tons Capability  @ produced utilization  @ Week to Oct. 14 .............. 1,828,000 82.2%  @ Week to Oct. 7 ............... 1,843,000 82.8%  @ Year to date ................. 78,168,000 85.8%  @ Year earlier to date ......... 78,744,000 89.4%  The capability utilization rate is a calculation designed to indicate at what percent of its production capability the industry is operating in a given week.  Selwyn B. Kossuth was named executive director of the commission, effective early November.  Mr. Kossuth, 52 years old, succeeds Ermanno Pascutto, 36, who resigned to join Hong Kong's Securities and Futures Commission.  Mr. Kossuth was vice president and director, corporate finance, of Nesbitt Thomson Deacon Inc., a Toronto investment dealer.  Dun & Bradstreet Corp.'s Market Data Retrieval unit said it acquired School and College Construction Reports service from Intelligence for Education Inc. Terms weren't disclosed.  The service supplies weekly reports on school and college construction plans.  Market Data Retrieval is a compiler of educational information and provides related services.  Closely held Intelligence in Education, of Larchmont, N.Y., is an educational publisher and consultant.  VENETIAN CONTROVERSY  A battle is raging in Venice over plans to have the 1,200-year-old Italian city be the site for a universal exposition in 2000.  The plans include a subway system, a congress center, floating trees, fanciful fountains -- and as many as 60,000 additional tourists a day.  Expo enthusiasts argue that holding the fair would attract businesses, create jobs and help renovate abandoned sections of town.  But opponents fear overcrowding.  "This city already has too many tourists, and it can't hold them all," says Pierluigi Beggiato, the president of the Venice hoteliers association.  About 40 Italian businesses, including Fiat S.p.A. and Ing.  C. Olivetti & Co., have formed a consortium to lobby for holding the expo in Venice.  POLAND'S CASINOS  Three gambling casinos have opened in Poland.  The three establishments -- two in Warsaw and one in Krakow -- accept only foreign currency and are joint ventures between Polish firms and Western companies.  Not all Poles are pleased.  "What do we want casinos for when we haven't got anything in the shops?" one housewife asked.  But Bogdan Gumkowski, who runs the casino at Warsaw's Marriott Hotel, said the ventures would help Poland service its $39 billion foreign debt by pouring dollars into the state firms in the joint ventures -- the LOT airline and Orbis tourist organization.  ALGERIAN GAS SALES  Algeria plans to increase natural-gas sales to Europe and the U.S. According to the Middle East Economic Survey, the North African nation is holding talks with Italy for adding a fourth pipe to a section of the Trans-Mediterranean pipeline, expanding capacity by up to six billion cubic meters a year from 12.5 billion.  Algeria also wants to build a pipeline through Morocco and across the Strait of Gibraltar to supply Spain, France and West Germany with up to 15 billion cubic meters a year by the late 1990s.  DIAMOND STRIKE SUSPENDED  South Africa's National Union of Mineworkers agreed to suspend the strike by diamond workers and resume negotiations with De Beers Consolidated Mines Ltd. over their wage dispute, De Beers said.  It also said the union had agreed to meet the company for further talks tomorrow.  The strike at five De Beers mines began last Thursday, with 9,500 out of a total 10,000 NUM members employed on De Beers mines participating, according to the union, while De Beers said there were 7,800 participants.  The union has demanded a 37.6% increase in the minimum wage while De Beers's final offer was an increase of 17%.  COMBATING POLLUTION  A 35-nation environmental conference opened in Sofia, Bulgaria.  The gathering is expected to focus on curbing the fouling of rivers and lakes, limiting damage from industrial accidents and improving the handling of harmful chemicals.  West German Environment Minister Klaus Toepfer said Bonn is convinced of the need for cooperation, "especially with our neighbors in the East, because we are directly affected by their ecological progress or lack of it."  The U.S. and Canada joined every European country except Albania at the meeting.  ESTONIAN BUSINESS  The Swedish publishers of a new Estonian-language newspaper rushed an extra edition across the Baltic on Oct. 10 after the first run sold out in one day.  Editor Hasse Olsson said plans had called for 7,000 copies of the monthly Are Paev (Business Paper) to be sold at newsstands and an additional 3,000 promotion issues to be sent by direct mail.  He said 13,000 more copies were sent to Estonia because of strong sales.  The Swedish publishing company Bonniers owns 51% of Are Paev, and the Estonian management company Minor owns 49%.  OPTIMISM IN MEXICO  Angel Gurria, Mexico's top debt negotiator, said the country's creditor banks are responding positively to Mexico's debt-reduction package.  Mr. Gurria's optimism contrasts with some bankers' views that the deal may require a lot of arm twisting by the U.S. Treasury in order to succeed.  Mr. Gurria, Mexico's under-secretary of the ministry of finance, met yesterday with European bankers in London, at the half-way point on a so-called road show to market the package around the world.  An increasing number of banks appear to be considering the option under the deal whereby they can swap their Mexican loans for 30-year bonds with a face value discounted by 35%, Mr. Gurria said.  The other two options consist of swapping loans for bonds with 6.25% interest rates, or providing fresh loans.  The accord, which covers $52.7 billion of Mexico's medium- and long-term debt, is expected to go into effect in early 1990.  POSTSCRIPTS . . .  China's top film actress, Liu Xiaoqing, paid $4,555 in back taxes and fines in Shandong province, the People's Daily reported.  The amount is equal to about 30 years earnings for the average peasant, who makes $145 a year. . . .  China will spend $9.45 million for urgent maintenance on Tibet's Potala Palace, former home of the Dalai Lama, the China News Service said.  The Dalai Lama, who was just awarded the Nobel Peace Prize, lives in exile in India.  George W. Koch, 63 years old, president and chief executive officer of Grocery Manufacturers of America Inc., was elected a director of this maker of spices, seasonings and specialty foods, succeeding Erskin N. White Jr., 65, who resigned.  American Business Computer Corp. said it privately placed 1,035,000 common shares at $2.50 a share.  The placement was made through Gray Seifert Securities, New York, to institutional investors.  Proceeds will be used to commercialize recently patented technology and support the company's international expansion.  The company develops and markets products for the food service industry.  THE R.H. MACY & CO. department-store chain isn't for sale.  In yesterday's edition, it was incorrectly included with a list of New York chains up for sale.  (See: "Media: Third-Quarter Results Mixed At Newspapers --- Newsprint Prices Favorable, But Advertising Linage Was Flat or Declining" -- WSJ Oct. 16, 1989)  Korean car exports have slid about 40% so far this year, but auto makers here aren't panicking.  They are enjoying domestic sales that are more than making up for lost overseas sales.  South Korean consumers are expected to buy almost 500,000 passenger cars this year, up 60% from 1988.  In fact, some auto executives suggest that slackened demand for their cars in the U.S. and Canada is a blessing; otherwise they wouldn't be able to keep up with demand in the more profitable local market.  "We are very lucky to easily change an export loss to domestic plus," says Hong Tu Pyo, managing director of domestic marketing for Hyundai Motor Co.  As it is, waiting lists of a month aren't unusual for popular models.  Demand is so strong that all of the domestic makers -- Hyundai, Kia Motors Corp., Daewoo Motor Co. and even upstart SsangYong Motor Co. -- plan to build more factories.  Industry analysts predict that by 1995, South Korea will be building three million cars a year -- about half of that for export.  It's an optimistic move in a industry already facing world-wide overcapacity.  But South Korean auto makers are confident that the export market will bounce back and that demand in Korea will stay strong.  Currently only one in 38 South Koreans owns a car, up from one in 200 a decade ago.  "In the year 2000 it will be one car per family.  At that point domestic sales will slow down," says Kim Yoon Kwon, director of marketing for Daewoo Motor.  The reason for the tremendous demand is simple: South Koreans suddenly have a lot more money.  "We never thought we'd own a car," says Kwang Ok Kyong, who just bought a Daewoo LeMans on a five-year loan.  She and her husband started a small printing business and need the car for work as well as for weekend jaunts.  Pay raises of 60% over the past three years have given many South Koreans the money to enjoy the things they were supplying the rest of the world.  The success of newcomer SsangYong Motor shows the strength of the auto market and its growing diversity.  A part of the construction-oriented conglomerate SsangYong Group, it took over the dying Dong-A Motor Co. in 1986.  SsangYong began making variations of the Jeep-like "Korando" vehicle. (Dong-A had had a technology agreement with Jeep maker American Motors Corp., now a part of Chrysler Corp.) The most popular style is the stretched "Family," which resembles a Ford Bronco or Chevy Blazer.  The four-wheel-drive vehicles start at $15,000; a Family can cost over $25,000.  SsangYong, which has only about 3% of the domestic market, will sell about 18,000 of its models this year, twice as many as last year.  It sees sales rising 45% to 26,000 units next year.  The company plans to expand plant capacity 50% by 1991.  By then it also hopes to begin producing a passenger car based on the Volvo 240 and selling for about $20,000.  Hyundai and Daewoo seem unconcerned about the SsangYong threat, but Kia, the scrappy No.3 auto maker, is selling four-wheel-drive vehicles through its Asia unit.  It plans to sell 1,700 units in 1989.  Kia, the only Korean car maker that has seen its overseas sales grow in 1989, aims at Korea's common man.  Its advantage has been the peppy little Pride, sold as the Ford Festiva in the U.S.  At 3.8 million won, or $5,700, the econobox is the lowest-priced car in South Korea.  Along with two larger models, the company claims 18% of the domestic market.  Ford Motor Co. and Japan's Mazda Motor Corp. have equity interests in Kia.  Kia is the most aggressive of the Korean Big Three in offering financing.  Loans for as long as five years make the cars very accessible, with monthly payments as low as 80,000 won, or $120.  Daewoo Motor, a 50-50 joint venture with General Motors Corp. and the Daewoo Group conglomerate, is the only auto maker that appears to be hurting.  Shipments of its Lemans to GM's Pontiac division are off about 65% from a year ago, versus a 44% decline for Hyundai and an 18% increase for Kia.  Moreover, Daewoo's domestic sales have grown half as fast as sales of its rivals.  The big problem for Daewoo, which holds about 21% of the market, is the long series of labor disruptions it suffered this year.  But Daewoo is expanding too.  In fact, a sister company, Daewoo Shipbuilding and Heavy Machinery, plans to build 240,000 minicars by the mid-1990s.  Hyundai, the Korean market leader with a 58% share, also plans to jump into minicars at the same time.  It has a similar project for 200,000 cars a year.  Kia is reportedly also considering such a plan.  Even giant Samsung Group is rumored in the Korean press to be considering getting into the auto-making business; a company spokesman had no comment.  Robert P. Bulseco, 44 years old, was named president and chief administrative officer of this regional commercial bank.  Both posts had been vacant.  Robert Robie, 51, was named to the new positions of vice chairman and chief credit officer.  Many skittish mutual fund investors picked up the phone yesterday, but decided not to cash in their chips after all.  As the stock market bounced back, withdrawals of money from stock funds amounted to a mere trickle compared with Black Monday, when investors dumped $2.3 billion, or about 2% of stock-fund assets.  Fidelity Investments, the nation's largest fund company, said phone volume was more than double its typical level, but still half that of Oct. 19, 1987.  Net outflows from Fidelity's stock funds stood at less than $300 million, or below 15% of the $2 billion cash position of the firm's stock portfolios.  Much of the money was switched into the firm's money market funds.  Outflows since the close of trading Friday remain below one-third their level of two years ago, Fidelity said.  Other mutual fund companies reported even lighter withdrawal requests.  And some investors at Fidelity and elsewhere even began buying stock funds during the day.  "Two years ago, there was a lot of redemption activity and trouble with people getting through on the phone," said Kathryn McGrath, head of the investment management division of the Securities and Exchange Commission.  This time, "We don't have that at all."  Of course, the relative calm could be jolted if the market plunges again.  And any strong surge in redemptions could force some funds to dump stocks to raise cash, as some did during Black Monday.  But funds generally are better prepared this time around.  As a group, their cash position of 10.2% of assets in August -- the latest figure available -- is 14% higher than two years earlier.  Many fund managers have boosted their cash levels in recent weeks.  The biggest flurry of investor activity came early in the day.  Vanguard Group Inc. saw heavy exchanges from stock funds into money market funds after the telephone lines opened at 8:30 a.m.  "In the first hour, the real nervous folks came along," a spokesman said.  "But the horrendous pace of call volume in the first half-hour slowed considerably."  At Scudder, Stevens & Clark Inc., phone calls came in at 40% more than the normal pace through early afternoon.  Most of that increase came in the first hour after the phone lines opened at 8 a.m.  As stocks rose, in fact, some investors changed course and reversed their sell orders.  Many funds allow investors to void orders before the close of trading.  At Scudder and at the smaller Ivy funds group in Hingham, Mass., for instance, some shareholders called early in the morning to switch money from stock funds to money market funds, but later called back to reverse the switches.  Because mutual fund trades don't take effect until the market close -- in this case, at 4 p.m. -- these shareholders effectively stayed put.  At Fidelity's office in downtown Boston, Gerald Sherman walked in shortly after 7:30 a.m. and placed an order to switch his retirement accounts out of three stock funds and into a money market fund.  But by 3:15 p.m., with the market comfortably ahead for the day, Mr. Sherman was preparing to undo his switch.  "It's a nice feeling to know that things stabilized," said Mr. Sherman, the 51-year-old co-owner of a discount department store.  But some investors continued to switch out of high-risk, high-yield junk funds despite yesterday's rebound from that market's recent price declines.  Shareholders have been steadily bailing out of several big junk funds the past several weeks as the $200 billion market was jolted by a cash crunch at Campeau Corp. and steadily declining prices.  Much of the money has been switched into money market funds, fund executives say.  Instead of selling bonds to meet redemptions, however, some funds have borrowed from banks to meet withdrawal requests.  This avoids knocking down prices further.  The $1.1 billion T. Rowe Price High Yield Fund was among the funds that borrowed during the Campeau crisis, says George J. Collins, president of T. Rowe Price Associates Inc.  That way, Mr. Collins says, "We didn't have to sell securities in a sloppy market."  When the market stabilized, he added, the firm sold the bonds and quickly paid the loans back.  ---  Tom Herman contributed to this article.  Amcore Financial Inc. said it agreed to acquire Central of Illinois Inc. in a stock swap.  Shareholders of Central, a bank holding company based in Sterling, Ill., will receive Amcore stock equal to 10 times Central's 1989 earnings, Amcore said.  For the first nine months of 1989, Central earned $2 million.  Amcore, also a bank holding company, has assets of $1.06 billion.  Central's assets are $240 million.  (During its centennial year, The Wall Street Journal will report events of the past century that stand as milestones of American business history.)  SOFT CONTACT LENSES WON federal blessing on March 18, 1971, and quickly became eye openers for their makers.  The Food and Drug Administration that day said Bausch & Lomb could start selling them in the U.S.  The cornflake-size product was more comfortable and less prone to falling out than hard contact lenses, which had been around since 1939.  Bausch & Lomb sold the softies under a sublicense from National Patent Development, which had gained the rights from the Czechoslovakia Academy of Sciences.  Otto Wichterle, a Czech, invented them in 1962.  The plastic lens wraps itself over the cornea, absorbing eye moisture while permitting oxygen to pass through.  But the new lens became the eye of a storm.  In September 1971 California officials seized "bootlegged" lenses -- made by unlicensed companies -- after some showed traces of bacteria.  In October doctors were debating the product's safety, some claiming it caused infections.  And there were Senate hearings on the questions in July 1972.  The product overcame the bad publicity and kept evolving.  The early soft lenses, which cost $300 a set, were expected to last for a year.  In 1983 "extended wear" versions, designed to be worn for 30 days at a time, wree offered.  Eighteen months ago a "disposable" seven-day model bowed; a year's supply costs about $500.  Last month the FDA and Contact Lens Institute cautioned users that serious eye infections could result from wearing lenses more than seven days at a stretch.  Today 20 million of the 25 million Americans using contact lenses are using the soft type.  Including the accesory eye care products, contacts account for $2 billion in annual retail sales.  Although Bausch remains the leader among the six majors, Johnson & Johnson, with its new disposables, is coming on fast.  The roller-coaster stock market is making life tougher for small companies trying to raise money.  In the wake of Friday's plunge and yesterday's rebound, some companies are already postponing deals, and others wish they could.  As in other jittery times, many small businesses expect a particularly rough time raising funds as investors shun risky deals, seeking safety in bigger companies.  Even if stock prices fully recover from Friday's sharp decline, the unsettled conditions will frighten many investors.  "The implication of an unsettled situation is that the thing could drop dramatically," says Henry Linsert Jr., chairman of Martek Corp., a four-year-old biotechnology company that is planning a private placement of stock.  "The more variables that indicate risk, the more the investor is going to drive a hard bargain."  Earlier this month, Staples Inc., a Newton, Mass., office-supplies discounter, said it would accelerate expansion plans nationwide and offer more of its stock to the public.  At the time, its shares were selling above their initial offering price of $19, and bankers believed Staples would sell new stock without a hitch.  But with the company's shares standing at $15 yesterday, a new offering seems unlikely, company officials say.  Business, however, continues to be "robust," and the stock market hasn't affected the concern's expansion plans, says Todd Krasnow, a senior executive.  Other companies figure they can't avoid the market.  "We have capital requirements," says Mr. Linsert, "so we have to go ahead" with a planned $1.5 billion private placement.  Unless the market goes right back up, he says, "it may take us six to nine months to find the money, instead of three."  And the Columbia, Md., company may have to settle for a lower price, he adds.  Life is particularly nerve-racking for companies that had planned to go public this week.  Hand-holding is becoming an investment-banking job requirement.  Robertson, Stephens & Co., a San Francisco investment banking concern, has a client that looked forward to making its initial public offering yesterday.  Officers of the company, a health-care concern, "were very discouraged on Friday and felt they shouldn't go public; we felt they should," says Sanford Robertson, partner in the banking concern.  As the market dropped Friday, Robertson Stephens slashed the value of the offering by 7%.  Yesterday, when similar securities rebounded, it bumped the valuation up again.  As of late yesterday, the IPO was still on.  For many, the situation is especially discouraging because the market for IPOs was showing signs of strengthening after several years of weakness.  "We were just beginning to look at the increase in IPOs, seeing the light at the end of the tunnel," says Frank Kline Jr., partner in Lambda Funds, a Beverly Hills, Calif., venture capital concern.  "But the tunnel's just gotten longer."  Companies planning to go public "are definitely taking a second look," says Allen Hadhazy, senior analyst at the Institute for Econometric Research, Fort Lauderdale, Fla., which publishes the New Issues newsletter on IPOs.  He calculates that the recent market slide translated into a 5% to 7% reduction in IPO proceeds to companies.  Many companies are hesitating.  Exabyte Corp. had been planning to sell 10% of its stock this week in an IPO that would raise up to $28.5 million.  But now, Peter Behrendt, president, says, "We're making decisions on a day-to-day basis."  Debt-free and profitable, the Boulder, Colo., computer-products concern could borrow funds if it decides against an IPO now, he says.  KnowledgeWare Inc., an Atlanta computer-software concern, says it is still planning to go ahead with its IPO this week or next -- unless conditions change.  "It's a wait-and-see situation right now," says Terry McGowan, president.  Delayed financings also would affect the operations of many companies.  Sierra Tucson Cos., a Tucson, Ariz., operator of addiction-treatment centers, has a planned doubling of capacity riding on an IPO scheduled for next week.  William O'Donnell, president, says he still thinks the IPO will succeed.  If it doesn't, he says, the company would have to change its expansion timetable.  But the market turmoil could be partially beneficial for some small businesses.  In a sagging market, the Federal Reserve System "might flood the market with funds, and that should bring interest rates down," says Leonard T. Anctil, vice president of the Bank of New England, Boston.  James G. Zafris, president of Danvers Savings Bank, Danvers, Mass., says the market turmoil "is an absolute non-event for small business."  For small companies, he says, interest rates are far more important than what happens on stock exchanges.  Mr. Zafris thinks rates are heading down, helping small companies.  Peter Drake, biotechnology analyst for Vector Securities International, Chicago, thinks market uncertainty may encourage small companies to form more strategic alliances with big corporations.  Partly because the 1987 market crash made it harder for them to find financing, many high-technology concerns have made such alliances recently.  Some even see a silver lining in the dark clouds.  Alan Wells, president of Bollinger, Wells, Lett & Co., a New York merger specialist, thinks panicky investors may lose their enthusiasm for leveraged buy-out and giant takeover deals.  Instead, they could turn to investing in smaller deals involving smaller companies, he says.  And William E. Wetzel Jr., a University of New Hampshire management professor and director of Venture Capital Network Inc., says the market's gyrations will underline the investors' lack of control in big stock investments.  This will add to the appeal of small business, he says, where investors often have a degree of influence.  Bay Financial Corp., hurt by high debts and deteriorating real estate investments, reported a wider loss for the fourth quarter and said it might be forced to seek a bankruptcy-court reorganization if it can't renegotiate its borrowings.  Bay said a "substantial part" of its debt outstanding is in default as a result of inability to sell certain properties quickly and lower-than-expected prices for sales made.  The company said its real estate portfolio is "highly leveraged," while about two-thirds of its investments aren't income-producing.  Thus it is coming up short on a big bet that quick sales at higher prices would enable it to keep up with mortgage and other debt payments.  According to its latest annual report, about a quarter of the company's holdings are in Massachusetts, in the midst of a real-estate slump.  The company said it had a net loss in its fourth quarter ended June 30 of $36.2 million, or $9.33 a share, on revenue of $13.1 million.  A year earlier, the company had a loss of $10.8 million, or $3.04 a share, on revenue of $10.8 million.  For the year, it had a net loss of $62 million, or $15.97 a share, on revenue of $44.3 million.  In the previous year, it had a loss of $22.5 million, or $6.52 a share, on revenue of $41.1 million.  Although it is having serious cash-flow problems, Bay said the fair-market value of its holdings, minus debt, was equal to $6.02 a share at June 30 based on a recent appraisal.  Book value per share, which is based on investments at cost, was a negative $6.69 a share.  A year earlier, fair-market value per share was $26.02 and book value was $9.43 a share.  Annualized interest rates on certain investments as reported by the Federal Reserve Board on a weekly-average basis:  @ Week Ended:  @ Oct. 13, Oct. 6,  @ 1989 1989  @ Treasury bills (90 day)-a 7.66 7.76  @ Commrcl paper (Dealer, 90 day)-a 8.57 8.82  @ Certfs of Deposit (Resale, 90 day) 8.63 8.91  @ Federal funds (Overnight)-b 8.93 9.18  @ Eurodollars (90 day)-b 8.80 9.02  @ Treasury bills (one year)-c 8.00 8.35  @ Treasury notes (three year)-c 8.00 8.32  @ Treasury notes (five year)-c 7.95 8.21  @ Treasury notes (ten year)-c 8.00 8.18  @ Treasury bonds (30 year)-c 7.99 8.13  @ a-Discounted rate. b-Week ended Wednesday, October 11, 1989 and Wednesday October 4, 1989. c-Yields, adjusted for constant maturity.  TRW Inc. reported a 12% decline in third-quarter net income, but the company said that excluding unusual gains in both quarters, operating profit rose 16%.  The electronics, automotive and aerospace concern said third-quarter net was $60 million, or 98 cents a share, down from $68 million, or $1.11 a share, a year earlier.  Share earnings are reported on a fully diluted basis, by company tradition.  Results for the 1988 quarter included a gain of $1.05 a share from sale of the Reda Pump and Oilwell Cable units, partly offset by a charge of 69 cents a share for recall of faulty truck steering systems.  The latest quarter included a gain of 11 cents a share as a partial reversal of the recall charge, because the reserve established last year exceeded the actual recall costs.  Sales for the quarter rose 8.3% to $1.79 billion, from $1.65 billion, with all three major product groups reporting gains.  The company said aerospace and defense sales were up 2% for the quarter to $802 million, and operating profit climbed 6% to $61 million, mainly because of improved program performance in spacecraft and advanced-technology contracts.  Automotive sales jumped 16% to $791 million, mainly because of higher sales of air bags and other passenger restraint systems, TRW said.  The group had an operating profit of $65 million, against a loss of $13 million a year earlier.  However, excluding the year-earlier charge for recall of steering gear, operating profit in the latest quarter declined 14%, reflecting higher start-up and product development expenses in passenger-restraint systems.  Materials and production costs also rose, TRW said.  The information systems segment had a 44% jump sales to $196 million.  An acquisition accounted for half the sales rise, TRW said.  Operating profit rose threefold to $18 million, from $6 million.  For the nine months, TRW's net was $199 million, or $3.22 a share, down 3% from $205 million, or $3.33 a share, a year earlier.  Sales rose 2.9% to $5.42 billion, from $5.27 billion.  a tragicomic monologue by an idealistic, not unheroic, though sadly self-deceived English butler in his sixties -- proceeds as if the realistic English novel of manners, like Britannia herself, still ruled the waves.  In fact, Kazuo Ishiguro's "The Remains of the Day" (Knopf, 245 pages, $18.95) is both an homage to traditional English forms and a dramatic critique of them.  It implies that the British Empire was rooted in its subjects' minds, manners and morals, and argues, tacitly, that its self-destructive flaws were embodied in the defensive snobbery, willful blindness, role-playing and especially the locutions of its domestic servants.  As the narrator Stevens, the solitary butler of Darlington Hall, mulls over such hallowed terms as "greatness," "dignity," "service" and "loyalty," we see how pious cant subverts the soul.  Stevens's dutiful conflation of the public and private realms -- like his beloved master's -- destroys all it was designed to preserve.  Such armor crushes the soldier.  The mask cuts to the quick.  It's 1956, the year the Suez crisis marked the final end of Empire.  As he stands on a hill at the beginning of a six-day motor expedition from Oxfordshire to Cornwall, where a former housekeeper resides, perhaps the victim of an unhappy 20-year marriage, perhaps (he hopes with more fervor than he will ever acknowledge) not disinclined to return to domestic service, Stevens surveys the view and thereby provides a self-portrait, a credo and the author's metaphor for the aesthetic of the novel we're reading:  "We call this land of ours Great Britain, and there may be those who believe this a somewhat immodest practice.  Yet I would venture that the landscape of our country alone would justify the use of this lofty adjective. . . .  It is the very lack of obvious drama or spectacle that sets the beauty of our land apart.  What is pertinent is the calmness of that beauty, its sense of restraint.  It is as though the land knows of its own beauty, of its own greatness, and feels no need to shout it.  In comparison, the sorts of sights offered in such places as Africa and America, though undoubtedly very exciting, would, I am sure, strike the objective viewer as inferior on account of their unseemly demonstrativeness."  An effusive landscape?  An ill-mannered mountain?  But let Stevens continue in his unwitting comic manner (his conscious efforts at "banter" always fail -- most comically): "This whole question is very akin to the question that has caused much debate in our profession over the years: what is a `great' butler?"  His answer is one "possessed of a dignity in keeping with his position."  Such dignity "has to do crucially with a butler's ability not to abandon the professional being he inhabits."  He "will not be shaken out by external events, however surprising, alarming or vexing. . . .  Continentals are unable to be butlers because they are as a breed incapable of the emotional restraint which only the English race are capable of."  Despite his racial advantage, to be a great butler is a heroic calling; one's pantry is "not unlike general's headquarters during a battle."  If, for example, in the midst of a great social occasion (such as an international conference on revising the Versailles Treaty in 1923), one's 72-yearold father, himself a great butler once, should happen to die of a stroke, one must continue to serve the port: "Please don't think me unduly improper in not ascending to see my father in his deceased condition just at this moment.  You see, I know my father would have wished me to carry on just now."  It is this kind of dignity and restraint that allows Stevens to declare: "For all its sad associations, whenever I recall that evening today, I find I do so with a large sense of triumph."  We note the imperial public word used to deny private rage and sorrow.  That Stevens himself is not grotesque or repellent, but funny and sad and enlightening, is entirely the author's triumph.  Mr. Ishiguro's ability to create a fallible narrative voice that permits him to explore such intertwining domestic, cultural and political themes was abundantly clear in his previous novel, "An Artist of the Floating World," set in Japan after the war.  Now shifting his scene from the country he left at five to the England he has lived in for nearly 30 years, he has fashioned a novel in the mode of Henry James and E.M. Forster.  With great aplomb he considers not only filial devotion and (utterly repressed) sexual love, but British anti-Semitism, the gentry's impatience with democracy and support of Hitler, and the moral problematics of loyalty: "It is, in practice, simply not possible to adopt such a critical attitude towards an employer and at the same time provide good service. . . .  `This employer embodies all that I find noble and admirable.  I will hereafter devote myself to serving him.' This is loyalty intelligently bestowed."  In the end, after meeting with the former housekeeper, Stevens sits by the seashore at dusk, thinking of her and of his employer, and declares "I trusted.  I trusted in his lordship's wisdom. . . .  I can't even say I made my own mistakes.  Really -- one has to ask oneself -- what dignity is there in that?"  The loyal servant has come full circle.  What is greatness?  What is dignity?  We understand such rueful wisdom must be retrospective: The owl of Minerva only spreads her wings at dusk.  But as "The Remains of the Day" so eloquently demonstrates with quiet virtuosity, such wisdom can be movingly embodied in art.  --- Mr. Locke teaches English and comparative literature at Columbia University.  UGI Corp. said its AmeriGas subsidiary completed the previously announced sale of its air separation plant and related assets in Waukesha, Wis., to AGA Gas Inc., Cleveland.  The price wasn't disclosed.  The transaction is part of UGI's continuing program to shed AmeriGas's industrial gas interests and expand the subsidiary's propane business.  Since June, AmeriGas has netted more than $100 million from industrial gas divestitures and reinvested more than $50 million to acquire three propane distributors.  UGI is a gas and electric utility and distributes propane nationally through its AmeriGas subsidiary.  Stanislav Ovcharenko, who represents the Soviet airline Aeroflot here, has some visions that are wild even by the current standards of perestroika.  In his office overlooking the runway of Shannon Airport, Mr. Ovcharenko enthusiastically throws out what he calls "just ideas":  First, he suggests, GPA Group Ltd., the international aircraft leasing company based in Ireland, could lease some of its Boeing jetliners to the Soviet airline.  Then Aer Lingus, the Irish flag carrier, could teach Aeroflot pilots to fly the Boeings, and the fleet could be based here at Shannon Airport.  That's not all, he says.  Aer Rianta, the Irish airport authority, could build a cargo terminal in the Soviet Union.  Aeroflot could lease some of its cargo planes to Aer Lingus, through GPA, for a joint-venture cargo airline.  And then there is his notion of an Irish-Soviet charter airline to ferry Armenians to Los Angeles via Shannon.  Have the freedoms of glasnost gone to Mr. Ovcharenko's head?  Hardly.  The Irish-Soviet aviation connection is alive and well here at Shannon Airport.  GPA is indeed talking about leasing Western planes to Aeroflot and even about buying Soviet-built Tupolev 204s.  Aer Lingus is in discussions with the Soviet carrier about a cargo venture and other possibilities.  Aer Rianta already has so many ventures with Aeroflot that its chief executive is studying Russian.  Unlikely as it may seem, tiny, politically neutral Ireland has penetrated the mighty Soviet airline bureaucracy.  And as Aeroflot struggles to boost its service standards, upgrade its fleet and pursue commercial opportunities, the Irish aviation industry seems poised to benefit.  "Irish and Soviet people are similar," says Mr. Ovcharenko.  "They look the same.  They're very friendly."  Moreover, he says, Irish companies are small but spunky.  "We have to study their experience very well," he says.  "We must find any way to get business."  The two groups have been working together since the late 1970s, long before Soviet joint ventures were the rage in the West.  Aeroflot carried about 125 million passengers last year, and Shannon Airport, the airline's largest transit airport outside the Soviet Union, saw 1,400 Aeroflot flights and 250,000 passengers pass through.  An apartment complex down the road is the crew-rest and staging area for more than 130 Aeroflot pilots and flight attendants.  The airport's biggest supplier of aircraft fuel is the Soviet Union.  Tankers from the Latvian port of Ventspils each year unload 25 million gallons of fuel into a special tank farm at the airport.  What Aeroflot doesn't pour into its own gas-guzzling Ilyushins is bartered to the airport authority, which resells it to 11 Western carriers including Air France, Trans World Airlines and Pakistan International Airlines.  Aeroflot thus pays its landing fees, ground-handling and catering bills with fuel, preserving its hard currency.  That isn't all.  Last year, the Irish airport authority, in a joint venture with Aeroflot, opened four hard-currency duty-free shops at Moscow's Sheremetyevo Airport.  Aer Rianta now manages duty-free sales on all Aeroflot international flights out of Moscow.  Duty-free shops in Leningrad's Pulkova Airport opened in July, and hard-currency shops in Leningrad hotels and on the Soviet-Finnish frontier are coming soon.  Aer Rianta is talking about similar joint ventures in Tashkent and in Sochi, a Black Sea resort, and even has a computer-assembly project cooking with the Georgian city of Tbilisi.  Aeroflot's international fleet of 285 planes is being repainted and refurbished at Shannon Airport.  Thanks to a new air-traffic agreement and the ability of Irish travel agents to issue Aeroflot tickets, tourists here are taking advantage of Aeroflot's reasonable prices to board flights in Shannon for holidays in Havana, Kingston and Mexico City.  The round-trip fare to Havana is 410 Irish punts ($578).  Jamaica costs 504 punts.  A formal blessing of sorts was bestowed on this friendship in April when Mikhail and Raisa Gorbachev stopped here for talks with Irish Prime Minister Charles Haughey.  New trade accords were signed.  It all started with geography.  When it opened in 1939, Shannon was the first landfall in Europe for thirsty airplanes flying from North America.  Advances in aircraft fuel efficiency over the years made a Shannon stop unnecessary for most Western air fleets, but Aeroflot still flies inefficient Ilyushins that can't make it from Moscow to Managua on one hop.  As a result, Ireland didn't spurn the Soviets after they shot down a Korean Air Lines jetliner over the Sea of Japan in 1983, though it suspended direct Moscow-Shannon flights for two months.  In fact, Aer Lingus started ferrying Russians from Shannon to New York when Washington stripped Aeroflot of its U.S. landing rights.  Today, Aer Rianta is making a heap of money from its Soviet friendship.  And, with those contacts in place, it could be relatively simple to add Aer Lingus and GPA to the team.  Then, perhaps, Mr. Ovcharenko's ideas wouldn't sound like so much blarney.  Britain's industrial production rose 1.5% in August from July and was up 0.9% from August 1988, according to provisional data from the Central Statistical Office.  Output in the energy sector, which can vary greatly with swings in the oil market, rose 3.8% in August from May but was down 7.1% from a year earlier.  The latest figures compare with July's 4.5% month-to-month rise and 11.3% year-to-year fall.  When Nucor Corp. begins shipping steel from the world's first thin-slab plant this month, it will begin testing the competitive mettle of its giant competitors.  The new technology, which creates a very thin piece of steel, radically reduces the costs of making flat-rolled sheets.  An ebullient Kenneth Iverson, Nucor's chairman, says the company's plant eventually will make a ton of steel in 1.5 man hours, compared with four to six man hours at a conventional mill.  "We've had the Russians and Chinese, and people from India visiting us," Mr. Iverson beams.  "Everyone in the world is watching us very closely."  Especially his neighbors, the major U.S. steelmakers.  Already, USX Corp. and Armco Inc. are studying Nucor's technology to see if they can adopt it.  Says the chief executive officer of a major Midwest steel company: "It's damn worrisome."  The once-staid steel industry is about to be turned topsy-turvy by a 1990s technology revolution.  New, efficient and sophisticated processes make it easier for smaller, less cash-rich companies to make steel at a fraction of what Big Steel paid decades ago.  It also enables minimills finally to get a toehold in the flat-rolled steel market -- the major steelmakers' largest, most prized, and until now, untouchable, market.  But such thin-slab technology is only the beginning.  Eager engineers espouse direct-steelmaking and direct casting, which by the end of the 1990s will enable production without coke ovens and blast furnaces.  Those massive structures, while posing cost and environmental headaches, effectively locked out all but deep-pocketed giants from steelmaking.  "There's a revolution ahead of us that will ultimately change the way we market and distribute steel," says William Dennis, vice president, manufacturing and technology, for the American Iron Ore and Steel Institute.  It isn't that major steelmakers have blithely ignored high technology.  In fact, they've spent billions of dollars to boost the percentage of continously cast steel to 60.9% in 1988, from 39.6% five years before.  Moreover, their balance sheets are rich with diversity, their old plants shuttered, and work forces lean.  But that won't suffice.  "It's no longer enough to beat the guy down the street.  You have to beat everyone around the world," says Mr. Dennis.  He wants to see steelmakers more involved in computers and artificial intelligence.  The problem: They're saddled with huge plants that require costly maintenance.  And try plying new dollars free in a market that is softening, hurt by a strong dollar and concerned about overcapacity -- the industry's Darth Vadar.  "The technology revolution is going to be very threatening to established producers," says Peter Marcus, an analyst with PaineWebber Inc. "They've got too much invested in the old stuff and they can't get their workers to be flexible."  No one expects minimills to eclipse major integrated steelmakers, who remain the undisputed kings of highest-quality steel used for autos and refrigerators.  Nucor's plant in Crawfordsville, Ind., ultimately will produce only one million tons annually, a drop in the 40-million-ton-a-year flat-rolled steel bucket, and it will be years before such plants can compete in the high-profit market.  Still, flat-rolled is the steel industry's bread and butter, representing about half of the 80 million tons of steel expected to be shipped this year.  Moreover, the process isn't without its headaches.  Because all operations are connected, one equipment failure forces a complete plant shutdown.  On some days, the Nucor plant doesn't produce anything.  "At this point, the minimill capacity won't make a great dent in the integrated market, but it does challenge them to develop new markets," says James McCall, vice president, materials, at Battelle, a technology and management-research giant based in Columbus, Ohio.  Indeed, with demand for steel not growing fast enough to absorb capacity, steelmakers will have to change the way they do business.  In the past, says Armco's chief economist John Corey, steelmakers made a product and set it out on the loading dock.  "We said: `We've got a product: if you want it, you can buy it,'" he says, adding: "Now we're figuring out what people need, and are going back to make it."  Armco's sales representatives visit the General Motors Corp.'s Fairfax assembly plant in Kansas City, Mo., two or three days a week.  When they determined that GM needed parts more quickly, Armco convinced a steel service center to build a processing plant nearby so shipments could be delivered within 15 minutes.  Cementing such relationships with major clients -- car and appliance makers -- is a means of survival, especially when those key clients are relying on a smaller pool of producers and flirting with plastic and aluminum makers.  For example, when Detroit began talking about plastic-bodied cars, the American Iron and Steel Institute began a major lobbying effort to show auto makers how they could use steel more efficiently by simply redesigning how a car door is assembled.  But steelmakers must also find new markets.  After letting aluminum-makers take the recycling lead, a group of the nation's largest steelmakers started a recycling institute to promote steel cans to an environmentally conscious nation.  Battelle's Mr. McCall thinks steelmakers should concentrate more on construction.  Weirton Steel Corp., Weirton, W. Va., for example, is touting to homeowners fashionable steel doors, with leaded glass inserts, as a secure and energy-efficient alternative to wooden or aluminum ones.  Other steelmakers envision steel roofs covering suburbia.  Still others are looking at overseas markets.  USX is funneling drilling pipe to steel-hungry Soviet Union.  This year, the nation's largest steelmaker reactivated its overseas sales operation.  Producers also are trying to differentiate by concentrating on higher-profit output, such as coated and electrogalvanized products, which remain beyond the reach of minimills.  Almost all capital-improvement programs announced by major steelmakers within the past year involve building electrogalvanizing lines, used to produce steel for such products as household appliances and car doors.  But unfortunately, that segment is much smaller than the bread-and-butter flat-rolled steel.  "It's like everyone climbing out of the QE II and getting into a lifeboat," says John Jacobson, an analyst with AUS Consultants.  "After a while, someone has to go over the side."  Although he doesn't expect any bankruptcies, he does see more plants being sold or closed.  Robert Crandall, with the Brookings Institute, agrees.  "Unless there is an enormous rate of economic growth or a further drop in the dollar, it's unlikely that consumption of U.S. produced steel will grow sufficiently to offset the growth of minimills."  Not to mention the incursion of imports.  Japanese and European steelmakers, which have led the recent technology developments, are anxiously awaiting the lifting of trade restraints in 1992.  Moreover, the U.S. can expect more competition from low-cost producing Pacific Rim and Latin American countries.  A Taiwanese steelmaker recently announced plans to build a Nucor-like plant.  "People think of the steel business as an old and mundane smokestack business," says Mr. Iverson.  "They're dead wrong."  ---  @ Capital Improvement  @ Spending For the Big Six  @ Composite of 6 major U.S. steelmakers*  @ CAPITAL PCT. CHG.  @ EXPENDITURES (over PCT. OF  @ (in millions) previous year) SALES  @ 1981 $1,537 3.4 5.2  @ 1982 1,402 - 8.8 7.0  @ 1983 1,486 6.0 7.8  @ 1984 868 -41.6 4.0  @ 1985 1,441 66.1 6.6  @ 1986 614 -57.4 3.3  @ 1987 990 61.4 4.9  @ 1988 1,360 37.4 5.7  @ 1989 1,585 16.5 6.4  @ 1990** 1,481 - 6.6 7.7  @ 1991** 1,276 -13.8 6.7  @ 1992** 1,541 20.7 7.0  @ 1993** 1,416 - 8.1 6.2  @ 1994** 967 -31.7 5.5  *USX, LTV, Bethlehem, Inland, Armco, National Steel  **Projected  Source: WEFA Group  Polaroid Corp.'s patent-infringement damages case against Eastman Kodak Co., one of the highest stakes corporate trials ever, is getting scant attention on Wall Street.  After 78 days of mind-numbing testimony in federal court in Boston, the trial is being all but ignored by analysts and patent attorneys.  Most have read the pre-trial documents, however, and estimate Kodak will be ordered to pay $1 billion to $1.5 billion for infringing on seven Polaroid patents.  That may be the largest patent award ever, but it is well below the $12 billion Polaroid seeks.  The highest patent damage award to date was in 1986, when Smith International Inc. was ordered to pay $205 million to Baker Hughes Inc. for infringing on a patent on an oil drilling bit seal.  The two companies later agreed to settle for $95 million.  Few analysts think it is worth their time to slog through the Polaroid trial testimony.  "It's like panning for gold outside of Grand Central Station.  You might find something, but the chances are low," said Michael Ellman, an analyst at Wertheim Schroder & Co.  And Eugene Glazer, an analyst at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc., said: "If you hired an attorney to be there all the time and give you a (prediction) of the eventual award, I would be willing to bet that he would be off" by a lot.  A 75-day trial in the early 1980s determined that Kodak, based in Rochester, N.Y., infringed on patents of Polaroid, of Cambridge, Mass.  The main issues remaining are how to calculate damages and whether the infringement was "willful and deliberate."  If so, the damages could be tripled.  Two analysts who have read the transcripts, David Nelson of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Calvert D. Crary, a litigation analyst at Labe, Simpson & Co., think Judge A. David Mazzone will decide in Kodak's favor on the "willful and deliberate" issue.  Mr. Crary said testimony by Kodak's patent counsel, Francis T. Carr of Kenyon & Kenyon, showed that "he worked with Kodak continuously from the outset of the project" in an effort to avoid infringement.  "Carr told Kodak on many occasions to avoid various features because of Polaroid's patent positions," and Kodak followed his advice in every instance, Mr. Crary said.  But Irving Kayton, a patent expert at George Mason University School of Law who is familiar with the case, said the fact that seven patents were infringed "suggests that infringement was willful.  It's difficult to be that consistently wrong."  Observers also wonder whether Judge Mazzone will use the lost-profits method of determining damages, which Polaroid favors because it would result in a larger award, or the reasonable royalty method.  Polaroid claims it could have manufactured and sold all the instant cameras and film sold by Kodak if Kodak hadn't entered the market.  Moreover, Polaroid contends it could have sold them at a higher price -- and thus made higher profits -- because it wouldn't have been forced to match Kodak's lower prices.  Each side has called a Harvard Business School professor to testify on that issue.  Kodak hired Robert Buzzell and Polaroid brought in Robert J. Dolan.  "There's nothing that says that people at Harvard Business school have to agree with each other," said Mr. Buzzell.  Testimony is expected to continue until early December.  A decision isn't expected until some time next year.  International Business Machines Corp. said earnings tumbled 30% in the third quarter, even a bit further than expected, rendering the outlook doubtful for the next few quarters.  The main reason was a delay in shipment of new high-end disk drives, a business that accounts for some 10% of IBM's $60 billion of annual revenue.  IBM, which telegraphed the poor results three weeks ago, also cited an increase in its leasing business, which tends to lock in business long-term but cut revenue in the near term.  In addition, IBM noted that the stronger dollar has cut the value of overseas revenue and earnings when they are translated into dollars.  Earnings fell to $877 million, or $1.51 a share, somewhat below securities analysts' revised expectations of around $1.60 a share.  That compared with the year-earlier $1.25 billion, or $2.10 a share -- which was inflated by a 15-cents-a-share gain from the sale of some MCI Communications Corp. stock and by an unspecified amount from a payment by Fujitsu Ltd. relating to a software dispute.  Revenue climbed 4.3% to $14.31 billion from $13.71 billion.  IBM, Armonk, N.Y., remained upbeat.  The computer giant, whose U.S. results have been dismal for years, noted that revenue rose again in the U.S. in the third quarter, following an increase in the second period.  The company said in a statement that "demand for IBM products and services continues to be good world-wide.  We do not see anything in the fundamentals of our business that would cause us to change our strategy of investing for profitable growth."  Securities analysts, however, remained downbeat.  "I think 1990 will be another mediocre year," said Steve Milunovich of First Boston.  Jay Stevens of Dean Witter actually cut his per-share earnings estimate to $9 from $9.50 for 1989 and to $9.50 from $10.35 in 1990 because he decided sales would be even weaker than he had expected.  Both estimates would mark declines from the 1988 net of $5.81 billion, or $9.80 a share, which itself was well below the record IBM set in 1984.  Mr. Stevens said he kept a "buy/hold" recommendation on the stock only because "all the damage has been done."  He said the stock hasn't traded below 1 1/2 times book value over the past 10 years, which at the moment computes to a stock price of $100.  The stock closed yesterday at $103 a share, up just $1 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange as the market surged.  Analysts worry that the disk-drive and leasing problems will last at least through the first quarter.  "A key part of the question is, how soon does this disk-drive come and how soon does production ramp up?" said Steve Cohen at SoundView Financial Group.  "And the input I've had from customers is that it still could be a while."  On leasing, Bob Djurdjevic at Annex Research said he thinks IBM has hurt itself unnecessarily.  He said IBM has priced its leases aggressively, thinking that would help win business.  But he said IBM would have won the business anyway as a sale to a third party that would have then leased the equipment to the customer.  He said IBM has not only hurt its short-term revenue outlook but has also been losing money on its leases.  Bob Bardagy, executive vice president of marketing at Comdisco Inc., a huge leasing firm, said: "To put it mildly, IBM Credit has been doing some of the worst economic deals of any leasing company we have ever seen."  IBM is expected to get a boost soon when it announces some new versions of its mainframes.  But the basic technology in the line is almost five years old, which means it is long in the tooth, and competitors are rolling out strong products of their own.  IBM is gaining momentum in the personal-computer market, and is expected to introduce some impressive workstations early next year.  But it's hard to squeeze much profit out of the personal-computer business these days, and the workstation market, while important, is too small to rely on for much growth.  The disk drives will doubtless sell well when they finally become available.  But the AS/400, IBM's highly successful minicomputer line, is losing its momentum, and some analysts said sales could even decline in the fourth quarter.  In addition, IBM's growth in software in the third quarter was just 8.8%, well below historical levels even when adjusted to reflect last year's payment from Fujitsu and the stronger dollar.  And expenses, up 7.9% in the quarter, have stayed stubbornly high.  In the nine months, IBM earned $3.17 billion, or $5.43 a share, down 8.4% from the year-earlier $3.46 billion, or $5.83 a share.  Revenue increased 6.5% to $42.25 billion from $39.68 billion.  PepsiCo Inc.'s chairman said he is "more than comfortable with" analysts' estimates that third-quarter earnings rose to at least 98 cents to $1 a share from 91 cents the year earlier.  D. Wayne Calloway, also chief executive officer of the company, indicated that he expects analysts to raise their forecasts for 1989 after the company releases its earnings today.  So far, analysts have said they are looking for $3.30 to $3.35 a share.  After today's announcement, that range could increase to $3.35 to $3.40 a share.  The official said he also would be comfortable with that new range.  In 1988, the soft-drink giant earned $2.90 a share.  Results for 1989 will include about 40 cents a share from the dilutive effects of snack-food and bottling company acquisitions.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, the company closed yesterday at $57.125 a share, up $3.125.  The company said third-quarter sales are expected to increase 25% from $3.12 billion of last year's third quarter.  Domestic soft-drink bottler case sales are estimated to have risen only 1% in the third quarter -- well below the 4% to 5% growth of recent years -- but about in line with the rest of the soft-drink industry.  Mr. Calloway blamed the slower volume on rainier weather, a dearth of new products in the industry and -- to a much lesser extent -- pricing.  PepsiCo said its soft-drink prices were about 2% higher in the quarter.  Mr. Calloway also noted that soft-drink volume rose a hefty 9% in last year's third quarter, making the comparison more difficult.  International soft-drink volume was up about 6%.  Snack-food tonnage increased a strong 7% in the third quarter, while domestic profit increased in double digits, Mr. Calloway said.  Excluding the British snack-food business acquired in July, snack-food international tonnage jumped 40%, with sales strong in Spain, Mexico and Brazil.  Total snack-food profit rose 30%.  Led by Pizza Hut and Taco Bell, restaurant earnings increased about 25% in the third quarter on a 22% sales increase.  Same-store sales for Pizza Hut rose about 13%, while Taco Bell's increased 22%, as the chain continues to benefit from its price-value strategy.  Taco Bell has turned around declining customer counts by permanently lowering the price of its tacos.  Same store-sales for Kentucky Fried Chicken, which has struggled with increased competition in the fast-food chicken market and a lack of new products, rose only 1%.  The operation, which has been slow to respond to consumers' shifting tastes away from fried foods, has been developing a grilled-chicken product that may be introduced nationally at the end of next year.  The new product has performed well in a market test in Las Vegas, Nev., Mr. Calloway said.  After a four-year, $7.7 billion acquisition binge that brought a major soft-drink company, soda bottlers, a fast-food chain and an overseas snack-food giant to Pepsi, Mr. Calloway said he doesn't expect any major acquisition in the next year or so.  But, "You never can tell," he added, "you have to take advantage of opportunities."  President Bush chose Martin Allday, a longtime friend from Texas, to be chairman of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.  Mr. Allday would succeed Martha Hesse, who is resigning.  The White House said Ms. Hesse, a Chicago businesswoman who previously held posts at the Energy Department and FERC, is leaving to become a vice president of First Chicago Corp.  Mr. Allday, an attorney in Midland, Texas, has been solicitor at the Interior Department.  He met Mr. Bush in the 1950s, when the president was a young oil man in Midland and Mr. Allday was a lawyer for an oil firm.  The FERC is a five-member commission that regulates billions of dollars of interstate wholesale energy transactions.  Mr. Allday's appointment is subject to confirmation by the Senate.  Administration officials said a date for Ms. Hesse's departure hasn't been set.  CALIFORNIA REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT Corp. said its directors declared a dividend of five cents per Class A common stock payable Nov. 6 to stock of record Oct. 16.  The dividend represents the balance of its regular quarterly payout of 10 cents a share, of which half was paid July 17 in a final distribution prior to its merger with B.B. Real Estate Investment Corp., also in July.  The company said it hopes to resume its schedule of regular quarterly dividends at the end of this year.  Hydro-Quebec said it notified Central Maine Power Co. it will cancel a $4 billion contract to supply electricity to the Maine utility.  The provincially owned utility said it is tearing up the deal because "the contract's objectives can't be fulfilled."  Hydro-Quebec said Maine regulators' refusal to approve the contract earlier this year halted work on transmission lines and stopped negotiations for resale of electricity carried through Maine to other utilities.  "It would now be physically impossible to begin deliveries in 1992," a Hydro-Quebec official said.  The contract was to run from 1992 to 2020.  Under the contract Hydro-Quebec was to supply 400 megawatts of power to Central Maine Power starting in 1992, 600 megawatts starting in 1995 and 900 megawatts starting in 2000.  Hydro-Quebec said Maine regulators' refusal to approve the contract means Central Maine Power has lost its place in line.  "We won't sign any new contracts {with deliveries} beginning earlier than 2000," the Hydro-Quebec official said.  He said Hydro-Quebec already has some "customers in mind" for the power that was to be delivered to Maine.  "Nothing has happened since we signed the contract to undermine our conviction that Hydro-Quebec was the lowest-cost, most environmentally acceptable choice for meeting a part of our customers' energy needs through the year 2020," said Central Maine senior vice president Donald F. Kelly.  Central Maine said it is evaluating "many energy options" to make up for the lost future power, including new energy generation and management proposals from New England, and possibly new Canadian purchases.  CHICAGO - Options traders were among the big victims of Friday's plunging stock market, including one small firm that required an emergency $50 million bailout.  While Monday's rebounding markets helped other investors recoup losses, many options customers and professional traders in stock-index options and the options on takeover stocks were left with multimillion-dollar losses, traders here and in New York said.  Options traders were hurt worse than others on Friday because of the highly volatile nature of options, which often rise or fall in value several times the amount of the price change in the individual stock or index of stocks on which they are based.  Thus, options traders Friday were stuck with losses that also were several times larger than those suffered by many stock traders in New York.  Jeffrey Miller of Miller Tabak Hirsch & Co. said that given the high degree of leverage in the options market, it is "very easy for these guys to get wiped out.  That may just be the nature of these highly leveraged little creatures."  An options contract gives the holder the right to buy (call) or sell (put) a specific amount of stock, or in this case the value of a stock index, based on a predetermined price within a given time period.  Options traders who, in return for a small fee, or premium, had previously sold put options on stocks or stock indexes were forced on Friday to buy those contracts back at the previously agreed prices, which were substantially above those in the market as it was falling.  They then had no choice in many cases but to sell the contracts at prevailing prices -- in most cases at a substantial loss.  The latest round of losses is likely to be a serious blow to the Chicago Board Options Exchange, which has never fully recovered from the aftershock of Black Monday, when investors fled the market because of huge losses.  Making matters worse was the fact that late Friday afternoon the CBOE halted stock-index options trading in step with the Chicago Mercantile Exchange's halt in stock-index futures.  But while the Merc reopened a half hour later, the CBOE remained closed, leaving many options traders unable to make trades that might have reduced the losses.  CBOE Chairman Alger "Duke" Chapman, said that, unlike the futures market, the options exchange has to open in a rotation that allows each different options series to trade.  Exchange officials reasoned that they wouldn't have been able to make such a rotation with the time remaining Friday afternoon, and with the stock-index futures on the verge of closing for a second and final time, the CBOE reasoned that its best course was to remain closed.  The damage was so bad at Fossett Corp., an options trading firm here, that it was forced to transfer its accounts to First Options of Chicago, a unit of Continental Bank Corp., as a result of options trading losses.  Fosset so far is the only member of a financial exchange to be forced to be taken over by another firm as a result of Friday's rout.  Fossett still had several million dollars in capital left after Friday's close of trading, but not enough that regulators, worried about another potential market plunge yesterday, would let it reopen for trading, options exchange officials said.  Thus, in an unprecedented arrangement underscoring the seriousness of the transfer, the CBOE, the American Stock Exchange and the Options Clearing Corp., as well as the firm's owner, Stephen Fossett, put up a total of $50 million to guarantee the customer positions being transferred to the bank holding company subsidiary in case the market plunged again yesterday.  S. Waite Rawls III, vice chairman of Continental Bank, First Options' parent company, said the firm took on about 160 accounts formerly held by Fossett, almost all of them belonging to professional floor traders.  "Steve and his firm were still worth a lot of money," Mr. Rawls said.  "A package of credit support was put together -- including the assets of Steve and his firm."  The bailout was cobbled together over the weekend, with officials from the Federal Reserve Board, Securities and Exchange Commission, Comptroller of the Currency and Treasury as well as the options exchanges.  "It was great to have the luxury of time," Mr. Rawls said.  At one point, an options industry official had to talk the Federal Reserve Bank of Chicago's night watchman into giving him the home phone number of Silas Keene, Chicago Fed president.  First Options didn't have to put any money into the bailout.  Yesterday's rally in the stock, futures and options markets led CBOE and Amex officials to conclude that the $50 million in guarantees almost certainly won't need to be tapped by First Options.  The Fossett firm had some losses and liquidity problems during the October 1987 crash as well, Mr. Rawls said.  A federal official said that Continental Bank worked with securities and banking regulators over the weekend to fashion the Fossett bailout, but that conditions weren't dictated by those agencies.  "It was their business decision," the official said.  Officials at Options Clearing Corp., which processes all options trades for U.S. exchanges, said that the $50 million guarantee was unprecedented, but was necessary to help insure the integrity of the options markets.  "It was an extraordinary situation that needed extraordinary steps," said Paul Stevens, OCC president and chief operating officer.  Mr. Stevens declined to give the specific contributions to the $50 million guarantee from each participant.  But CBOE and Amex officials said that Options Clearing Corp. contributed $20 million to the guarantee, the CBOE put up $8 million, the Amex added $4 million and $18 million came from Mr. Fossett's own assets.  Mr. Fossett couldn't be reached to comment.  Debora Foster takes off her necklace, settles herself on a padded chair and gently leans forward.  With a jazz-piano tape playing softly in the background, the soothing hands of Sabina Vidunas begin to work on Ms. Foster's neck and shoulders.  "It's like an oasis in this room," Ms. Foster purrs.  The room in question is the directors' lounge of H.J. Heinz Co., 60 floors above the bustle of Pittsburgh.  There, amid oil paintings and marble tables, massages are administered every Wednesday.  "On days that I'm really busy," says Ms. Foster, who works in public relations for the company, "it seems decadent to take time off for a massage."  Although such sessions may never replace coffee breaks, on-site massage, as it is known in the trade, is certainly infiltrating corporate America.  In some companies middle managers sneak massage therapists into the office, fearful that upper-level executives won't approve.  Ms. Foster's indulgence is nothing like the oily, hour-long rubfests enjoyed by spa visitors.  Nor does it at all resemble (despite what some executives think) the more intimate variety offered at specialty parlors in bad parts of town.  On the contrary, office rubdowns usually take place in dimly lighted conference rooms, where stressed-out employees relax in specially designed chairs, fully clothed.  The massages last 15 minutes and typically cost about $10.  Some companies, including Heinz, even pay part of the fee.  Ms. Vidunas has been seeing some 15 clients a visit since the program was started at Heinz last year.  Anthony J.F. O'Reilly, the company's chairman, swears by her firm touch, saying regular massages are a balm for his old football injuries.  Massage advocates say that kneading the head, shoulders, neck and back can go a long way toward easing tension and improving morale.  They also insist that touching is a basic need, as powerful as the need for food or sleep, and that the office is as good a place as any to do it.  "The blood flows to your head, you feel lightheaded and you don't feel tension around the head or neck," says Minnie Morey, an operations supervisor at the Social Security office in Grand Rapids, Mich., where massages began last month.  "When you leave the room after your massage, people say you look like you're glowing."  Adds Candice Ohlman, the 35-year-old masseuse who plies her trade in the Grand Rapids office, "They fall in love with my hands."  Not everyone, however, is at ease with office massage.  Three years ago, the Internal Revenue Service's office in San Jose, Calif., opened its doors to on-site massage.  And even though employees paid the bill, taxpayers grumbled.  "Sometimes, with the release of stress, you hear `oohs' and `ahs' coming out of the room," explains Morgan Banks, the agency's health specialist.  "And you can't have taxpayers coming into an audit hearing `oohs' and `ahs.'"  Last month, the complaints intensified and the massages ended.  "Now we're looking for a room with thicker walls," Ms. Banks says.  Massage also has an image problem to contend with.  Some masseurs have tried to get around this by calling themselves "bodyworkers" and describing their office visits as "reinvigoration breaks."  But massage, no matter how chaste, is still associated in many minds with seedy fronts for prostitution, and that makes some executives nervous.  Last year, the research and development division of Weyerhaeuser Co., the large wood-products concern, invited a masseuse to its Tacoma, Wash., offices.  Phil Harms, a software engineer, was an eager customer.  "You build up a lot of tension working at a terminal all day," he says.  But after about eight months, the vice president of the division, Ed Soule, learned about the sessions and brought them to a halt.  Mr. Soule says his only beef was that the massages were being given in a company conference room; the department's supervised health facility would have been fine.  "In my view, {massages} should be managed with an appropriate mixture of males and females around," he says.  Given such attitudes, some corporate masseurs prefer to go about their business quietly.  Russell Borner of Park Ridge, N.J., says he has been working for the past year at a huge chemical and manufacturing concern in New York -- unbeknownst to the company's executives.  He visits the same department every two or three weeks.  His massage chair is kept in a closet, and a secretary escorts him past security.  "This is common with a lot of large companies," says Mr. Borner, who worked for American Telephone & Telegraph Co. for 23 years before choosing his current trade.  Managers, he contends, "are afraid how they're going to look in the eyes of their peers.  My vision is to change human consciousness towards touch.  My attitude is: Let's come out of the closet."  Occasionally, all that's needed is a little coaxing.  Elisa Byler, a St. Louis masseuse, won over officials at Emerson Electric Co., a maker of electrical and electronic equipment, by providing documents and other articles trumpeting the therapeutic benefits of massage.  She notes that she also stresses professionalism during her weekly visits.  "I pull my hair back, wear a little makeup and look corporate," says Ms. Byler, who has been visiting Emerson since January.  "If I go in there as I normally dress, they'd ask, `Who is this hippie?'"  The self-proclaimed father of on-site massage is David Palmer, a 41-year-old San Francisco masseur whose mission is to save the touch-starved masses.  To help do this, Mr. Palmer developed a portable massage chair three years ago that he hopes will bring "structured touching" into mainstream America.  "The culture is not ready to take off its clothes, lie down and be touched for an hour for $45," he says.  "The idea is to keep the clothes on and to keep people seated.  The chair is a way to package massage."  Sitting in one of Mr. Palmer's chairs, which cost $425 and have since been copied by others, is a bit like straddling a recliner.  Customers lean forward, rest their knees on side supports and bury their face in padding on the back of the chair. (Ms.  Ohlman, the Grand Rapids masseuse, says she has heard the odd-looking contraption compared to something out of the Spanish Inquisition.)  Mr. Palmer, who serves as president of the On-Site Massage Association and writes an industry newsletter, says some 4,000 practitioners -- out of about 50,000 certified masseurs across the country -- now use massage chairs in the workplace, as well as on street corners, in airports and malls, and at conventions and other gatherings where weary people can be found.  Scot MacInnis, a masseur in Boulder, Colo., had a scary experience while massaging a man in a natural-foods supermarket as part of a store promotion.  Three minutes into the massage, the man curled up, began shaking and turned red.  Paramedics were called.  A week later, the man told Mr. MacInnis he had suffered a mild heart attack unrelated to the massage.  "It was a powerful point in my career," says the 31-year-old Mr. MacInnis, who has since taken out a $1 million liability policy for his business.  "But he pulled through, and after the ambulance left, there were still six people in line waiting for a massage.  The next woman was older, and I was afraid to touch her.  But it's like falling off a horse and getting back on."  Despite the number of fans that office massage has won, some purists look down on it, arguing that naked, full-body rubs are the only way to go.  Linda Aldridge, who does full-body work in Pittsburgh, says that while on-site massage is better than nothing, tired workers should realize it is only the tip of the iceberg.  "Whole areas of their bodies are neglected," she says, adding that clothes ruin the experience.  "There's nothing like skin to skin."  In what is believed to be the first cancellation of a loan to China since the June 4 killings in Beijing, an international bank syndicate has terminated a $55 million credit for a Shanghai property project.  The syndicate, led by Schroders Asia Ltd., agreed last November to provide the loan to Asia Development Corp., a U.S. property developer.  But several weeks ago, in the wake of the Beijing killings, the loan was canceled, according to bankers and executives close to the project.  Asia Development and Schroders declined to comment on the move.  Lenders had doubts about the project even before June 4, but the harsh crackdown, which caused many businesses to reassess their China transactions, "gave the banks the out they wanted," says an official close to the Shanghai venture.  The decision to cancel the loan exemplifies the tough attitude bankers have taken toward China since June 4.  While some commercial lending has resumed, international lenders remain nervous about China's economic troubles and foreign debt -- $40 billion at the end of 1988.  Many loans are being renegotiated, especially those tied to the hotel sector, which has been hit hard by a post-June 4 tourism slump.  Many bankers view property-sector loans as particularly risky.  The canceled Shanghai loan leaves Asia Development, a small concern, saddled with a half-completed 32-story apartment building and heavy debts.  The company owes $11 million to the Shui On Group, the project's Hong Kong contractor, and a significant, though unspecified, amount in legal fees to Coudert Brothers, a U.S. law firm, the sources say.  The project, known as Lotus Mansion, has been mired in controversy.  When the loan agreement was announced, it was hailed as one of the first Western-style financing transactions ever used in China.  Unlike most loans to China, there was no Chinese guarantor.  Instead, the banks secured a promise from state-owned Bank of Communications that it would lend Asia Development the entire $55 million at maturity to finance repayment of the original borrowing.  The loan was to have matured in just two to three years, as soon as construction was completed.  But in a letter sent in August to Asia Development, Schroders said the loan was terminated because the developer had failed to deliver adequate financial data and pay certain fees to the loan-management committee on time, according to officials close to the project.  Creditors involved in the project contend, however, that the termination actually had nothing to do with these technical violations.  Instead, the creditors say, the loan fell victim to nervousness about China's political turmoil, as well as to concern about the loan's security.  The bank syndicate is made up mostly of European banks, but it includes China's state-owned Citic Industrial Bank.  The 11 banks in the syndicate sustained no monetary losses because none of the credit facility had been drawn down.  K mart Corp. agreed to acquire Pace Membership Warehouse Inc. for $23 a share, or $322 million, in a move to expand its presence in the rapidly growing warehouse-club business.  The proposed merger comes as K mart's profit is declining and sales at its core discount stores are rising more slowly than at such competitors as Wal-Mart Stores Inc. K mart, based in Troy, Mich., recently said net income would fall for the third consecutive quarter, after a 16% drop in the first half of its current fiscal year.  "The membership warehouse-club concept has great potential," the company's chairman, Joseph E. Antonini, said in a statement.  Warehouse clubs typically carry general merchandise and food products, which they sell for close to wholesale prices in no-frills stores.  Shoppers, many of whom operate small businesses, pay annual membership fees, which provide an income base for the stores.  K mart tested the warehouse-club sector last year with its acquisition of a 51% interest in Makro Inc.  But the Makro chain, which operates as a joint venture between K mart and SHV Holdings N.V. of the Netherlands, has only six stores and annual sales that one analyst estimated at about $300 million.  Six-year-old Pace, based in Aurora, Colo., operates 41 warehouse-club stores.  The company had losses for several years before turning profitable in fiscal 1988.  In the year ended Jan. 31, Pace rang up profit of $9.4 million, or 72 cents a share, after a tax-loss carry-forward, on sales of $1.3 billion, and analysts expect its results to continue to improve.  "The company turned the corner fairly recently in profitability," said Margo McGlade of PaineWebber Inc., who had been forecasting a 46% jump in Pace's net income from operations this year and another 42% increase next year.  "Warehouse productivity is really beginning to take off."  But some analysts contend K mart has agreed to pay too much for Pace.  "Even if you look at it as a turnaround situation, it's expensive," said Wayne Hood of Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  "In my opinion, you would only pay that kind of price if you were getting a premier player in the industry."  Ms. McGlade of PaineWebber raised a more fundamental question about the deal.  "If K mart can't get its act together in discounting, why is it spending time worrying about other growing markets?"  She said, "I would say K mart's number one job is to address its market-share loss {in discount stores}, which longer-term will lead to improved profit margins.  At that point, perhaps diversification would be appropriate."  But K mart's Mr. Antonini is intent on pushing the company into new retail businesses.  For instance, K mart is opening big food and general merchandise stores, called hypermarkets, and warehouse-type stores specializing in office products and sporting goods.  It also operates Waldenbooks, Pay Less Drug Stores and Builders Square home improvement stores.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, K mart closed yesterday at $36 a share, up 12.5 cents.  Pace rose $2.625 to close at $22.125 a share in national over-the-counter trading.  A K mart spokesman said the acquisition would be financed with short-term borrowings.  Under terms of the agreement, a K mart subsidiary will soon make a tender offer for Pace shares.  Among the conditions of the offer is that Pace shareholders tender a majority of the company's shares outstanding.  The companies said Pace would ill continue to operate under its present management.  G. William Ryan, president of Post-Newsweek Stations, was named chief executive officer of the unit of this media company, effective Jan. 1.  He will succeed Joel Chaseman, who will remain a vice president of the company and continue to represent Post-Newsweek stations in several industry organizations, the company said.  literally.  Traders nervously watching their Quotron electronic-data machines yesterday morning were stunned to see the Dow Jones Industrial Average plummet 99 points in seconds.  A minute later it soared 128 points, then zoomed back down 113 points, 69 below Friday's close.  "It was crazy," said Neil Weisman, general partner of Chilmark Capital Corp.  "It was like flying without a pilot in the front of the plane."  But those who said "This can't be happening" were right.  The Quotrons were wrong.  Quotron Systems Inc., a Citicorp unit, blamed the 30-minute foul-up on "a timing problem in our software" caused by the enormous early volume -- about 145 million shares in the first hour of New York Stock Exchange trading.  The prices of the individual stocks that make up the average were correct, Quotron said, but the average was wrong.  Meanwhile, there was an awful lot of confusion.  At about 10:40 a.m. on the over-the-counter trading desk at a major brokerage firm, a veteran trader who buys and sells some of the most active stocks looked at a senior official and asked, "What's going on?  Is the market up or down?"  At the time, Quotron was reporting that the industrial average was down 70 points.  In fact, it was up 24.  Holly Stark, a vice president who heads the trading desk at Dillon Read Capital Corp., said that once she figured out the Quotron numbers were wrong, she called brokers to tell them.  "It's been kind of annoying, to say the least," she said.  To confuse matters further, when UAL Corp. stock finally opened on the New York Stock Exchange at 11:08 a.m., the price was listed at $324.75 a share, up about $45 from Friday; in fact, its true price was $224.75, down $55.  That was the New York Stock Exchange's blooper.  A spokesman cited a "technical error" and declined to elaborate.  And there were other blunders.  When the market opened at 9:30 a.m. EST, a reporter for the Reuters newswire miscalculated the industrial average's drop as a 4% decline when it really was down 0.7%.  "It was a case of human error, which we found almost immediately and corrected," a spokesman for Reuter in New York said.  Meanwhile, some currency traders at West German banks in Frankfurt said they sold dollars on the news and had to buy them back later at higher prices.  But it was the Quotron problems that had lingering effects.  Dillon Read's Ms. Stark said in early afternoon that she was still viewing prices and other data as subject to verification, and she said portfolio managers continued to question the numbers they saw on the screen.  It was the second time in less than a week that Quotron has had problems calculating the industrial average.  At the start of trading last Wednesday, the average appeared to plunge more than 200 points.  Actually, it was down only a few points at the time.  Quotron said that snafu, which lasted nine minutes, resulted from a failure to adjust for a 4-for-1 stock split at Philip Morris Cos.  A Quotron spokeswoman said recent software changes may have contributed to yesterday's problems.  She said Quotron switched to a backup system until the problems were corrected.  "Today of all days," she lamented.  "The eyes of the world were watching us."  Steven F. Kaplan was named a senior vice president of this graphics equipment company.  He retains his current positions as chief strategic officer of AM International and president of AM Ventures.  Houston attorney Dale Friend, representing a plaintiff in a damage suit, says he has negotiated a settlement that will strike a blow for his client.  Literally.  It turns out Mr. Friend's client, Machelle Parks of Cincinnati, didn't like the way defense attorney Tom Alexander acted during the legal proceedings.  So she has agreed to forgo monetary damages against Mr. Alexander's client in return for the right to punch the attorney.  Ms. Parks's mother also gets to cuff Mr. Alexander.  So does Mr. Friend and his law partner, Nick Nichols.  The bizarre arrangement grows out of Mr. Alexander's representation of Derr Construction Co., one of several defendants in a wrongful death lawsuit brought by Ms. Parks, the widow of a construction worker killed in January 1987 while working on a new Houston convention center.  Last month, Mr. Friend says, Mr. Alexander's associate agreed that Derr would pay $50,000 as part of an overall settlement.  But Mr. Alexander scuttled the deal at the last minute, angering the plaintiff's side.  "I never agreed to it," Mr. Alexander says, adding that "it's not necessary to pay these nuisance settlements."  When Ms. Parks and her mother heard about what had happened, Mr. Friend says, they volunteered that they would like to give Mr. Alexander a good walloping.  Mr. Friend says he passed that along to his adversary, and soon they were talking about the ground rules under which Derr could keep its money and the plaintiffs could take a shot at Mr. Alexander.  Although time and place have yet to be determined, some details are in place.  Mr. Friend says he agreed to strike Mr. Alexander above the belt.  Ms. Parks and her mother indicated they want to "catch him unawares from behind," he says.  Mr. Alexander, for his part, insisted that the punchers can't assign their pummeling rights to anyone else, can't use a blunt instrument and can't take a running start.  Mr. Alexander says he regards the agreement, which hasn't been submitted to a judge, as something of a joke.  However, he acknowledges they "have the option of taking a swat at me if they really want to."  Mr. Friend says his side is "dead serious."  Although they don't contemplate delivering any disabling blows, he says that Mr. Alexander will be asked to sign a release from liability, just in case.  After two years of drought, it rained money in the stock-index futures markets yesterday.  As financial markets rebounded, trading volume in the Chicago Mercantile Exchange's huge Standard & Poor's 500 stock-index futures pit soared, reaching near-record levels for the first time since October 1987.  The sudden influx of liquidity enabled several traders to reap six-figure windfalls in a matter of minutes as prices soared, traders said.  "Guys were minting money in there today," said John Legittino, a futures broker for Elders Futures Inc. in Chicago.  The S&P 500 futures contract, which moves in fractions of an index point under normal conditions, jumped two to three points in seconds early yesterday after an initial downturn, then moved strongly higher the rest of the day.  Each index point represents a $500 profit for each S&P 500 contract held.  For the first time since the 1987 crash, traders said that they were able to trade several hundred S&P 500 contracts at a time in a highly liquid market.  Many institutions and individual investors have shied away from stock-index futures, blaming them for speeding the stock market crash on Black Monday two years ago.  Since the crash, many futures traders haven't assumed large positions for fear that the S&P 500 market, with much of its customer order flow missing, would dry up if prices turned against them.  More than 400 traders jammed the S&P 500 futures pit to await the opening bell.  Traders were shouting bids and offers a full five minutes before the start of trading at 8:30 am CST.  The contract fell five points at the open to 323.85, the maximum opening move allowed under safeguards adopted by the Merc to stem a market slide.  But several traders quickly stepped up and bid for contracts, driving prices sharply higher.  The market hovered near Friday's closing price of 328.85 for about a half hour, moving several index points higher or lower in seconds, then broke higher and didn't look back.  The S&P 500 contract that expires in December closed up a record 15.65 points on volume of nearly 80,000 contracts.  "Traders five feet from each other were making bids and offers that were a full point apart," said one S&P 500 broker.  "You could buy at the bid and sell at the offer and make a fortune," he marveled.  Several of Wall Street's largest securities firms, including Salomon Brothers Inc. and PaineWebber Inc., were also large buyers, traders said.  Salomon Brothers was among the largest sellers of stock-index futures last week, traders said.  Brokerage firms as a rule don't comment on their market activity.  Unlike the week following Black Monday two years ago, individual traders in the S&P 500 pit were also being uncharacteristically circumspect about their one-day profits.  "With the FBI around here, bragging rights are a thing of the past," said one trader, referring to the federal investigation of futures trading that so far has resulted in 46 indictments lodged against individuals on the Merc and the Chicago Board of Trade.  The market for $200 billion of high-yield junk bonds regained some of its footing as the Dow Jones Industrial Average rebounded from Friday's plunge.  But the junk recovery, led by the bellwether RJR Holdings bonds, was precarious.  No trading existed for the vast majority of junk bonds, securities industry officials said.  On Friday, trading in practically every issue ground to a halt as potential buyers fled and brokerage firms were unwilling to provide bid and offer prices for most issues.  "Nothing traded on Friday, and people weren't really sure where the market should have opened" yesterday, said Raymond Minella, co-head of merchant banking at Merrill Lynch & Co.  "But we had a fairly active day yesterday."  At Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., the leading underwriter of junk bonds, "I was prepared to be in a very bad mood tonight," said David Feinman, a junk bond trader.  "Now, I feel maybe there's a little bit of euphoria."  But before the stock market rebounded from a sharp early sell-off yesterday, he said, "You couldn't buy {junk bonds} and you couldn't give them away."  Yesterday's rally was led by RJR Holdings 13 3/4% bonds, which initially tumbled three points, or $30 for each $1,000 face amount, to 96 1/4 before rebounding to 99 3/4.  Bonds issued by Kroger, Duracell, Safeway and American Standard also showed big gains, recovering almost all their losses from Friday and early yesterday.  But traders said the junk bond market increasingly is separating into a top-tier group, in which trades can be executed easily, and a larger group of lower-quality bonds in which liquidity -- or the ability to trade without too much difficulty -- has steadily deteriorated this year.  "Liquidity hasn't returned to the vast middle ground of the market," said Mr. Minella of Merrill.  "The deadbeats are still deadbeats," said Mr. Feinman of Drexel.  Analysts are concerned that much of the high-yield market will remain treacherous for investors.  Paul Asquith, associate professor at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology's Sloan School of Management, citing a pattern of junk-bond default rates that are low in the early years after issuance and rise later, says, "We're now in a period where we're starting to see defaults from the big issue years of 1984 to 1986."  Mark Bachmann, a senior vice president at Standard & Poor's Corp., confirms that there is "increasing concern about the future liquidity of the junk bond market."  "Junk bonds are a highly stratified market," said Lewis Glucksman, vice chairman of Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. "There's a whole bunch of stuff that's money good and a whole bunch of stuff that's not so good."  Analysts at Standard & Poor's say junk bond offerings by "tightly stretched" issuers seem to be growing.  Almost $8 billion of junk bonds that are considered untradeable include issues from SCI TV, Gillette Holdings (not related to Gillette Co.), Interco, Seaman Furniture, Allied Stores, Federated Department Stores, National Gypsum, M.D.C. Holdings, Micropolis, Leaseway Transportation and Price Communications.  "You could still have some very bad times ahead," said Mr. Bachmann.  "It's possible to have a 10% default rate in one year, because we're already seeing big problems in the midst of a pretty strong economy.  I'm certainly not comfortable saying we've seen the bottom."  But yesterday's rally among "good" junk was a badly needed tonic for the market.  Many issues "bounced off the floor," Mr. Minella said, and benchmark junk issues "recovered all of their losses" from Friday and early yesterday.  In contrast, he says, "The stock market gained back only about half what it lost Friday, and the {government} bond market lost about half what it gained Friday."  Traders said yesterday's rally was fueled by insurance companies looking for bargains after a drastic slide in prices the past month.  In addition, mutual funds didn't appear to be major sellers of high-yield securities as was expected.  "Sometimes a shakeout is healthy," said Drexel's Mr. Feinman.  "People will learn to be more circumspect.  If they do good credit analysis, they will avoid the hand grenades.  I think the market is in good shape."  Should you really own stocks?  That's a question a lot of people are asking, following the stock market's stunning display of volatility.  Whipsawed financially and emotionally by Friday's heartstopping 190-point drop in the Dow Jones Industrial Average and yesterday's 88-point rebound, they're wondering if an individual has any business being in the market.  The answer, say academic researchers, money managers and investment specialists, is yes -- as long as you approach the stock market as an investor.  But, they say, people shouldn't try to be traders, who buy and sell in an effort to ride the latest economic trend or catch the next hot stock.  The case for owning stocks over the long-term is compelling.  "If you look at 75 years worth of investment history -- including the Great Depression and every bear market since -- stocks have outperformed almost everything an individual could have owned by a long shot," says Barry Berlin, vice president at First Wachovia Capital Management.  A dollar invested in the stock market in 1926 would have grown to $473.29 by the end of last June, according to Laurence Siegel, managing director at Ibbotson Associates Inc.  But a dollar invested in long-term bonds in 1926 would have grown to only $16.56, and a dollar put in Treasury bills would equal a meager $9.29.  The longer the time period, the less risk there is of losing money in the stock market.  Over time, the odds increasingly favor the investor with a diversified portfolio.  For instance, Ken Gregory, a San Francisco money manager, calculates that if an investor holds a basket of stocks that tracks the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index, the chance of losing money is 3% to 4% over a 10-year period, compared with 15% over three years and 30% over one year.  "If you don't need the money for 10 years, there's a clear-cut case for sticking to a steady core of stocks," Mr. Gregory says.  Stock-market investments also help balance the other assets an individual owns, says John Blankenship Jr., president of the Institute of Certified Financial Planners.  Stocks have a place in an investors' portfolio along with real estate, bonds, international securities and cash, he says.  There are some important caveats: Before investing in stocks, individuals should have at least three to six months of living expenses set aside in the bank, most investment advisers say.  Individuals also should focus on building equity in a home, which provides some protection against inflation, as well as a nest-egg that can be cashed in late in life to help cover the cost of retirement living.  People also shouldn't invest money in stocks that they'll need in the near future -- for example, for college tuition payments or retirement expenses.  "You may have to sell your stocks at a time when the market takes a plunge," says Mr. Blankenship, a Del Mar, Calif. financial planner.  But once the basics are covered, "then I would start to invest, even if it's as little as $1,000," says Michael Lipper, president of Lipper Analytical Services Inc.  He says individuals should consider not just stocks, but other long-term investments, such as high-quality bonds.  Despite the strong case for stocks, however, most pros warn that individuals shouldn't try to profit from short-term developments.  "It's very difficult to do," says Donald Holt, a market strategist for Wedbush Morgan Securities, a Los Angeles brokerage firm.  "Our markets move so fast and they are so volatile, there's no way the average investor can compete with the pros."  Individual investors face high transaction costs of moving in and out of the market.  The cost of executing stock orders varies from brokerage to brokerage and with the size of the order, but 2% of the order's value is an average, says Stephen Boesel, manager of T. Rowe Price's Growth and Income mutual fund.  And assuming their first investment is successful, investors will have to pay taxes on their gains.  That can reduce returns by a third or more, once local taxes are included, Mr. Lipper says.  After that, individual traders face the risk that the new investment they choose won't perform well -- so their trading costs could be sustained for nothing.  "It's very tough for most individuals to out-trade the mutual funds or the market," says Mr. Lipper.  "You should really think twice if you think you can out-smart the system."  Then, too, many individual investors lack the sturdy emotional makeup professionals say is needed to plunge in and out of the market.  So what's the best way to buy stocks?  "Unless an individual has a minimum of between $50,000 and $100,000 to invest in stocks, he's still better off in mutual funds than in individual stocks, in terms of getting enough attention from a competent broker," says Mr. Lipper.  Still, he adds, "I could see owning both, given that individuals often have an advantage over big investors in spotting special situations based on their own insights," he adds.  George Douglas, first vice president at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., says that individuals have a particular edge now in "small to medium-size niche companies with exciting earnings prospects" -- a traditional stomping ground for small investors.  This growth sector, which usually carries a price/earnings multiple about twice that of the Standard & Poor's 500, happens to include some of the market's most attractive bargains right now.  "It's now selling at a multiple about even with the market," says Mr. Douglas.  Moreover, Mr. Douglas sees a revival of institutional interest in smaller growth stocks that could boost the performance of these stocks in the medium term.  Many big Wall Street brokerage firms who eliminated their research effort in stocks of emerging growth companies a few years ago are now resuming coverage of this area, he notes.  "We're seeing a real turnaround in interest in small growth stocks," he says.  The pros strenuously advise individuals to stay away from the latest investment fad.  They say that's especially important this late in the growth phase of the economic cycle, when there's no robust bull market to bail investors out of their mistakes.  Friday's correction presents "a pretty good buying opportunity, but let's not speculate at this point in the business cycle," says Carmine Grigoli, chief equity portfolio strategist at First Boston Corp. "Buy stocks on weakness for their long-term fundamentals," he says.  In the long run, investment advisers say, most investors will be better off using the dollar-cost averaging method of buying stocks.  In this method, a person invests a regular amount every month or quarter into the stock market whether the market is up or down.  That cuts the risk, Mr. Gregory, the San Francisco money manager, points out.  "When the market is low, you are buying more shares, and when it's high, you're buying fewer shares," he says.  Otherwise, if you put all your money in at one time, by sheer bad luck, you might pick a terrible time, and have to wait three years to get even, Mr. Gregory says.  A disciplined program will work the best, Mr. Boesel says.  "One of the hardest things to do is to buy stocks when the market is down," he says.  "But's that just the time when you should be buying them."  ---  @ How Investment Returns Stack Up  Compound annual returns, including price changes and income from interest and dividends  @ 63 YEARS 5 YEARS JAN.-JUNE BEST WORST  @ 1926-1988 1984-1988 1989* YEAR YEAR  @Stocks  @(S&P 500) 10.0% 15.4% 16.4% 54.0% -43.3%  @Long-Term  @Treasury Bonds 4.4% 15.0% 13.1% 40.4% - 9.2%  @Cash  @Treasury bills)3.5% 7.1% 4.1% 14.7% 0.0%  @Price  @Inflation 3.1% 3.5% 3.0% .... ....  *Actual performance, not annualized  Source: Ibbotson Associates Inc.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  Gehl Co., initial public offering of two million shares of common stock, of which 1,450,635 shares are being offered by the company and 549,365 shares by holders, via Blunt, Ellis & Loewi Inc. and Robert W. Baird & Co.  Giant Industries Inc., initial public offering of 3,111,000 common shares, of which 2,425,000 will be sold by the company, and the rest by holders, via Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and Hanifen, Imhoff Inc.  Inefficient-Market Fund Inc., initial offering of five million common shares, via Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  Jason Overseas Ltd., initial offering of four million common shares, of which 3.2 million will be sold in the U.S., and the balance outside the U.S., via Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. and Mabon, Nugent & Co.  Donald Trump, who faced rising doubt about his bid for American Airlines parent AMR Corp. even before a United Airlines buy-out came apart Friday, withdrew his $7.54 billion offer.  Separately, bankers representing the group trying to buy United's parent UAL Corp. met with other banks about reviving that purchase at a lower price, possibly around $250 a share, or $5.65 billion.  But a lower bid could face rejection by the UAL board.  Mr. Trump, who vowed Wednesday to "go forward" with the bid, said he was dropping it "in light of the recent change in market conditions."  He said he might now sell his AMR stake, buy more shares, or make another offer at a lower price.  The Manhattan real-estate developer acted after the UAL buyers failed to obtain financing for their earlier $300-a-share bid, which sparked a selling panic among that snowballed into a 190-point drop Friday in the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  News about UAL and AMR, whose shares never reopened after trading was halted Friday for the UAL announcement, sent both stocks nosediving in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  UAL tumbled $56.875 to $222.875 on volume of 2.3 million shares, and AMR declined by $22.125 to $76.50 as 4.7 million shares changed hands.  Together, the two stocks wreaked havoc among takeover stock traders, and caused a 7.3% drop in the Dow Jones Transportation Average, second in size only to the stock-market crash of Oct. 19, 1987.  Some said Friday's market debacle had given Mr. Trump an excuse to bail out of an offer that showed signs of stalling even before problems emerged with the UAL deal.  After reaching an intraday high of $107.50 the day Mr. Trump disclosed his bid Oct. 5, AMR's stock had retreated as low as $97.75 last week.  Some takeover stock traders had been betting against Mr. Trump because he has a record of disclosing stakes in companies that are potential takeover targets, then selling at a profit without making a bid.  "He still hasn't proven his mettle as a big-league take-out artist," said airline analyst Kevin Murphy of Morgan Stanley & Co.  "He's done this thing where he'll buy a little bit of a company and then trade out of it.  He's written this book, `The Art of the Deal.' Why doesn't he just follow through on one of these things?"  Mr. Trump withdrew his bid before the AMR board, which is due to meet tomorrow, ever formally considered it.  AMR had weighed a wide range of possible responses, from flat rejection to recapitalizations and leveraged buy-outs that might have included either employees, a friendlier buyer such as Texas billionaire Robert Bass, or both.  AMR had also sought to foil Mr. Trump in Congress by lobbying for legislation that would have bolstered the authority of the Transportation Department to reject airline buy-outs.  Yesterday, Mr. Trump tried to put the blame for the collapse of the UAL deal on Congress, saying it was rushing through a bill to protect AMR executives.  "I believe that the perception that legislation in this area may be hastily approved contributed to the collapse of the UAL transaction, and the resulting disruption in the financial markets experienced this past Friday," Mr. Trump wrote members of Congress.  AMR declined to comment, and Mr. Trump didn't respond to requests for interviews.  Mr. Trump never said how much AMR stock he had bought, only that his holdings were "substantial."  However, he only received federal clearance to buy more than $15 million of the stock on Sept. 20, when the price rose $2 a share to $78.50.  Between then and his bid on Oct. 5, the price fluctuated between $75.625 and $87.375.  In an attempt to persuade investors that his bid wasn't just "a stock play," Mr. Trump promised last week to notify the market before selling any shares.  AMR was trading at around $84 yesterday before his withdrawal announcement, then immediately fell to about $76.  Assuming that he paid a rough average price of $80 a share, and assuming he didn't sell before his announcement reached the market, Mr. Trump could be sitting with a modest loss with the stock at $76.50.  Some analysts said AMR Chairman Robert Crandall might seize the opportunity presented by the stock price drop to protect the nation's largest airline with a defensive transaction, such as the sale of stock to a friendly holder or company employees.  However, other knowledgeable observers said they believed Mr. Crandall and the AMR board might well decide to tough it out without taking any extra steps.  Some analysts said they believed Mr. Trump, whose towering ego had been viewed by some as a reason to believe he wouldn't back out, might come back with a lower bid.  Ray Neidl of Dillon Read & Co. said Mr. Trump "is stepping back and waiting for the dust to settle.  I'm sure he still wants AMR."  But others remained skeptical.  "I was never sure Donald Trump really wanted to take AMR," said John Mattis, a bond analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  "What happened with United was a gracious way for him to bow out."  Mr. Trump never obtained financing for his bid.  That skepticism would leave him with an even greater credibility problem should he return that would handicap him in any effort to oust the board in a proxy fight.  Meanwhile, Citicorp and Chase Manhattan Corp., the two lead lenders on the UAL buy-out, met with other banks yesterday to determine if they would be willing to finance the buy-out at a lower price.  Officials familiar with the talks said Citicorp had discussed lowering the offer to $250 a share, but said that price was a talking point and that no decision has been made.  At $250 a share, the group would have to borrow about $6.1 billion from banks.  The first UAL deal unraveled after Citibank and Chase couldn't raise $7.2 billion.  Citibank and Chase had agreed to commit $3 billion, and said they were "highly confident" of raising another $4.2 billion.  Together, Citicorp and Chase received $8 million in fees to raise the rest of the financing.  But other banks balked at the low interest rate and banking fees the UAL group was willing to pay them.  Officials familiar with the bank talks said the UAL buy-out group -- UAL pilots, management, and British Airways PLC -- is now willing to pay higher bank fees and interest, but isn't likely to boost its $965 million equity contribution.  Nor is the group likely to come forward with a revised offer within the next 48 hours despite the hopes of many traders.  The group's advisers want to make certain they have firm bank commitments the second time around.  Even if the buy-out group is able to obtain financing, the transaction still faces obstacles.  UAL's board could reject the new price as too low, especially since there aren't any competing bids.  Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis, whose $275-a-share offer was rejected by UAL's board, hasn't shown signs of pursuing a $300-a-share back-up bid he made last month.  In addition, the coalition of labor and management, longtime enemies who joined forces only under the threat of Mr. Davis's bid, could break apart now.  The group's resilience gets its first test today when 30 top pilot union leaders convene outside Chicago in a previously scheduled meeting.  Union Chairman F.C. (Rick) Dubinsky faces the tough task of explaining why banks refused to finance a buy-out the members approved overwhelmingly last week.  The pilot union is vowing to pursue an acquisition whatever the board decides.  But if the board rejects a reduced bid and decides to explore other alternatives, it could transform what has been a harmonious process into an adversarial one.  The pilots could play hardball by noting they are crucial to any sale or restructuring because they can refuse to fly the airplanes.  If they were to insist on a low bid of, say $200 a share, the board mightn't be able to obtain a higher offer from other bidders because banks might hesitate to finance a transaction the pilots oppose.  Also, because UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf and other UAL executives have joined the pilots' bid, the board might be forced to exclude him from its deliberations in order to be fair to other bidders.  That could cost him the chance to influence the outcome and perhaps join the winning bidder.  The White House budget director, prodding Congress to finish work quickly on 1990 budget bills, is trying to put some sting into the little-feared spending cuts that were triggered yesterday under the Gramm-Rudman deficit-reduction law.  To impose "a little bit more discipline" on the budget process, Budget Director Richard Darman said he won't give agencies much flexibility to shift funds among different programs as a means of coping with the law's requirements.  Some government budget experts suggested that Mr. Darman's maneuver doesn't amount to much more than tough talk.  Nevertheless, it may add to pressure on the House to follow the Senate's lead and strip from pending budget legislation scores of costly, extraneous provisions.  House Speaker Thomas Foley met with committee chairmen yesterday to try to move in that direction.  "We are going to try to make an agreement with the Senate that the president would sign," the Washington state Democrat told reporters.  The talks are to continue today.  House Republicans also are reluctant to pare down the 1,878-page measure -- at least until they are guaranteed that the provisions they care about will get another vote.  "A lot of the guys . . . don't want it all to just die," said House GOP leader Robert Michel (R., Ill.).  The House didn't move quickly enough to meet the Gramm-Rudman deadline for passing legislation to bring the projected fiscal 1990 deficit below the $110 billion target.  As the law requires, President Bush yesterday signed an order cutting federal spending across the board by $16.1 billion.  If removed from the budget legislation, the extraneous provisions in the House bill -- including ones to cut capital-gains taxes, provide new aid for child care and repeal the catastrophic-illness insurance program -- could be reintroduced as separate bills.  "What we're trying to explore now is how to protect these other issues," said House Budget Committee Chairman Leon Panetta (D., Calif.).  "We're not going to suddenly abandon them."  Reps.  Foley and Michel had agreed to streamline the deficit-reduction bill before the House even took it up, but Mr. Darman and White House Chief of Staff John Sununu had torpedoed that plan in order to press their fight for a cut in capital-gains taxes.  Congressional leaders rejected suggestions that their attempts to speed the deficit-reduction bill had anything to do with Friday's stock market decline.  "We are responding to our responsibility under the budget act," Rep. Foley said.  Even before the size of yesterday's rebound in stock prices was known, Mr. Darman said that Friday's plunge "would have no significant effect on the budget process."  When the fiscal year began on Oct. 1, the Office of Management and Budget began withholding 4.3% of the Pentagon's money and 5.3% of other agencies' money, as the Gramm-Rudman law requires.  Those cuts, known as a "sequester" in budget jargon, became permanent yesterday, although Congress could cancel or rescind them whenever it wants to.  Under a special provision of the law, the government yesterday began slicing 2% from Medicare payments made to doctors and hospitals.  Nearly two-thirds of all federal spending -- including Social Security payments and salaries of current federal employees -- is exempt from the Gramm-Rudman cuts.  The rest of the government will be pinched, perhaps within a month, if the cut funds aren't restored.  Taking a tough bargaining position, Mr. Darman said he opposes restoring the funds when Congress finally wraps up its work on 1990 spending.  The Gramm-Rudman penalty won't be taken seriously if agencies merely "figure out how to juggle the accounts, trusting that Congress is going to restore all the money a little bit later," he said.  Congressional Democrats were quick to disagree.  Senate Budget Chairman James Sasser (D., Tenn.) insisted, "We don't do the American people any good whatsoever by standing by and letting these automatic cuts go into effect."  To quicken the pain that the spending cuts are intended to inflict, Mr. Darman said the OMB is making the cuts from each individual program, project or activity in the budget.  Until yesterday, OMB had indicated it would cut at the "account" level; each account is comprised of many programs, projects or activities.  Mr. Darman said the new approach will give agencies "less ability to shift from one area to another . . . to fudge over things."  But at least for some major spending programs, government budget experts said, OMB hasn't any significant control of individual programs, projects or activities.  First to suffer from the spending cuts will be programs that spend most of their money on personnel, Mr. Darman said.  He wouldn't predict how long it would be before the first layoffs, if any, occur.  Under the law, President Bush may exempt military personnel accounts from the spending cuts.  He hasn't yet done so.  Mr. Darman also said yesterday that although the administration isn't any longer pushing to include a cut in capital-gains taxes as part of the 1990 budget legislation, the odds are 8-to-5 in favor of winning approval for capital gains taxes this year.  E. Robert Wallach, former personal legal adviser to ex-Attorney General Edwin Meese, was sentenced to six years in prison and fined $250,000 for his role in the Wedtech Corp. scandal.  Mr. Wallach, 55 years old, was convicted in August of racketeering and conspiring to commit fraud.  The charges involved $425,000 in payments he got from Wedtech in return for promising to use his influence with Mr. Meese and other federal officials on behalf of the now-defunct defense contractor.  Though Mr. Wallach's attorney, Gary Naftalis, described the defendant as "a relatively minor player" in the Wedtech political-corruption case, U.S. District Judge Richard Owen strongly disagreed.  At the sentencing in federal court in New York, Judge Owen told Mr. Wallach: "You sold your federal office and the integrity of your federal office for $300,000 before you even got the office."  The money was allegedly paid to Mr. Wallach in anticipation of his being appointed to a top position in the Justice Department, but that appointment was never made.  Wedtech, a minority-owned company in New York City's South Bronx, accounted for the payments as consulting fees, though no services were actually provided, the government charged.  Mr. Wallach's co-defendants, W. Franklyn Chinn and R. Kent London, were also sentenced.  Mr. Chinn, formerly a financial adviser to Mr. Meese, was sentenced to three years and fined $100,000.  Mr. London, who along with Mr. Chinn worked as a financial consultant to Wedtech, was sentenced to five years and fined $250,000.  The defendants, who remain free on bail pending their appeals, would have to serve a third of their sentences before being eligible for parole.  Lawyers for the three defendants have said they plan to appeal.  Before issuing the sentences, Judge Owen criticized Mr. Wallach for a host of alleged ethical and legal improprieties, some of which had nothing to do with the Wedtech case and most of which involved Mr. Meese.  The judge also suggested that Mr. Wallach tried to influence the jury in August when the verdict was being read.  About halfway through the verdict, Mr. London's mother had a seizure and collapsed in the front row of the courtroom.  As court officers sought to get help for the woman, the judge said, Mr. Wallach "charged at the jury and screamed, `You see what you have done.'" The judge said he didn't understand why Mr. Wallach, an experienced trial lawyer, would commit such an outburst, but he said Mr. Wallach may have hoped the jury would be unable to continue with its verdict.  After the sentencing, Mr. Wallach blamed his Wedtech woes on his longtime friendship with Mr. Meese.  He said prosecutors "were looking for a man between Ed Meese and Wedtech. . . .  If they could have gotten Ed Meese that would have been the fulfillment of the dreams."  The defendants also face stiff forfeiture penalties because they were convicted under the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations law.  The judge ordered that the defendants turn over all the money earned through the racketeering enterprise.  For Mr. Wallach, the amount is $425,000.  Mr. London must forfeit $99,000, and Mr. Chinn must forfeit $20,000; together, Mr. Chinn and Mr. London must jointly forfeit an additional $1.14 million.  Mr. Naftalis said Mr. Wallach had been "financially devastated" by the Wedtech scandal.  According to a corrected pre-sentencing report, Mr. Wallach currently has a negative net worth of $273,000.  ---  TEAMSTERS ELECTIONS will be supervised by court-appointed officer.  U.S. District Judge David Edelstein of New York ruled that the elections officer will play an extensive role in all phases of the International Brotherhood of Teamsters' 1991 election of top union officials.  The government hailed the ruling as a major victory in its quest to achieve broad reforms in the union, particularly the election of top officials by the rank and file.  But Teamsters counsel James Grady claimed that the power bestowed upon the court-appointed officer was a departure from the terms of the union's agreement with the government earlier this year.  Mr. Grady added that to fund the type of supervision Judge Edelstein described would cost the union at least $3.5 million.  In March, the Teamsters agreed to a settlement of civil racketeering charges brought by the U.S. attorney's office in Manhattan.  In its suit, the government claimed organized crime figures had routinely picked top union officials.  Under the settlement terms, union leaders agreed that a court-appointed administrator, investigator and elections official would oversee union activities for three years.  Also, the union agreed to pay all expenses related to the officers' oversight.  But in his first progress report, filed two weeks ago, Administrator Frederick B. Lacey revealed some disagreements over the scope of such oversight, the interpretation of the settlement, and financial support.  After the judge's ruling, Mr. Grady said, "We gave up our right to a trial for the terms of the {agreement}, and we believe that anything that modifies those terms is completely inappropriate."  ---  JUDGE'S COMMENTS on homosexual murder victims are scrutinized.  A special master, appointed by the Texas Supreme Court, received evidence yesterday about comments made by Dallas District Judge Jack Hampton in the wake of a murder trial in December.  Judge Hampton sentenced the 18-year-old defendant to 30 years in state prison for killing two homosexual men in a city park.  The judge was then quoted in the Dallas Times Herald as referring to the victims as "queers" and saying "these guys wouldn't have been killed if they hadn't been cruising the streets picking up teen-age boys."  The comments touched off a furor in the Dallas gay community and prompted several complaints about Judge Hampton to the State Commission on Judicial Conduct.  The commission, which could remove Judge Hampton from the bench, will act after reviewing findings to be submitted within two weeks by special master Robert R. Murray of San Antonio.  At a hearing yesterday, Judge Hampton's defense team, which included former Dallas County District Attorney Henry Wade and former U.S. Attorney Jim Rolfe, accused the Times Herald reporter of misquoting the judge.  The defense lawyers also argued that it was appropriate for the judge to consider whether the murder victims were committing a crime at the time they were killed.  But Bill Hornung, general counsel for the judicial-conduct commission, said the defense team was sidestepping the focus of the inquiry -- whether Judge Hampton violated judicial ethics by commenting to the public while a motion for new trial was pending.  "The place where a judge can comment and explain his rationale {for sentencing} is from the bench . . . not in the privacy of a little impromptu press conference," Mr. Hornung said.  ---  SENATE JUDICIARY COMMITTEE gets legislation to limit death-penalty appeals.  Sen. Joseph Biden (D., Del.), committee chairman, proposed legislation that would carry out the streamlining of death-penalty appeals in federal court that was proposed last month by a special task force appointed by Chief Justice of the U.S. William Rehnquist.  Sen. Biden proposed the legislation to comply with a law passed last year requiring the Senate to expedite consideration of proposals made by the task force, led by retired Supreme Court Justice Lewis Powell.  The task force proposed that states provide lawyers to death-row inmates for civil, post-conviction lawsuits, called habeas corpus cases, in which they challenge the constitutionality of their convictions.  In exchange, the number of such lawsuits each inmate may file would be sharply curtailed, allowing states greater certainty of being able to execute those on death row.  When Chief Justice Rehnquist sent the report to Congress, a majority of federal judges on the policy-making Judicial Conference complained they hadn't been given a chance to consider the recommendations.  The legislation introduced by Sen. Biden adopts the same approach as the Powell report: state-provided lawyers, in exchange for limiting appeals.  But the senator's bill eases a number of the restrictions.  Leslie Harris, an American Civil Liberties Union spokeswoman criticized the Powell proposals, but said the Biden legislation is "a more moderate, thoughtful approach," although the group will likely oppose it.  ---  APPLE COMPUTER Inc.'s former general counsel John P. Karalis joined the Phoenix, Ariz., law firm of Brown & Bain.  Mr. Karalis, 51, will specialize in corporate law and international law at the 110-lawyer firm.  Before joining Apple in 1986, he served as general counsel at Sperry Corp.  A surge in sales in August helped trim inventory levels of U.S. businesses, Commerce Department figures show.  Sales at factories, retailers and wholesalers jumped 3.1% in August, the department reported, far outstripping a 0.3% climb in inventories.  As a result, inventories fell back to the equivalent of 1.5 months of sales.  Inventories had been running at about this level -- one that economists regard as manageable -- for much of the year before they jumped to 1.54 months in July.  The numbers are reassuring news for the economy.  If goods on shelves and backlots pile up too high, retailers often cut back on orders and factories on production.  The chain reaction can lead to layoffs and ultimately a recession.  In July, business inventories had climbed 0.9%, a number the department revised from its initial report of 0.6%.  Sales, meanwhile, dropped 0.9%.  In August, business inventories totaled $789.87 billion, while sales grew to $526.79 billion, the department said.  Manufacturers showed the biggest sales gains; their sales rose 5.6%, while factory inventories only grew 0.3%.  Retailers' sales increased 0.7%, as did their inventories.  Wholesalers' sales climbed 1.5%, while their inventories dropped 0.1%.  Here is a summary of the Commerce Department's report on business inventories and sales in in August.  The figures are in billions of dollars, seasonally adjusted:  @ (billions of dollars)  @ August July August  @ 1989 1989 1988  @ Total business inventories .... 789.87 787.58 737.41  @ Manufacturers ............... 371.78 370.80 345.80  @ Retailers ................... 234.43 232.83 215.20  @ Wholesalers ................. 183.65 183.95 176.42  @ Total business sales .......... 526.79 511.14 491.89  @ Inventory/sales ratio ......... 1.50 1.54 1.50  Pall Corp. said it expects a reduction in net income for the first quarter ended Oct. 28 of about $2 million, or five cents a share, as a result of Hurricane Hugo.  The maker of disposable filters said revenue will be reduced about $3 million because of damage done by the hurricane to the company's three plants in Puerto Rico.  In the year-earlier quarter, Pall had net of $8.3 million, or 22 cents a share, on revenue of $100.5 million.  The bulls are back in the art-auction china shops, predicting higher prices and higher volume than ever before.  Christie's and Sotheby's, the two major New York houses, are about to offer a large number of impressionist and modern paintings at estimates unheard of even five years ago.  They are betting that demand for these pictures will be so strong that the market will swallow everything that is thrown at it and prices still will rise -- a lot.  As art dealer Richard Feigen sees it, "There is unlimited money trying to absorb itself in art."  Step right this way.  More than $600 million of impressionist and modern paintings are about to hit the New York auction block -- far outstripping May's four-day $400 million bonanza.  This season Lorinda de Roulet (sister of John Whitney Payson, for whom "Irises" by Vincent van Gogh was sold for $53.9 million in November of 1987, to the Australian Alan Bond, who still hasn't taken possession because he hasn't yet paid off the loan Sotheby's offered him at the sale) has consigned another biggie to Sotheby's.  "Au Lapin Agile" is a 1905 Rose Period Picasso being billed as "the most important 20th-century picture ever to come up for auction."  It may sell for more than any previous Picasso -- the record is $47.85 million set in May for "Self Portrait: Yo Picasso."  Sotheby's also weighs in with the John T. Dorrance Jr. collection of impressionists at an estimated $100 million-plus (to be offered tomorrow) and a juicy assortment of paintings from other sources, more than 35 of which are expected to sell in November for at least $1 million each.  Christie's has snagged the 15 impressionist and modern paintings being pruned from Paul Mellon's vast collection, including the probable $30 million-plus "Rue Mosnier, Paris, Decorated With Flags on June 30, 1878" by Edouard Manet (purchased by Mellon at the Jacob Goldschmidt sale in London in 1958 for $316,400) and a van Gogh, "Trunk of an Old Yew Tree, Arles," estimated at $25 million-plus.  Other one-owner collections include Billy Wilder's more modest but choice offerings, and the George N. Richard collection -- piled on top of Christie's estimated $150 million -- $200 million of other impressionist goodies.  All these will go under the hammer on Nov. 13 and 14.  "A strong art market is bringing out paintings I never expected to see on the market," says David Nash, director of Sotheby's Fine Arts Division.  Some museum directors never expected to see them there either.  But since the 1986 tax laws drastically reduced deductions for the donation of appreciated property and reduced overall tax rates (thereby making deductions less significant), charitable donations to museums, when anyone makes them, are very charitable indeed.  And given the seductive prices held out by the auction houses, the urge to sell can -- and apparently has -- become irresistible.  Of the current group of paintings, it's hard to say which, in the days before tax reform, might have been donated instead of sold.  No museum director will risk offending potential patrons by publicly airing disappointed hopes.  Philadelphia Museum head Anne d'Harnoncourt insists that even though John Dorrance may have been the chairman of her Board of Trustees, "We weren't expecting the pictures we didn't get."  Although Sotheby's points out that it is "an international organization" not specifically concerned with potential losses to American museums, others are up in arms: "Donations have always been the main source of increased museum collections," says Edward H. Able Jr., executive director of the American Association of Museums.  "Now there is a hemorrhaging of this country's patrimony."  According to a study conducted by the Association of Art Museum Directors, the drop in the dollar value of donated works of art since 1986 is more than 50%.  "This is just the tip of the iceberg, because no major collector has died recently," says Christopher Burge, president of Christie's America.  "The next 10 years are going to be a wasteland for American museums."  But not for auction houses.  Their sales have turned into theater for a world audience.  Even before the sales, the hoopla is well under way.  Major attractions have out-of-town tryouts.  "Au Lapin Agile," some of the Mellon paintings, and others went around the world on a series of whistle-stop exhibition tours; Billy Wilder's pictures went to a party at the Beverly Hills Hotel; and the Dorrance paintings hung for five days in the Philadelphia Museum of Art. (Even Sotheby's PR department couldn't have pulled that one off; Dorrance's executors "requested" it.)  At last, however, the warmup is done and the action is about to begin.  And it will soon be clear whether enough people will be raising those little bidding paddles, no matter what the cost.  The weak dollar makes our market a playground for foreign bidders, and our sorry balance of trade has given them plenty of dollars to play with.  "In many ways the Japanese -- particularly Japanese corporations -- dictate art price levels," says Susan Seidel of William Beadleston, a New York private dealing concern.  "They are willing to pay almost anything."  But why art?  Are we talking pure aesthetic appreciation here?  For many buyers, that still is major motivation.  But the stakes are now very high and for your $40 million you can buy only the best of what is available -- which may not be the best there is.  But at least the auction process illustrates so beautifully that everybody else wanted to have it too.  For some, the social status that can be acquired in this way is the point of the game.  "They buy the co-op, they buy the cars," says Ms. Seidel.  "Then they buy `brand names' like Picasso to put on the wall."  But at these price levels, confidence in the "investment" potential of major paintings must be playing a part in fueling the collecting frenzy.  Big-bucks buyers trust that the market will continue its strong surge.  "In October of '87 people saw that everything else went down but art went up," Desmond Corcoran of London's Alex Reid & Lefevre Ltd. gallery points out.  Since then, the market has continued to rise, but now the size of the estimates seems to be making some people nervous.  "Zey are crazee]" shrieked one French dealer, reeling from auction estimate sticker shock.  In a lower key, Mr. Corcoran finds the world "full of strange speculators" and the auction estimates "incredible," and suggests the Dorrance sale as a sort of early warning system: "These pictures are not absolutely top quality," he says.  "So if the market absorbs those, what comes three weeks later will do just fine."  If all goes well, if the Picasso hits $75 million, and Mellon, Dorrance, Wilder and the rest get what they bargained for, the uncomfortable, questioning buzz in the art marketplace will trail off into sighs of relief, only to begin anew slightly louder than before, as the cycle starts over in the spring.  Because for some, the art market has become a sort of magic beanstalk rising into the clouds at a cartoon rate of speed.  Nobody knows what is at the top, but they are hoping it is very far away.  ---  Ms. Berman covers the auction scene.  Motorola Inc. said it will sell its Tegal Corp. unit to a Tegal management group for a sum that wasn't disclosed.  A spokesman for the maker of electronic equipment and semiconductors said Motorola doesn't expect the transaction to have a material impact on earnings.  Tegal, a Petaluma, Calif., supplier to the semiconductor industry, has annual sales of about $55 million.  While investors were keeping a close eye on stock-market indicators yesterday, securities regulators focused on Wall Street's back offices to ensure that customer funds were safe.  Securities and Exchange Commission officials said they called heads of firms, traders and other brokerage staffers to make sure the houses had enough capital and back-office resources to handle the crush of sell orders during the first few hours of trading yesterday.  "We're very concerned about the financial well-being of the firms," said Martin Kuperberg, who runs the SEC's New York broker-dealer unit.  "We've spoken to a number of people both at the {exchanges} and at the firms."  Meanwhile, SEC officials in Washington held a series of discussions with officials from the Treasury, the Federal Reserve, the exchanges, the Commodity Futures Trading Commission and the Council of Economic Advisers to see whether market mechanisms were working properly.  In his first statement since the recent market gyrations began, Richard Breeden, who was sworn in as SEC chairman last week, said the "markets' trading and order routing systems generally operated quite smoothly.  Today's developments demonstrate the value of the significant improvements that have been made in trading systems over the past two years."  Back offices are the huge, behind-the-scenes operations that support the brokerages' sales and trading departments.  Key back-office functions are to organize and maintain securities owned by a firm and its customers and to monitor the firm's capital position.  The default of several Wall Street houses that ran short of liquidity during the 1987 crash is a fresh memory for regulators and the exchanges.  So the SEC recently renewed its attacks on firms that violate back-office regulations.  Two weeks ago, for example, the agency censured Prudential Insurance Co. of America's Prudential-Bache Securities Inc. for failing to adequately keep track of customers' funds.  The move was in part a warning to firms that the SEC will try to crack down on firms if their back offices aren't in order and become a danger in the event of a major market move.  "It notifies the broker-dealer community that we won't tolerate this kind of action," Mr. Kuperberg said.  Separately, the National Association of Securities Dealers dispatched 25 examiners into brokerages' trading rooms to make sure brokers were answering phones and handling customer orders properly.  Two years ago, many market makers refused to answer their phones, creating frustration and losses among investors looking to sell stocks.  "The market-making firms responded pretty well," said Joseph Hardiman, Nasdaq president.  "We've had little to no complaints."  Storage Technology Corp. said it signed a letter of intent to acquire M4 Data Inc. of Britain.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Storage Technology said M4's magnetic tape storage equipment will complement its tape cartridge products.  M4 sells to the original equipment manufacturer market world-wide and has about $20 million in annual sales.  A Storage Technology spokesman said the transaction should be completed in one to two months.  Martha O. Hesse, chairman of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission since 1986, was named senior vice president for corporate affairs, effective about the beginning of next year.  The banking company said her duties will include corporate advertising and investor relations.  ART  Cleveland Museum of Art: "American Cities: The Artist's View" -- Nearly 50 prints, drawings, paintings and photographs dating from the 1850s to the present explore how different artists have interpreted the urban scene.  Included are Joseph Pennell's lithographs of New York City in the 1900s; six black-and-white photos of Cleveland steel mills by Margaret Bourke-White; and Wayne Thiebaud's contemporary views of San Francisco. 11150 East Boulevard.  Through Jan. 7.  Pennsylvania Academy of the Fine Arts, Philadelphia: "Making Their Mark: Women Artists Move Into the Mainstream 1970-85" -- More than 160 works by painters, sculptors and photographers, as well as tapes and documentation by 33 video and performance artists.  Among the artist represented: Laurie Anderson, Alice Aycock, Nancy Graves and Elizabeth Murray.  Broad and Cherry Streets, Oct. 20Dec. 31.  Metropolitan Museum, New York: "Gold of Africa: The Barbier-Mueller Collection" showcases a king's ransom of West African artifacts culled from a renowned Swiss collection.  The 130 objects on display range from a whimsical bestiary of gilded sword ornaments to the dazzling raiment of Ghanaian rulers. 82nd St. and Fifth Ave.  Through March 11.  Cavin-Morris Gallery, New York: "Gregory Van Maanen" -- Many of the forceful, heavily symbolic images of this self-taught artist were partly inspired by his service in Vietnam, and carry titles such as "Death in Flight" and "Germans Are Born With Helmet Shaped Skulls." 100 Hudson St., Oct. 19-Nov. 25.  DANCE  Joffrey Ballet: The company's six-week Manhattan season features a pair of premieres -- "Les Noces," Bronislava Nijinska's celebrated 1923 collaboration with Stravinsky; and "The Pantages and the Palace Present TWO-A-DAY," artistic director Gerald Arpino's salute to vaudeville.  Other highlights include the revival of "Trinity," Mr. Arpino's rock-scored salute to the Sixties, and, beginning Nov. 24, the late Robert Joffrey's version of "The Nutcracker."  City Center, 131 West 55th St., Oct. 24-Dec. 2. (212) 581-7907.  MUSIC  San Diego Opera opens its 25th season with Mussorgsky's "Boris Godunov," featuring five leading singers and a conductor from the Soviet Union. (The opera also opens the San Diego Arts Festival: Treasures of the Soviet Union.) Bass Alexander Morozov of the Leningrad Kirov Opera sings the title role; mezzo soprano Irina Bogacheva is the scheming Polish princess Marina.  Civic Theatre, 3rdand B Streets.  Oct. 21, 24, 27, 29 and 31. (619) 236-6510.  Bel canto tenor Raul Gimenez makes his U.S. recital debut at Alice Tully Hall, (Lincoln Center, 65th and Broadway), Oct. 24.  He then heads for the Lone Star State to make his U.S. opera debut at the Dallas Opera in "Don Pasquale."  Dec. 7, 10, 13 and 16.  Jeff Beck and Stevie Ray Vaughan: For many rock fans, this double bill of the rarely seen British legend Beck and Texas tornado Vaughan will spell guitar heaven: Minneapolis (Northrop Memorial Auditorium), Oct. 25; Milwaukee (Mecca Auditorium), Oct. 27; Chicago (UIC Pavillion), Oct. 28; St. Louis (Fox Theatre), Oct. 29; Columbus, Ohio (Ohio Theatre), Oct. 31; Toronto (Sky Dome), Nov. 2; Detroit (Cobo Arena), Nov. 3; Pittsburgh (Palumbo Center), Nov. 4; Landover, Md. (Capitol Centre), Nov. 6; Philadelphia (Spectrum), Nov. 7; Worcester, Mass. (Centrum), Nov. 8; Manhattan (Madison Square Garden), Nov. 11; Cleveland (Public Hall), Nov. 14; Dayton, Ohio (Hara Arena), Nov. 15; Louisville, Ky. (Louisville Gardens), Nov. 16; Birmingham, Ala. (Boutwell Auditorium), Nov. 18; Atlanta (Omni), Nov. 19; Miami (The Arena), Nov. 21; Tampa (Sundome), Nov. 22; Houston (Sam Houston Arena), Nov. 24; Dallas (State Fair Coliseum), Nov. 25; Austin (Frank Irwin Center), Nov. 26; Albuquerque, N.M. (Tingley Arena), Nov. 28; Denver (McNichols Arena), Nov. 29; Los Angeles (Sports Arena), Dec. 1; Oakland, Calif. (Oakland Coliseum), Dec. 3.  Being the No. 2 newspaper in town just got tougher.  The Dallas Morning News, the No. 1 paper in town, has secured exclusive rights here to Universal Press Syndicate's features, including 26 previously carried by its struggling rival, the Dallas Times Herald.  The News agreed to pay a minimum of $100,000 annually for five years for the features, and an unusual $500,000 fee, mostly up front, to keep all current and future Universal offerings for itself in the Dallas area.  The move was a stunning coup, nabbing some of the Times Herald's biggest draws, including "Dear Abby," "Doonesbury," Erma Bombeck's column and "The Far Side."  It also reignited a long-running newspaper war that had cooled last year after closely held DTH Media Inc. bought the Times Herald.  Universal argues that special circumstances led to the agreement.  But if the syndicate's contract with the Morning News survives the Times Herald's court challenge, other second-place newspapers worry that they, too, may see their best features snatched away by bigger, wealthier rivals.  "We're very concerned," says Tom King, the editor and president of the El Paso Herald-Post, a Scripps Howard newspaper that competes with a Gannett Corp. paper.  "It certainly looks like it could lead to bidding wars."  One effect, syndicate executives say, is that some newspapers in competing markets are considering seeking long-term contracts for their favorite features instead of the usual pacts that let the syndicate cancel with 30 to 90 days' notice.  For smaller newspapers, syndicated features can be crucial.  Industry executives say the columns and cartoons give newspapers consistency and build fierce reader loyalty.  "I have people tell me that Garfield is the only reason they read the {Arkansas} Gazette," says Walter E. Hussman, the publisher of the competing Arkansas Democrat.  Syndicates have traditionally turned down fatter fees from competitors, switching only when a newspaper dropped a feature or some unusual ownership change occurred.  In 1984, the Boston Herald stole about 10 features from the bigger Boston Globe, but only after the Herald's owner, Rupert Murdoch, bought the features' syndicator.  In 1977, Universal pulled its features from the now-defunct Philadelphia Bulletin because of a contract dispute and because "there was no growth {there} for Universal," says John McMeel, president and co-owner of Universal.  Growth was also a consideration in Dallas.  The Times Herald's circulation had been slipping for several years, and its audited daily circulation now stands at 222,000, compared with the Morning News's 370,000.  But the main reason for the move, Mr. McMeel says, is a joint venture between Universal and A.H. Belo Corp., the Morning News's parent and the owner of five television stations.  Plans call for the two to explore TV programming drawn from the syndicate's and others' characters, as well as to develop TV ads for newspapers using Universal's characters.  Universal says that it wanted all its creators to share in the television venture and Belo wouldn't promote features appearing in its competition.  Belo declined comment, citing the litigation.  The Times Herald charges that the venture is a smokescreen, created to hide the News's plan to buy the features away.  "We're very skeptical of a venture in which no one has invested a dollar, in which no one has any experience in syndicating animated features and game shows and for which there was not prior {market} research," says Roy E. Bode, the Times Herald's editor.  Some syndicate executives apparently prefer not to discuss the episode in public.  Willard Colston, chairman of the Los Angeles Times Syndicate and program director of the National Features Council, wanted the group to sponsor a panel discussion on the pact at its annual meeting in Dallas last week.  Initially a majority of the directors, made up of syndicate executives, editors, cartoonists and columnists, supported the idea.  But Universal's Mr. McMeel, the council's president, asked directors to reconsider, and they voted down the discussion 13-12, Mr. Colston says.  Meanwhile, the Times Herald is just hoping to survive this latest blow.  A Houston state district judge refused to enjoin the syndicate from moving the features, and the Morning News began running most of them a few weeks ago.  A trial on breach of contract and antitrust charges isn't expected for a few months.  Mr. Bode acknowledges that some subscriptions have been canceled.  The Universal-Morning News deal also troubles syndicated writers and artists, who fear that they won't get their cut from this new type of exclusivity payment. (Creators of syndicated features generally receive about half the fee a newspaper pays for their work.) Mr. McMeel says some of the exclusivity payment fee will be used for future development of features and promises that those whose work appears in the Morning News will see "substantial immediate increases" in pay.  But he concedes that they haven't been notified yet.  The uncertainty already has some in the business plotting new strategy.  Arnold Schwartzman, a Dayton, Ohio, lawyer who has represented about 50 writers and artists, says that any new contract or renewal he negotiates will require that special payments be shared with his clients.  "It's not something I'm considering; it'll become part of my boilerplate," he says.  Insurance-industry consultant Benjamin Zycher's attack on Proposition 103, the landmark insurance-reform initiative approved by Californians last November ("Insurance Fraud, California Style," Oct. 9) is much like the industry's unsuccessful $80 million campaign against the measure: distorted and often dishonest.  Prop 103 eliminates many barriers to competition in the industry, including the insurers' unjustified exemption from the antitrust laws.  Insurers are permitted to share some historical-claims data in order to enhance the competitiveness of small companies.  Mr. Zycher says the industry doesn't need the exemption; if that's so, why do its lobbyists so bitterly oppose state and federal efforts to eliminate it?  Mr. Zycher also criticizes 103's requirement that auto-insurance rates be based primarily on a motorist's safety record and driving habits rather than upon zip code.  Proposition 103 does not prohibit any use of territorial rating, but requires insurers to justify it scientifically.  So far, they've been unable to do so.  The most controversial provision of 103 requires a 20% rollback in all auto, home and business liability premiums to offset excessive rates -- the product of years of lax regulation and insulation from competition.  Mr. Zycher quotes me as saying something I never said -- that the 20% figure was arbitrary and hence the rollback unjustified.  In fact, simply using the insurers own self-serving profitability standards, the California Insurance Commissioner -- an opponent of 103 -- has already called for more than $800 million in rollbacks.  Hearings to begin this month will allow us to introduce evidence of the industry's inflated reserves, excess surplus, gross waste and inefficiency that will justify more than a 20% rollback.  Insurance-reform efforts are under way in 35 states.  Like Mr. Zycher, the industry's response is to make war against the reformers.  But until the industry acknowledges the reality that reform is necessary, it will remain its own worst enemy.  Harvey Rosenfield  Voter Revolt  Los Angeles  The nine major domestic auto makers plan to build 10.4% fewer cars in this year's fourth quarter than they built a year ago, with the Big Three accounting for nearly all of the decline.  Continuing a trend that is putting intense pressure on General Motors Corp., Ford Motor Co. and Chrysler Corp., output at Japanese-owned and managed plants will rise 42% from year-earlier levels to an estimated 296,187 cars.  Production at Big Three plants is forecast to fall 17% to 1,402,000 cars.  Some of the decline at the Big Three is production shifted to the "transplants": Diamond-Star Motors Corp. builds cars sold by Chrysler as well as Mitsubishi Motors Corp. Mazda Motor Corp.'s U.S. plant builds cars for its own and Ford dealers.  New United Motor Manufacturing Inc. supplies GM's Chevrolet and Toyota Motor Corp.'s U.S. dealer networks.  The only transplants to drop below 1988 levels are owned by Mazda and Honda Motor Co. Part of the Mazda decline reflects "trying to anticipate what sales" are going to be, said a spokesman.  Mazda also is adding the Mazda 626 car at its Flat Rock, Mich., plant, slowing output.  Honda is accelerating production after retooling its Marysville, Ohio, plant to build the redesigned Accord.  The overall decline in car production is matched by an almost equal drop of 10.6% in expected truck output at GM, Ford, Chrysler and Nissan Motor Corp. Car and truck sales are expected to soften during the remainder of the year from unusually high, incentive-buoyed levels in August and September.  "None of it is a surprise," said Edward Sullivan, vice president of automotive consulting at the WEFA Group, a market analysis firm in Bala Cynwyd, Pa.  "Strong third-quarter sales stole from fourth-quarter sales."  He said schedules at GM, in particular, are still too high given market expectations, which will likely mean some trimming.  But "if the cuts are going to come, they'll have to come pretty soon," he added.  "Once you get into November there's not a whole lot of flexibility."  The recent gyrations in the stock market didn't have any immediate impact on the auto makers' schedules.  "Based on the minimal impact that the 1987 event had on car sales, this little hiccup is unlikely to have any influence," said a Ford spokesman.  Here are industry forecasts for the fourth quarter:  @ CARS  @ 1989 1988 %Chg.  @ GM ........ 773,000 944,253 - 18.1  @ Ford ...... 400,000 447,161 - 10.5  @ Chrysler... 229,000 296,120 - 22.7  @ Honda ..... 85,185 88,310 - 3.5  @ Mazda ..... 52,411 61,473 - 14.7  @ Nissan .... 26,046 25,510 + 2.1  @ Toyota .... 48,000 15,000 +220.0  @ Nummi ..... 43,300 16,239 +166.6  @ DiamStar .. 41,245 2,246  @ Total ..... 1,698,187 1,896,312 - 10.4  @ TRUCKS  @ GM......... 353,500 413,018 - 14.4  @ Ford ...... 349,400 376,783 - 7.3  @ Chrysler... 142,000 165,688 - 14.3  @ Nissan .... 31,746 24,908 + 27.5  @ Total ..... 876,646 980,397 - 10.6  Much of the difference in Chrysler's car output compared with a year ago comes from having two fewer plants; Chrysler's now-shuttered facilities in Kenosha, Wis., turned out 51,000 subcompacts and mid-size cars in the 1988 fourth-quarter before it closed in December.  More than half the decline in Ford's expected car output comes from closing its Escort plant in Wayne, Mich., as of Nov. 22 to prepare for production of the next generation of the popular subcompact.  The plant won't reopen until late February or early March, the company spokesman said.  The lower output will likely mean the subcompacts will lose for the first time since the 1985 model year their distinction as the best-selling car in the U.S.  Honda's Accord, made in the U.S. and Japan, was a close second to Escort in the just-ended 1989 model year.  If Accord were to top the list in 1990, it would be the first vehicle from a foreign auto maker ever to hold that spot.  BRIDGEPORT, Conn. - Christopher Kimball, founder, president and publisher of Cook's magazine, said he is leaving the magazine by year end to launch a new men's consumer magazine.  The new magazine, whose name Mr. Kimball won't reveal, will be a service magazine "at its core," covering subjects such as health, clothing, food, travel and gifts for women.  Mr. Kimball said he will launch the magazine as a bi-monthly in September 1990 with 250,000 circulation.  Mr. Kimball said he will be a partner in the magazine with an "experienced" editor, whose name will be revealed later.  Mr. Kimball started Cook's, a glossy epicurean magazine, in 1979 and it was purchased in 1983 by the New Yorker Magazine.  The New Yorker's parent, Advance Publications Inc., sold it to Sweden's Bonnier Magazine Group in 1986.  The magazine is now published by Pennington Publishing, a subsidiary of Bonnier based in Bridgeport, Conn.  It has 200,000 circulation.  As stocks recovered, the U.S. dollar rebounded, but bond prices plunged and Treasury bill rates soared.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average's 88.12-point bounce back from Friday's 190-point dive helped calm investor fears of a financial Armageddon.  However, gold prices rose despite the dollar's resilience, reflecting continued nervousness about the markets' manic behavior.  Early yesterday, strategists at several investment firms, including Merrill Lynch and Dean Witter Reynolds, urged customers to buy stocks and cut back on bonds.  Treasury bond prices dropped the most for any single day in more than two months.  The 30-year bond lost 1 3/4 points, or $17.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  Treasury bill rates, which fell nearly three-quarters of a percentage point Friday as investors sought a safe haven from plunging stocks, jumped more than half a percentage point yesterday.  "Investors had expected the worst from the stock market, and so they piled into government bonds last Friday," said Steven Einhorn, chairman of the investment policy committee at Goldman, Sachs & Co.  "But when we didn't get the worst, there was some movement out of bonds and back into stocks" yesterday.  Mr. Einhorn early yesterday told Goldman traders and salesmen that he recommends investors increase their stock holdings.  Speculation that the Federal Reserve stands ready to act as a safety net for the financial system helped restore investor confidence yesterday, said Mitchell Shivers, president of Kleinwort Benson Government Securities Inc.  Many investment managers expect the Fed to ease credit further in coming weeks to bolster the economy.  In major market activity:  Bond prices plummeted, reversing Friday's big gains.  The yield on the Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue rose to 7.97%.  The dollar bounced back in the currency markets.  In New York very late yesterday, it was quoted at 141.80 Japanese yen and 1.8685 West German marks, up from 141.50 yen and 1.8655 marks late Friday.  Despite turmoil created by a costly S&L bailout and the growing realization that a government guarantee may become a taxpayer liability, some members of Congress are insistent on using tax dollars as collateral for risky and unnecessary government-backed deals.  This appears to be the case with the Federal Housing Administration's mortgage guarantee program.  A program created to assist low- to moderate-income people, it may soon be expanded to accommodate much higher loan amounts for well-to-do home purchasers.  The FHA now holds a 50% share of the mortgage insurance market, while mismanagement prevails throughout the agency.  The General Accounting Office has just completed an FHA financial audit showing a loss of $4.2 billion for fiscal 1988.  Significant losses are also expected for the fiscal year just ended.  Congress should not consider any expansion of FHA until a comprehensive, proven plan for FHA solvency and reform is established.  Ignoring the FHA losses, a few of my colleagues have pushed for expansion of FHA mortgage guarantees by including wealthier home purchasers in the program.  The National Affordable Housing Act (Cranston-D'Amato), introduced earlier this year, erases the current mortgage guarantee ceiling of $101,250 and places a "floating cap" at 95% of the median home price in higher-cost areas.  While it increases FHA loan-guarantee amounts, this bill also calls for the reduction of down-payment requirements.  Legislation of this nature can be likened to fueling a runaway locomotive headed in the wrong direction.  Studies consistently show, and the GAO has admitted, that increasing loan-to-value ratios -- making higher loans without higher down-payment requirements -- increases the risk of default.  Taxpayers will be saddled with a tremendous financial burden if these fundamental data are not heeded.  Recently, a Senate Appropriations bill similarly removed the current FHA mortgage guarantee ceiling and increased it to 95% of the median home price in higher-cost areas.  This provision would have nearly doubled FHA loan exposure in skyrocketing markets where median home prices can range to $200,000 or more.  Out of concern for the potentially damaging effects of this proposal, and still awaiting the GAO report on FHA losses, I suggested the Senate instead work on ways to eliminate or substantially curtail this vast loan-guarantee expansion.  After several hours of floor debate and three roll-call votes, we reached a compromise, placing the FHA loan-guarantee ceiling at $124,875.  Although my desire to retain the present ceiling was exceeded by $23,625, a firm limit on loan guarantees did provide some consolation in the face of allowing a haphazard floating cap to remain in the bill.  Not only is such an FHA expansion risky, it is also a direct government intrusion into a market already served by private mortgage insurers.  Private mortgage insurers also happen to be solvent.  Yes, they have higher down-payment requirements.  But people who can afford payments on a $200,000 home should be expected to put more money down.  It would be difficult to explain to average American workers that their tax dollars were being used to guarantee mortgages on $200,000 homes.  If an FHA expansion is such a great idea, why not have the federal government guarantee all home mortgages?  Congress cannot expect taxpayers to continue bearing the burden of well-intended government guarantees.  When Congress increased federal deposit insurance to $100,000 from $40,000, it seemed like a good idea.  It gave the appearance of a more stable financial industry.  It was easy to extend a government guarantee to cover apparent problems.  But postponing problems soon gave way to a nightmarish taxpayer bailout to the tune of over $200 billion.  The problems surrounding the FHA must be addressed.  Significant reforms must be made.  The high-risk venture of unnecessarily expanding FHA mortgage guarantees without reform is ludicrous.  ---  Sen. Nickles (R., Okla.) sits on the Appropriations and Budget committees.  (See related story: "The Home Builders' Wish-List" -- WSJ Oct. 17, 1989)  Your James P. Sterba thought that our James P. Sterba was an impostor? ("Will the Real Jim Please Stand Up?"  Leisure & Arts, Sept. 27.) How preposterous] I always thought your Sterba was the charlatan.  But wait, perhaps the two Sterbas are one and the same.  Or are they two manifestations of the one?  But that gets too philosophical, and since there are no libraries in New York City either, who can solve the riddle of the two Sterbas?  Seems to me, empirical verification is indeed needed.  Jurgen Brauer  Visiting Faculty Fellow  University of Notre Dame  Notre Dame, Ind.  The dollar rose yesterday but careened like a roller-coaster in a market that traders described as volatile, confused and at times frightening.  And while the U.S. currency recovered much of the lost ground from its collapse on Friday, several dealers contend that its potential to climb further could be limited.  In late New York trading, the dollar stood at 1.8685 West German marks and 141.80 yen, compared with 1.8655 marks and 141.50 yen late Friday.  The British pound declined to $1.5755 from $1.5840 before the weekend.  In early trading in Tokyo Tuesday, the U.S. currency was changing hands at about 142.15 yen, up from Tokyo's Monday close of 140.74 yen, and at about 1.8665 marks, down a bit from late trading Monday in New York.  At times on Monday, the dollar followed the Dow Jones Industrial Average like a dog on a leash, but only so far.  "Trading in dollar/mark looked like the Dow's shadow, to a point," said Jeffrey M. Mondschein, managing director in charge of foreign-exchange operations at Continental Bank in Chicago.  He said the U.S. currency was having difficulty rising above the 1.87-mark level.  "If you take away the stock-market brouhaha of the last few days, you still have lower {U.S.} interest rates, lower {U.S.} capacity utilization, and concern about quarterly earnings and general economic strength -- or lack thereof," said Mr. Mondschein, "so you wonder what the level of the dollar should be."  Moreover, forecasters predict that the trade deficit for August, to be released today, will worsen to more than $9 billion from $7.6 billion the previous month.  The dollar's bumpy journey began late Sunday night in Far Eastern trading where panic selling in a thin market initially pushed it as low as 1.8305 marks and 139.10 yen.  By the end of trading in Tokyo, the dollar was quoted at 1.8470 and 140.73 yen.  But the real fireworks began in European and early New York activity where traders were whipsawed by an inaccurate report of the stock market's opening and a statement by Federal Reserve Board Chairman Alan Greenspan.  Initially, Reuters reported that the Dow Jones Industrial Average opened down 4%, instead of the actual 0.7% decline.  The mistake was quickly corrected.  But the news prompted traders to dump dollars and then almost immediately buy them back.  On its rebound, the dollar soared from about 1.8480 marks to 1.8735, or 1.4%, within two-and-a-half minutes.  A spokesman for Reuters in New York confirmed there was an error and that it was quickly corrected.  Nonetheless, Peter Stein, a trader at Commerzbank in Frankfurt, said: "It's crazy; it's absolute madness."  Later, news wires reported that Mr. Greenspan said a speech he delivered last week in Moscow had been misinterpreted.  At the time, many traders took it to be a signal that the Fed wouldn't lower interest rates to weaken the dollar, and that the U.S. was at odds with its major trading partners in seeking to stabilize a high-flying U.S. currency at a lower level.  The dollar promptly fell nearly two pfennig to 1.8560.  "It was up and down, up and down, up and down," said Marcus Croonen, a trader at DG Bank in Frankfurt.  "It was a bad day."  Indeed, the dollar dropped 4.4% against the mark from its highs on Friday to its Sunday night lows only to shoot back up 2.4% to its high point yesterday.  During the hectic activity, traders said the Danish and Italian central banks intervened to defend their respective currencies against the strengthening mark.  Roberto Bianchi, a vice president at Union Bank of Switzerland, described the market's mood as confused.  "Everybody keeps repeating that it's OK, it's not the same as 1987, the central banks stand ready to stabilize the market, and yet there is a lot of uncertainty."  Mr. Bianchi said some big European institutional investors were selling dollars in lots of $100 million to $200 million.  "Investors who had been in dollars for a long time got out.  That led to nervousness in the trading room," said Mr. Bianchi.  Yet Heiko Thieme, an investment strategist for Deutsche Bank in New York, contended that Europeans hadn't purchased many American shares this year.  Even so, he's bullish.  "In my view, the dollar isn't vulnerable at all.  On a fundamental basis, I'm not afraid about the dollar, which runs more of a risk of being too strong than too weak," said Mr. Thieme.  He expects the U.S. trade deficit to keep improving and the U.S. economy to expand at 2% to 2.5% next year.  "The recession fears are overdone and inflation hysteria totally unfounded," Mr. Thieme argued.  He also said that at about 3% of the total output of goods and services, the U.S. budget deficit is manageable.  Thus, with little risk of losing profits through a deteriorating currency, "what you have here is a unique buying opportunity," said Mr. Thieme of the U.S. stock market.  George Kuster, a manager at Gulf & Occidental Investment S.A. in Geneva, agrees but only to a point.  Unlike October 1987, "this time I was laughing.  I'm convinced that this {stock market} is going to go up," he said.  Nonetheless, Mr. Kuster added: "I don't trust the U.S. market that much" because of the dollar's volatility.  "My clients lost a lot of money in the 1970s because of the dollar, so I can afford not to gain" from U.S. equities.  Instead, the Swiss money manager sees better opportunities in the Japanese, West German and French markets.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery rose $4 to $367.30 an ounce in moderate trading.  Estimated volume was 4.5 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Tuesday, gold was quoted at about $366.27 an ounce, down $2 an ounce from Monday.  In all the finger-pointing in the wake of Friday's stock-market plunge, you'd think the Transportation Department, of all agencies, would be safe.  Look again.  Some people on Wall Street -- and even some in the Bush administration -- think that Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner may have played a second-hand role in the stock slide.  His drumbeat of warnings on the perils of airline leveraged buy-outs, this theory goes, spooked major banks out of bankrolling the buy-out of UAL Inc.  And that, in turn, sent the market into Friday's tailspin.  Mr. Skinner's LBO comments "probably helped discourage some of the banks from participating" in the UAL deal, says Louis Marckesano, airline analyst for Janney Montgomery Scott Inc., a Philadelphia brokerage house.  "The government is putting its nose where it doesn't belong, and Skinner is at the head of the pack."  Many others -- indeed, most industry officials and members of Congress -- absolve Mr. Skinner, saying that the UAL deal was flawed from the start.  But whether he single-handedly sparked the crash or had nothing to do with it, one thing is clear in the aftermath of the price slide: Sam Skinner, by his repeated jawboning on the buy-out issue, has irritated some in the Bush administration, so much so that some White House officials want to rein him in.  Yesterday, for example, the administration came out in opposition to legislation to strengthen the Transportation Department's hand in blocking leveraged buy-outs -- despite statements by Mr. Skinner to Congress that suggested he looked favorably on it, without explicitly endorsing it.  Moreover, administration officials say that Office of Management and Budget Director Richard Darman, Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady, Council of Economic Advisers Michael Boskin and U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills all have had problems with Mr. Skinner's jawboning.  Secretary Skinner, for his part, says "it's silly" to blame him for the market crash.  "The banks in this country and in Japan couldn't put the financing together on the terms offered," he said in a telephone interview from Detroit, where he was speaking to the Economic Club of Detroit.  "They have the same kind of questions that I raised about the financial aspects of the transaction."  At the very least, the administration has been sending mixed signals about leveraged buy-outs and foreign ownership of U.S. airlines.  Last month, Mr. Skinner forced Northwest Airlines to reduce a stake held by KLM Royal Dutch Airlines to ensure, he said, that the foreign airline wouldn't illegally control Northwest.  But it isn't clear how he would treat other leveraged buy-outs.  Each deal, he insists, must be handled separately, on a "case-by-case" basis.  That gives Mr. Skinner lots of wiggle room, but critics say it doesn't provide a clear picture to the business community of what would pass government muster.  "It's a regulatory scandal," says Timothy Pettee, a Merrill Lynch & Co. airline analyst, who contends that the lack of clear standards raises the specter of inconsistent decision-making and unfair treatment.  Mr. Skinner says he hasn't spelled out a policy for leveraged buy-outs because Wall Street bankers and lawyers would simply find ways to circumvent it.  But others say Mr. Skinner is gagged until the Economic Policy Council, a cabinet-level group that makes decisions on national economic issues, finishes its ruminations on the issue.  The group is scheduled to discuss airline buy-outs again today.  But although the administration has yet to reach a decision on airline buy-outs, President Bush and Treasury Secretary Brady in general don't have philosophical problems with leveraged buy-outs or foreign investment involving non-airline companies, and don't appear inclined to block them.  Mr. Bush hasn't yet focused on the airline buy-out question.  The buy-out issue is politically and financially complex because of two separate but intertwining questions -- foreign ownership and debt levels.  Foreign companies are barred by law from holding more than 25% voting stock, or exerting actual control, over U.S. airlines.  Under the original Northwest Airlines bid, KLM would have contributed 57% of the equity but received only 5% of the voting stock.  The Transportation Department concluded that was a violation of the spirit, if not the letter, of the law, and persuaded Northwest to restructure the deal.  Among other things, the Economic Policy Council is discussing the department's interpretation of the law.  It appears that some leading administration officials believe the Northwest decision leaves the U.S. open to charges of protectionism and could undermine the U.S. position in international trade talks.  Mr. Skinner, they complain, went too far in defining "control" by American citizens and should be discouraged from applying the same reasoning to future buy-outs.  Mr. Skinner plays down any rift in the administration on the foreign-ownership question.  "I think that Darman, Brady, Boskin and I all have the same basic understanding of the importance of foreign investment in this country," he said yesterday.  "And they all understand I have a statutory duty to enforce safety and existing law regarding foreign ownership."  He and other department officials argue that it would be foolish to open U.S. markets to foreign carriers through investments, when other countries are blocking expanded service by American carriers overseas.  The debt issue also is contentious.  Mr. Skinner says he is concerned that heavily leveraged airlines may be so stretched for funds that safety will suffer.  "I have to make sure that every company spends the right amount on maintenance," he says.  But some experts say that there isn't a correlation between an airline's debt load and its safety record.  "No systematic link between finances and safety has ever been demonstrated," says Michael Levine, dean of the Yale University School of Organization and Management and formerly a top official with the Civil Aeronautics Board.  Mr. Skinner satisfied his safety concerns on the Northwest deal by requiring the airline to file certain financial information that could affect safety, including maintenance expenditures.  But now he is under pressure by some in Congress to extend those reporting requirements to other debt-laden airlines that haven't been involved in recent buy-outs.  A final dispute involved in the leveraged buy-out issue is how much authority the Transportation Department should have in dealing with LBOs.  Several members of Congress, generally delighted with Mr. Skinner's activist approach to buy-outs, want the department to be able to block the deals before they become final.  But the administration told lawmakers yesterday that it opposed the legislation, saying the government already has enough authority.  Currently, however, the Transportation Department's authority over leveraged buy-outs appears to some to be a case of too much, too late.  The department doesn't have prior-review authority.  In addition, if it can't persuade a company to restructure an unacceptable buy-out plan, its only recourse is to revoke the airline's certificate -- in effect grounding the carrier.  That, says House Aviation Subcommittee Chairman James Oberstar, a Minnesota Democrat, is like "using a howitzer to go deer hunting."  In a sign of its continuing problems in the U.S. auto market, General Motors Corp. acknowledged that a key midsized-car plant will shut down for two weeks to cut bulging inventories of Pontiac Grand Prix models.  Meanwhile, GM Chairman Roger B. Smith said it should be "no surprise" the auto maker is moving to close permanently more North American assembly plants.  At an Economic Club of Detroit luncheon, Mr. Smith said announcements last week that indicated at least three and perhaps five more GM plants in the U.S. and Canada may close by the early 1990s reflect "a carefully conceived, calculated and executed strategic plan."  Mr. Smith said GM is looking for ways to save some of the five older plants targeted last week.  "I'm hoping we'll need another plant for the APV," a new plastic-bodied minivan now being assembled at a single plant in Tarrytown, N.Y., he said.  However, Mr. Smith said that as a result of a $70 billion factory-modernization program undertaken over the last decade, "we can produce more in the new plants than we could in the old plants."  But GM is also struggling with a steep decline in U.S. car-market share that wasn't part of the company's strategic plans when it began the modernization program.  The latest evidence of that is the decision to idle the Fairfax, Kan., plant that makes the Grand Prix less than three weeks into the new model year.  The Grand Prix is one of GM's newest lines of cars, the so-called GM-10 midsized cars.  This fall, GM introduced the first four-door versions of the cars -- a move that was supposed to spur sales of the models, which have been disappointing so far.  But GM officials confirmed they will close the Fairfax plant for two weeks beginning Oct. 30 because of slow sales, bringing to 10 the number of weeks it will have been closed since early June.  U.S. car dealers had a 92-day supply of the cars at the end of September, according to industry trade publication Wards Automotive Reports.  That's about 50% higher than the 60-to-65-day supply considered normal in the industry.  Union officials at the Fairfax plant said the company is studying the feasibility of giving the plant another product to build, contrary to GM's original plan.  Company officials declined to comment on this issue, calling the talk "speculation."  Louisiana-Pacific Corp. and Pope & Talbot Inc. posted strong third-quarter profit gains, citing continued strong demand and firm prices in the forest-products business.  Louisiana-Pacific reported a 40% increase in net income to $51.5 million, or $1.34 a share, from $36.8 million, or 97 cents a share, the year earlier.  Sales in the period increased about 10% to $510.1 million from $462.9 million.  Harry A. Merlo, chairman and president, credited strong demand for plywood and other building products.  The record results came despite a decline in operating results for the company's pulp business, he added.  This was due in large measure to a drought-related production curtailment at its Ketchikan, Alaska, pulp mill.  For the nine months, the company posted a 34% gain in net to $139.8 million, or $3.66 a share, from $104.1 million, or $2.73 a share.  The company said it had an 11% sales increase to $1.50 billion from $1.35 billion the year earlier. (The company's 1988 results don't include a non-recurring gain on the final settlement of the Redwood National Park condemnation in 1988's first quarter.)  Pope & Talbot said healthy demand and prices, especially for consumer products, led to a 55% increase in third-quarter net to $13.2 million, or $1.11 a share, from $8.5 million, or 71 cents a share.  The 1989 results include a gain of $3.5 million, or 29 cents a share, on the sale of a sawmill.  Sales in the quarter rose 20% to $162.1 million from $135.3 million.  For the nine months, the company posted profit of $33.8 million, or $2.86 a share, including the gain on the sawmill's sale.  That was up 45% from $23.3 million, or $1.95 a share, the year earlier.  Nine-month sales grew 26% to $471.1 million from $373 million.  Looking ahead, Pope & Talbot said it expects all of 1989 to be a record year.  Louisiana-Pacific said fourth-quarter performance is usually hampered by weather-related construction slowdowns, but that "many positive factors" should help the period's results.  Some nervous market makers in Nasdaq over-the-counter stocks lowered prices severely at the start of trading in response to Friday's sell-off.  The markdowns were excessive, some traders groused, and indeed the market closed lower despite heavy buying of its leading technology stocks.  After plummeting nearly 19 points almost immediately after trading began, the Nasdaq Composite Index staged a comeback, but still closed off 6.31, or 1.4%, at 460.98.  Volume was an astonishing 242.8 million shares, 33% more than the turnover on May 19, which had been this year's busiest day.  Many observers said yesterday afternoon that the price-slashing by some market makers during the last hour of trading Friday and before the market opened yesterday was overdone.  It was, they said, a factor in why the market didn't rally as strongly as the biggest New York Stock Exchange issues.  The Dow Jones industrials rose 3.4%.  "Bids were lowered too much," said Gary Rosenbach, a market maker and manager of equity trading at Needham & Co.  On Friday, the market makers, who must be prepared to buy stock when no one else will, were frantically cutting the prices at which they would take stocks off sellers' hands, in reaction to plunging prices on the New York Stock Exchange, according to Mr. Rosenbach.  Yesterday, they again lowered their bids before trading began, in anticipation of another wave of selling.  Joseph Hardiman, president of the National Association of Securities Dealers, which oversees trading on Nasdaq, said that between 9 a.m. and 9:30 a.m., the market's Small Order Execution System was deluged with six times the normal volume of quotation updates from market makers and had to be shut down for nearly 25 minutes after trading began so computers could digest the data.  Mr. Hardiman said the system received about 102,000 updated quotes by 10 a.m., compared with 20,000 normally.  He said total volume on the system, used for trades of 1,000 shares or less by non-professional investors, was 2.5 times busier than usual.  But, Mr. Hardiman wasn't complaining.  "It meant that market makers were dynamically updating their quotes, rather than sitting there frozen."  Market makers defended their actions.  They said it was reasonable to expect a rash of selling and to lower prices in anticipation of it.  "Market makers saw sell orders first and that's why they (lowered bids)," said Brian Finnerty, a Shearson Lehman Hutton market maker.  "The buyers sat back and didn't come in until a half hour or 45 minutes later."  E.E. "Buzzy" Geduld, president of Herzog, Heine, Geduld, a giant market-making firm, said, "Stocks looked ugly at 9:30.  It was shades of October 1987 until it turned and stabilized at about 11:30.  Nobody made a fortune on this market."  Some of the biggest stocks were snapped up by bargain hunters and fared much better.  Intel rose 1 1/4 to 33 on 3.7 million shares.  Tele-Communications gained 1 to 19 5/8 on 3.7 million shares.  MCI Communications added 1 1/2 to 45 on 5.6 million shares.  Apple Computer advanced 1 to 46 3/4 on 3.8 million shares.  Microsoft jumped 2 1/4 to 75 3/4 on 1.8 million shares.  But Sun Microsystems eased 1/4 to 17 1/4 on 3.6 million shares and Lotus Development was unchanged at 29 7/8.  The result was that the Nasdaq 100 Index of the big non-financial issues rose 0.56, to 449.89.  The biggest financial issues, tracked by the Nasdaq Financial Index, weren't as popular, falling 6.90, to 456.08.  There was some favorable takeover news, in stark contrast to Friday, when nervousness about the future of leveraged buy-outs hurt takeover-related issues.  National Pizza said it signed a definitive agreement to acquire Skipper's for $11.50 a share.  The company said the acquisition, valued at about $31.3 million, is subject to the condition that at least two-thirds of the Skipper's shares outstanding are tendered.  National Pizza also said it settled its dispute with PepsiCo's Pizza Hut unit that had threatened to scuttle the proposed acquisition.  Skipper's rose 1/2 to 11 and National Pizza was unchanged at 17.  Among other takeover-related issues, LIN Broadcasting fell 2 3/4 to 104 3/4.  McCaw Cellular Communications, a LIN suitor, rose 1 1/4 to 41 1/4.  The biggest percentage advancer was Grayhound Electronics, which jumped 73%, or 7 3/8, to 17 1/2.  The stock rose after Grayhound said it agreed to enter into a five-year joint venture with Lermer Corp., a maker of airline-interior equipment.  Soviet leader Mikhail Gorbachev wants to bring the nation's reformist press back into line, blaming it for contributing to the many problems he faces and even suggesting that one liberal editor resign.  Mr. Gorbachev's comments, made at a meeting with Soviet national editors and media executives Friday, indicate his growing frustration with the nation's mounting problems.  According to people who attended, he didn't advocate an end to glasnost, his policy of openness.  But he made clear that the press should show greater responsibility in its reporting and cut back on criticism of his reforms.  The text of his remarks hasn't been published, and editors say they have no instructions as to whether it will be.  Accounts of previous such meetings with media and other groups have been printed, sometimes after a delay of several days.  Although glasnost has given the government-controlled media here much greater freedom to report and criticize, Mr. Gorbachev and other Soviet leaders still regard newspapers and TV as important propaganda tools they can use at will.  According to participants at the meeting and Soviet journalists who were later briefed by their editors, Mr. Gorbachev blamed the press for fueling a nationwide mood of despondency.  In particular, he complained about some articles this summer that openly discussed the possibility of a coup or civil war in the Soviet Union, and accused the media of fueling panic buying of goods by printing stories about impending shortages.  He singled out the daily Izvestia and the weekly Argumenty i Fakty, and also gave stinging criticism of Yuri Afanasyev, a leading reformist historian who has written articles attacking the Communist Party.  Among other things, Mr. Gorbachev questioned whether Mr. Afanasyev should remain in the party.  The meeting lasted a little under two hours and was attended by most members of the ruling Politburo.  There was no other speaker apart from the Soviet leader, and those attacked weren't given the opportunity to defend themselves.  Mr. Afanasyev, who isn't an editor, didn't attend.  According to participants, Mr. Gorbachev was particularly incensed by an article on the front page of Argumenty i Fakty this month that examined the popularity of members of the Soviet Parliament.  The piece was based on a survey of 1,500 readers' letters and contained some criticism of Mr. Gorbachev himself.  The newspaper wrote that readers assessed his role both positively and negatively.  It said many thanked the Soviet leader for his "self-control, modesty, culture and ability to hear a speaker out."  But others criticized him, "for imposing his opinion on other deputies, giving commentaries to many speeches, holding elections with no choice of candidate, putting pressure on the voting process and maneuvering between the right and left wings" of the Parliament.  All this, the paper quoted readers as saying, "has seriously weakened his authority."  The Soviet leader apparently suggested to Argumenty i Fakty's editor, Vyacheslav Starkov, that he should resign.  The comment, which Mr. Starkov relayed to his staff, has sparked anger and bitterness at the paper.  Mr. Starkov has been summoned to see the Kremlin's ideology chief, Vadim Medvedev, in the near future, and may discover then if he is to be fired.  Izvestia was criticized for a front-page article last Wednesday that took a sharp look at the Parliament's activities.  It attacked the level of a debate on the private-sector cooperative movement, saying "the discussion was more like a riot than a civilized exchange of points of view."  And it questioned the speed with which the Parliament was adopting new legislation, often with a minimum of debate.  Speaking to foreign reporters, Ivan Laptev, Izvestia's editor, sought to play down Mr. Gorbachev's criticism, but he acknowledged that his paper had been singled out.  The Parliament yesterday approved legislation that imposes new restrictions on the cooperative movement, enabling local authorities to set ceilings for prices and preventing the "speculative" sale of goods in short supply for prices higher than that charged by the state.  Damon Darlin is a fine reporter of serious topics.  Don't waste his talents with fatuous assignments such as the Sept. 20 page-one article about gift-giving in Korea.  You sunk just about as low as NBC did in its reporting on Korean life during last year's Olympics.  You media folks don't get it, do you?  About the Big Picture in Korea, I mean.  Your "Tee Hee" treatment of the dramatically improved life style that the Koreans have forged, particularly in the past 10 years, is insulting to the strong bonds between our two nations.  Non-"Saturday Night Live" journalists might have analyzed that embedded in the commercial hype of the "Tae Porum" gift-giving season is an immense compliment to American assistance to Korea.  Some of us, who were personal or official participants in the days when the U.S. was able to supply needed material and morale boosts to a destitute nation, now rejoice that the better life we thought possible for Korea has come to fruition.  A Korean farmer toiled with a wooden plow in his field behind a bullock in 1964.  He now has a son who sells his nation's autos, computers and a hundred other products to a declining American manufacturing-sector work force.  If we and the Koreans gaze at the same full harvest moon during "Tae Porum" today, which side has uneasy visions of future bitter harvests?  J. Richard Overturf  Oceanside, Calif.  James T. Boone was named to the new position of chief administrative officer, becoming second in command at this bank holding company.  Mr. Boone had been president and chief executive officer of Sunburst Bank, Louisiana, one of the company's two banks.  R.E. Kennington II continues as chairman and chief executive officer.  Robert D. Paster, 49 years old, vice president and Space Shuttle Main Engine program manager, was named president of the Rocketdyne division of this aerospace concern, succeeding Richard Schwartz, who resigned to become president of Hercules Aerospace Co., Wilmington, Del.  Wall Street's takeover-stock speculators yesterday suffered their worst bloodbath since the Black Monday crash of October 1987.  Even as the stock market rebounded from Friday's 190.58-point rout, takeover traders were hammered by setbacks in two big airline takeover deals.  Some analysts estimated that paper losses could total $500 million for the takeover traders, known as risk arbitragers, or "arbs."  Nearly all of the big paper losses were caused by declines of more than 20% in two airline stocks, UAL Corp. and AMR Corp. Wall Street's arbitrage desks had loaded up on stocks of both companies after each had received takeover proposals from investors.  The bid for UAL came from Marvis Davis of Beverly Hills, Calif., and the bid for AMR came from Donald Trump of New York.  But in the wake of Friday's announcement that a UAL management-union group couldn't obtain bank financing for its agreement to buy UAL at $300 a share, UAL stock plunged $56.875 yesterday to close at $222.875 a share in New York Stock Exchange composite trading of nearly 2.3 million shares.  On Friday, the stock didn't trade after the buy-out group announced its financing troubles.  That was bad enough for the arbs.  "On balance, the Street's biggest position has been UAL, mostly {bought} in the $280 range," said Frank Gallagher, director of Phoenix Capital Markets, who follows arbitrage activity.  But the arbs were quickly hit with another dose of bad news when Mr. Trump announced that he was withdrawing his proposal to buy AMR at $120 a share.  After trading in AMR resumed, the stock fell sharply to close at $76.50 a share, down $22.125 on the day in Big Board composite trading of more than 4.7 million shares.  Mr. Gallagher estimates that arbitragers owned the equivalent of nearly 30% of UAL's stock, or about six million shares, indicating losses of about $350 million.  He estimates that arbs own the equivalent of about 10% of AMR's stock, also about six million shares, indicating an additional $130 million in losses.  Several other stocks owned by takeover traders continued to fall.  Many takeover stocks rebounded somewhat yeterday, but none made up all of their sharp declines on Friday.  Despite the losses, there haven't been any reports of arbitrage or brokerage firms that have encountered serious financial difficulties.  For most takeover-stock traders, huge profits from booming takeover activity last year would provide a cushion against current losses.  Arbitragers at several major Wall Street securities firms said that UAL was by far the biggest stock position that they owned.  They also believe that UAL was the biggest position for most other arbs.  "In the arbitrage community, UAL was viewed as being a very safe deal," said one trader.  Arbs believed that major banks would easily finance the UAL buy-out group's $6.79 billion bid, and were stunned on Friday when the group couldn't obtain the necessary loans.  Several traders said they weren't selling UAL shares because they believe the buy-out group will be able to obtain financing to complete the acquisition eventually, although perhaps at a price of less than $300 a share.  Mr. Gallagher thinks that much of the heavy trading in UAL shares was "one arb passing it on to another.  I don't think you have institutional investors buying the stock."  Gainers among the arb's favorite stocks included Hilton Hotels Corp., which rose $9.50 a share to close at $94.50 in Big Board composite trading, and Warner Communications Inc., which rose $1.875 to close at $63.375.  Hilton is soliciting bids for some or all of its hotel and casino operations; Warner is being acquired by Time Warner Inc., which already owns about 58% of Warner.  The past two trading days, while painful, haven't been as disastrous for the arbs as the October 1987 market crash because takeover-related stocks haven't dropped as sharply as they did two years ago, and traders aren't as deeply in debt as they were then.  On Friday and yesterday, the worst price declines among takeover-related stocks were about 20%, with most takeover stocks falling between 5% and 15%.  In October 1987, however, stocks of some potential takeover targets, such as Dayton Hudson Corp., fell about 50%, Mr. Gallagher said.  A trader at one major Wall Street firm said his arbitrage desk had about 30% of its capital currently invested in cash.  Two years ago, he said, his firm had borrowed an amount equal to about 30% of its capital so that it could buy more stocks.  Mr. Gallagher said he believes that situation is typical of the more conservative strategies that many arbitragers adopted after the crash.  When traders borrow money to buy additional amounts of stock, they run the risk of having to sell stocks after a sharp price decline such as yesterday's to meet margin calls.  Margin calls are demands by lenders that traders put up more cash to make up for declines in the value of stocks that serve as collateral for loans.  One trader, however, said he believes that most of the selling in takeover-related stocks in the past two trading days has been the result of judgments by traders that takeover bids are less likely to be completed, rather than selling prompted by margin calls.  ---  @ Agony for the Arbs  Stocks in which `risk arbitrage' speculators have large positions  @ MONDAY  @ CLOSE CHANGE  @ UAL Corp. 222 7/8 -56 7/8  @ AMR Corp. 76 1/2 -22 1/8  @ Warner Communications 63 3/8 + 1 7/8  @ LIN Broadcasting 104 3/4 - 2 3/4  @ Hilton Hotels 94 1/2 + 9 1/2  @ Holiday Corp. 72 + 1/2  @ Columbia Pictures 26 1/4 - 3/8  @ American Medical 20 3/4 + 3/4  @ Avon Products 29 3/8 + 7/8  @ Georgia Gulf 44 1/4 - 3  @ Anchor Glass 20 + 1 5/8  @ TW Services 30 3/4 - 1  @ USX Corp. 34 1/4 + 1 1/4  @ Sea Containers 58 + 1 1/8  @ B.A.T Industries 12 + 1/2  @ Jaguar 10 - 1/4  In response to your extracts from David Fenton's memo ("How a PR Firm Executed the Alar Scare," editorial page, Oct. 3): For the past 10 years, the Environmental Protection Agency has known about the carcinogenic hazards of Alar, and has carried on proceedings to remove the chemical from the market.  Yet until recently, no significant progress had occurred because the pesticide manufacturers and other special interests have blocked necessary congressional reform, stymied EPA actions to cancel Alar and other hazardous pesticides, and kept the public in the dark about the threat of pesticides.  In this country, major reforms occur only when substantial public pressure is applied to the government and Congress in order to counteract the lockhold of special interests.  Therefore, the Natural Resources Defense Council specifically chose to inform the public about the risks posed by pesticides in foods.  To move the pesticide-reform agenda, NRDC -- like any major corporation or the government -- used the professional communication skills of a public-relations firm to educate the public about the results of our two-year-long scientific study on pesticides residues in children's food.  NRDC offers no apologies for making public the results of our report on pesticides in the diet of preschoolers.  We will continue to present the facts about pesticides in food to the broadest possible segment of society.  Americans have a right to know what is in their food and to do something about it if they choose.  Until the food supply is safe, especially for children, NRDC will keep doing everything we can to educate the public about the unnecessary and intolerable risk of pesticides.  John H. Adams  Executive Director  National Resources Defense Council  New York  ---  Mr. Fenton's PR firm has abused the trust of the media and done the public no favor.  Just as you can yell "wolf" only so many times before people cease to heed you, a PR firm can manipulate the press only once, and then it loses all credibility.  Such firms go quickly bankrupt.  C. Brian Maddox  New York  ---  I was fascinated to read political publicist David Fenton's self-serving celebration of his own work in creating the illusion that Alar was "an intolerable risk" to Americans -- particularly American children -- when used on apples. (The one "fact" that caught my eye -- the alleged $700,000 paid by the apple growers to Hill & Knowlton -- was overstated by more than a factor of two.)  While I doubt the media were as gullible and malleable as Mr. Fenton's memo suggests, the Alar scare was created, mostly out of thin air, just as Mr. Fenton claims, and the media that were taken in can learn something from this episode.  So, for that matter, can other industries subject to this kind of guerrilla PR attack.  Robert L. Dilenschneider  President and CEO  Hill & Knowlton Inc.  New York  ---  Mr. Fenton says it was not the intent of the NRDC to have school systems ban apples.  Am I also to believe that Meryl Streep did not intend to harm apple growers by condemning the use of Alar?  Well, apple growers were hurt and many others were needlessly frightened by this news story.  Scientific fact was replaced with media hype produced by genuinely concerned but irrational people who created a dangerous phenomenon when, by using bad information and bad logic, they skillfully frightened people about agricultural chemicals.  My family and I will continue to believe the FDA, USDA, EPA and the surgeon general and follow their nutritional guidelines to eat a balanced diet that includes many fresh fruits and vegetables.  Frederick Walsifer Jr.  Colts Neck, N.J.  Influential members of the House Ways and Means Committee introduced legislation that would restrict how the new savings-and-loan bailout agency can raise capital, creating another potential obstacle to the government's sale of sick thrifts.  The bill, whose backers include Chairman Dan Rostenkowski (D., Ill.), would prevent the Resolution Trust Corp. from raising temporary working capital by having an RTC-owned bank or thrift issue debt that wouldn't be counted on the federal budget.  The bill intends to restrict the RTC to Treasury borrowings only, unless the agency receives specific congressional authorization.  "Such agency `self-help' borrowing is unauthorized and expensive, far more expensive than direct Treasury borrowing," said Rep. Fortney Stark (D., Calif.), the bill's chief sponsor.  The complex financing plan in the S&L bailout law includes raising $30 billion from debt issued by the newly created RTC.  This financing system was created in the new law in order to keep the bailout spending from swelling the budget deficit.  Another $20 billion would be raised through Treasury bonds, which pay lower interest rates.  But the RTC also requires "working" capital to maintain the bad assets of thrifts that are sold, until the assets can be sold separately.  That debt would be paid off as the assets are sold, leaving the total spending for the bailout at $50 billion, or $166 billion including interest over 10 years.  "It's a problem that clearly has to be resolved," said David Cooke, executive director of the RTC.  The agency has already spent roughly $19 billion selling 34 insolvent S&Ls, and it is likely to sell or merge 600 by the time the bailout concludes.  Absent other working capital, he said, the RTC would be forced to delay other thrift resolutions until cash could be raised by selling the bad assets.  "We would have to wait until we have collected on those assets before we can move forward," he said.  The complicated language in the huge new law has muddied the fight.  The law does allow the RTC to borrow from the Treasury up to $5 billion at any time.  Moreover, it says the RTC's total obligations may not exceed $50 billion, but that figure is derived after including notes and other debt, and subtracting from it the market value of the assets the RTC holds.  But Congress didn't anticipate or intend more public debt, say opponents of the RTC's working-capital plan, and Rep. Charles Schumer (D., N.Y.) said the RTC Oversight Board has been remiss in not keeping Congress informed.  "That secrecy leads to a proposal like the one from Ways and Means, which seems to me sort of draconian," he said.  "The RTC is going to have to pay a price of prior consultation on the Hill if they want that kind of flexibility."  The Ways and Means Committee will hold a hearing on the bill next Tuesday.  We're about to see if advertising works.  Hard on the heels of Friday's 190-point stock-market plunge and the uncertainty that's followed, a few big brokerage firms are rolling out new ads trumpeting a familiar message: Keep on investing, the market's just fine.  Their mission is to keep clients from fleeing the market, as individual investors did in droves after the crash in October 1987.  Just days after the 1987 crash, major brokerage firms rushed out ads to calm investors.  This time around, they're moving even faster.  PaineWebber Inc. filmed a new television commercial at 4 p.m. EDT yesterday and had it on the air by last night.  Fidelity Investments placed new ads in newspapers yesterday, and wrote another new ad appearing today.  Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. by yesterday afternoon had already written new TV ads.  It considered running them during tomorrow night's World Series broadcast but decided not to when the market recovered yesterday.  Other brokerage firms, including Merrill Lynch & Co., were plotting out potential new ad strategies.  The brokerage firms learned a lesson the last time around, when frightened investors flooded the phone lines and fled the market in a panic.  This time, the firms were ready.  Fidelity, for example, prepared ads several months ago in case of a market plunge.  When the market went into its free fall Friday afternoon, the investment firm ordered full pages in the Monday editions of half a dozen newspapers.  The ads touted Fidelity's automated 800-number beneath the huge headline, "Fidelity Is Ready For Your Call."  A Fidelity spokesman says the 800-line, which already was operating but which many clients didn't know about, received about double the usual volume of calls over the weekend.  "A lot of investor confidence comes from the fact that they can speak to us," he says.  "To maintain that dialogue is absolutely crucial.  It would have been too late to think about on Friday.  We had to think about it ahead of time."  Today's Fidelity ad goes a step further, encouraging investors to stay in the market or even to plunge in with Fidelity.  Underneath the headline "Diversification," it counsels, "Based on the events of the past week, all investors need to know their portfolios are balanced to help protect them against the market's volatility."  It goes on to plug a few diversified Fidelity funds by name.  PaineWebber also was able to gear up quickly thanks to the 1987 crash.  In the aftermath of the 1987 debacle, the brokerage firm began taping commercials in-house, ultimately getting its timing down fast enough to tape a commercial after the market closed and rush it on the air that night.  It also negotiated an arrangement with Cable News Network under which CNN would agree to air its last-minute creations.  The new PaineWebber commercial, created with ad agency Saatchi & Saatchi Co., features Mary Farrell, one of the firm's most visible investment strategists, sounding particularly bullish.  Taped just as the market closed yesterday, it offers Ms. Farrell advising, "We view the market here as going through a relatively normal cycle. . . .  We continue to feel that the stock market is still the place to be for long-term appreciation."  The spot was scheduled to appear three times on CNN last night.  PaineWebber considered an even harder sell, recommending specific stocks.  Instead, it settled on just urging the clients who are its lifeline to keep that money in the market.  "We're saying the worst thing that anyone can do is to see the market go down and dump everything, which just drives the prices down further," says John Lampe, PaineWebber's director of advertising.  "If you owned it and liked it Friday, the true value hasn't changed."  He adds, "This isn't 1987 revisited."  With the market fluctuating and then closing up more than 88 points yesterday, investment firms had to constantly revise their approach.  At Shearson Lehman, executives created potential new commercials Friday night and throughout the weekend, then had to regroup yesterday afternoon.  The plan had been to make one of Shearson's easy-to-film, black-and-white "Where We Stand" commercials, which have been running occasionally in response to news events since 1985.  The ad would have run during the World Series tomorrow, replacing the debut commercial of Shearson's new ad campaign, "Leadership by Example."  But in a meeting after the market closed yesterday, Shearson executives decided not to go ahead with the stock-market ad.  "We don't think at this point anything needs to be said.  The market seems to be straightening out; we're taking a wait-and-see attitude," says Cathleen B. Stewart, executive vice president of marketing.  In any case, the brokerage firms are clearly moving faster to create new ads than they did in the fall of 1987.  But it remains to be seen whether their ads will be any more effective.  In 1987, despite a barrage of ads from most of the major investment firms, individuals ran from the market en masse.  Now the firms must try their hardest to prove that advertising can work this time around.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   ARNOLD ADVERTISING: Edward Eskandarian, former chairman of Della Femina, McNamee WCRS/Boston, reached an agreement in principle to acquire a majority stake in Arnold Advertising, a small Boston shop.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Mr. Eskandarian, who resigned his Della Femina post in September, becomes chairman and chief executive of Arnold.  John Verret, the agency's president and chief executive, will retain the title of president.  Separately, McDonald's Corp., Oak Brook, Ill., named Arnold to handle its estimated $4 million cooperative ad account for the Hartford, Conn., area.  That account had been handled by Della Femina, McNamee WCRS.  EDUCATION ADS: A 142-page ad supplement to Business Week's special "Corporate Elite" issue calls on business leaders to use their clout to help solve the nation's education crisis.  The supplement, the largest ever for the magazine, includes ads from 52 corporate advertisers and kicks off a two-year Business Week initiative on education.  The magazine will distribute 10% of the gross revenues from the supplement as grants to innovative teachers.  You know what the law of averages is, don't you?  It's what 1) explains why we are like, well, ourselves rather than Bo Jackson; 2) cautions that it's possible to drown in a lake that averages two feet deep; and 3) predicts that 10,000 monkeys placed before 10,000 pianos would produce 1,118 publishable rock 'n' roll tunes.  Baseball, that game of the long haul, is the quintessential sport of the mean, and the mean ol' law caught up with the San Francisco Giants in the World Series last weekend.  The team that dumped runs by the bushel on the Chicago Cubs in the National League playoffs was held to just one in two games by the home-team Oakland A's, the gang that had been done unto similarly by the Los Angeles Dodgers and Orel Hershiser in last year's tournament.  Morever, much of the damage was accomplished by A's who had some catching up to do.  In game two, on a cool Sunday evening in this land of perpetual autumn, a lot of the catching up was done by the A's catcher, Terry Steinbach.  He hit a 2-0 pitch from Rick Reuschel into the left-field stands in inning four to stretch his team's lead from 2-1 to a decisive 5-1, where it stayed.  So what if Steinbach had struck just seven home runs in 130 regular-season games, and batted in the seventh position of the A's lineup.  "If you get your pitch, and take a good swing, anything can happen," he later remarked.  On Saturday night, quite a few of the boys in green and gold salted away successes to salve the pain of past and, no doubt, future droughts.  Mark McGwire, the big, red-haired Oakland first baseman, had three hits in four at bats, two more than he'd had in the five-game Dodger series in which he'd gone 1-for-17.  The A-men batting Nos. 6 through 9, a.k.a. the "bottom of the order," got seven of their team's 11 hits and scored four of its runs in a 5-0 decision.  Right-hander Dave Stewart held the Giants to five hits to account for the zero on the other side of the Saturday ledger.  That he was the A's winningest pitcher during its American League campaign with a 21-9 mark, plus two wins over Toronto in the playoffs, indicates he may have some evening up coming, but with the way his split-fingered fastball is behaving, that might not be this week.  The same goes for Mike Moore, another veteran who overcame early struggles to permit the Giants but a run and four hits in seven innings in Sunday's contest.  "Every guy they put out there had a better split-finger than the guy before," marveled Giant manager Roger Craig.  He's an ex-hurler who's one of the leading gurus of the fashionable delivery, which looks like a fastball until it dives beneath the lunging bat.  The upshot of the downshoot is that the A's go into San Francisco's Candlestick Park tonight up two games to none in the best-of-seven fest.  The stat to reckon with here says that about three of four clubs (29 of 39) that took 2-0 Series leads went on to win it all.  That's not an average to soothe Giant rooters.  One might think that the home fans in this Series of the Subway Called BART (that's a better name for a public conveyance than "Desire," don't you think?) would have been ecstatic over the proceedings, but they observe them in relative calm.  Partisans of the two combatants sat side by side in the 49,000-plus seats of Oakland Coliseum, and while they cheered their favorites and booed the opposition, hostilities advanced no further, at least as far as I could see.  A few folks even showed up wearing caps bearing the colors and emblems of both teams.  "I'm for the Giants today, but only because they lost yesterday.  I love 'em both.  The only thing I'm rooting for is for the Series to go seven games," said David Williams, a Sacramento septuagenarian, at the Coliseum before Sunday's go.  The above represents a triumph of either apathy or civility.  I choose to believe it's the latter, although it probably springs from the fact that just about everyone out here, including the A's and Giants, is originally from somewhere else.  Suffice it to say that if this were a New York Yankees-Mets series, or one between the Chicago Cubs and White Sox (hey, it's possible), you'd need uniformed police in every other seat to separate opposing fans, and only the suicidal would bifurcate their bonnets.  Anyway, the A's gave you a lot of heroes to root for.  In the opening game, besides Steinbach and Stewart, there was Walt Weiss, a twiggy-looking, second-year shortstop who had lost a couple months of the season to knee surgery.  He was flawless afield (ditto in game two), moved a runner along in the A's three-run second inning, and homered for his team's final tally.  Such is his reputation among the East Bay Bashers that when he hit his first career home run last season, the fan who caught it agreed to turn the ball over to him in return for an autograph.  Not his autograph; power-hitter McGwire's.  An A's co-hero of the second game was Rickey Henderson, who exemplifies the hot side of the hot-cold equation.  He smoked Toronto in the playoffs with six hits, seven walks and eight stolen bases in 22 at bats, and continued that by going 3-for-3 at the plate Sunday, along with walking, stealing a base and scoring a run.  "When you're in the groove, you see every ball tremendously," he lectured.  The cold guys in the set were Will Clark, Kevin Mitchell and Matt Williams, the Giants' 3-4-5 hitters.  They combined for 25 hits, six home runs and 24 runs batted in in the five games against the Cubs.  They went a collective 5-for-24 here, with zero homers and ribbies.  It's that last set of numbers, as much as anything else, that gives the Giants hope in the Series games to come.  "I believe in the law of averages," declared San Francisco batting coach Dusty Baker after game two.  "I'd rather see a so-so hitter who's hot come up for the other side than a good hitter who's cold."  But the old Dodger slugger wisely offered no prediction about when good times would return to his side.  "When it goes, you never know when you'll get it back," he said.  "That's baseball."  NCR Corp. reported a 10% drop in third-quarter net income, citing intense competition that caused its gross profit margins to dip.  Net income for the quarter fell to $93.1 million from $103.1 million, roughly what analysts had expected.  But per-share profit dropped only 2% to $1.23 a share from $1.26 a share, as the company continued its stock buy-back plan.  Average shares outstanding dropped to 75.8 million from 82.1 million.  Revenue fell 1% to $1.39 billion from $1.41 billion.  The computer maker, which sells more than half its goods outside the U.S., also said the negative effect of a stronger U.S. dollar will "adversely affect" its fourth-quarter performance and "make it difficult" to better 1988 results.  NCR said revenue declined both in the U.S. and overseas, reflecting a world-wide softening of the computer markets.  The company, however, said orders in the U.S. showed "good gains" during the latest quarter.  Analysts estimate those gains at 12% to 13%, a good part of it coming from large orders placed by a few of NCR's major customers.  In addition to a general slowing of the computer industry, NCR, which sells automated teller machines and computerized cash registers, is also affected by the retail and financial sectors, "areas of the economy that have generally not been robust," notes Sanjiv G. Hingorani, an analyst for Salomon Brothers Inc.  These factors, combined with a strong dollar, should negatively affect the current quarter's results, NCR said.  In the year-earlier fourth quarter, NCR had profit of $149.6 million, or $1.85 a share, on revenue of $1.8 billion.  Mr. Hingorani said he lowered his full-year estimates for 1989 to $5.35 a share from $5.50 a share.  Revenue projections were slashed to $6.03 billion from $6.20 billion.  Last year, NCR had net income of $439.3 million, or $5.33 a share, on $5.99 billion in revenue.  For the nine months, the company's earnings fell 9% to $264.6 million, or $3.40 a share, from $289.7 million, or $3.49 a share.  Revenues declined 1% to $4.17 billion from $4.19 billion.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, NCR shares fell 75 cents to close at $57.  Concerning your Sept. 19 article "Wall Street Firms Link Analysts' Pay to Performance," I'm delighted that Wall Street is finally tuning in to the hard, cold facts of the real working world.  If the firms are serious, however, why limit the practice to the poor, maligned analysts whose ability to see into the future is fragile at best?  Why not extend the same harsh standards to the sales force, and pay brokers a base salary with annual bonus based on how much money they made for their clients during the year?  That should stop a lot of account-churning, and produce a stock market driven only by professional concern, careful thought and good sense.  Now, wouldn't that be a novelty.  Phyllis Kyle Stephenson  Newport News, Va.  Steve Clark, a Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. trader, reported for work at 5 a.m., two and a half hours before the usual Monday morning strategy meeting.  At Jefferies & Co., J. Francis Palamara didn't reach the office until 5:30 a.m., but then he had been up most of the night at home.  "I had calls all night long from the States," he said.  "I was woken up every hour -- 1:30, 2:30, 3:30, 4:30.  People are looking for possible opportunities to buy, but nobody wants to stick their chin out."  For many of London's securities traders, it was a day that started nervously in the small hours.  By lunchtime, the selling was at near-panic fever.  But as the day ended in a frantic Wall Street-inspired rally, the City breathed a sigh of relief.  So it went yesterday in the trading rooms of London's financial district.  In the wake of Wall Street's plunge last Friday, the London market was considered especially vulnerable.  And before the opening of trading here yesterday, all eyes were on early trading in Tokyo for a clue as to how widespread the fallout might be.  By the time trading officially got under way at 9 a.m., the news from Asia was in.  And it left mixed signals for London.  Tokyo stocks closed off a significant but less-than-alarming 1.8% on thin volume; Hong Kong stocks declined 6.5% in orderly trading.  At Jefferies' trading room on Finsbury Circus, a stately circle at the edge of the financial district, desktop computer screens displayed the London market's major barometer -- the Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 Share Index.  Red figures on the screens indicated falling stocks; blue figures, rising stocks.  Right away, the reds outnumbered the blues, 80 to 20, as the index opened at 2076.8, off 157.1 points, or 7%.  "I see concern, but I don't see any panic," said Mr. Palamara, a big, good-humored New York native who runs the 15-trader office.  The Jefferies office, a branch of the Los Angeles-based firm, played it conservatively, seeking to avoid risk.  "This is not the sort of market to have a big position in," said David Smith, who heads trading in all non-U.S. stocks.  "We tend to run a very tight book."  Jefferies spent most of its energies in the morning trying to match buyers and sellers, and there weren't many buyers.  "All the takeover stocks -- Scottish & Newcastle, B.A.T, DRG -- are getting pretty well pasted this morning," Mr. Smith said.  Seconds later, a 7,500-share "sell" order for Scottish & Newcastle came in.  For the third time in 15 minutes, a trader next to Mr. Smith left the no-smoking area to have a cigarette.  On the screens, only two forlorn blue figures remained, but the index had recovered a few points and was off about 140.  "Because Tokyo didn't collapse, let's pick up a little stock," Mr. Smith said.  He targeted 7,500 shares of Reuters and punched a button to call up on his screen other dealers' price quotes.  The vivid yellow figures showed the best price at 845 pence, ($13.27) and Mr. Smith's traders started putting out feelers.  But the market sensed a serious buyer on a day dominated by selling, and the quotes immediately jumped to 850 pence.  "When I want to buy, they run from you -- they keep changing their prices," Mr. Smith said.  "It's very frustrating."  He temporarily abandoned his search for the Reuters shares.  By this time, it was 4:30 a.m. in New York, and Mr. Smith fielded a call from a New York customer wanting an opinion on the British stock market, which had been having troubles of its own even before Friday's New York market break.  "Fundamentally dangerous. . . ," Mr. Smith said, almost in a whisper, ". . . .fundamentally weak . . . fairly vulnerable still . . . extremely dangerously poised . . . we're in for a lot of turbulence. . . ."   He was right.  By midday, the London market was in full retreat.  "It's falling like a stone," said Danny Linger, a pit trader who was standing outside the London International Financial Futures Exchange.  Only half the usual lunchtime crowd gathered at the tony Corney & Barrow wine bar on Old Broad Street nearby.  Conversation was subdued as most patrons watched the latest market statistics on television.  At 12:49 p.m., the index hit its low, 2029.7, off 204.2 points.  "France opened the limit down, off at least 10% if you could calculate the index, which you couldn't," Mr. Clark, the Shearson trader, said early in the afternoon.  "Spain is down 10% and suspended, Sweden's down 8%, Norway 11%.  This market has been very badly damaged."  As 2:30 p.m. -- Wall Street's opening time -- neared, Shearson traders and salesmen traded bets on how low the New York market would open.  In the center of the trading floor, chief trader Roger Streeter and two colleagues scrambled for the telephones as soon as the New York market opened -- plummeting more than 60 points in the first few minutes.  They saw an opportunity created by the sell-off.  As Wall Street traders dumped American Depositary Receipts in Jaguar PLC, Mr. Streeter and trader Sam Ruiz bought them to resell in the U.K. Investors here still expect Ford Motor Co. or General Motors Corp. to bid for Jaguar.  Suddenly, after about 45 minutes, the U.S. markets rallied.  "The MMI has gone better," shouted one trader at about 3:15 London time, as the U.S. Major Markets Index contract suddenly indicated a turnabout.  As Wall Street strengthened, the London trading room went wild.  Traders shouted as their screens posted an ever-narrowing loss on Wall Street.  Then, nine minutes later, Wall Street suddenly rebounded to a gain on the day.  "Rally] Rally] Rally]" shouted Shearson trader Andy Rosen, selling more Jaguar shares.  "This is panic buying]"  As the London market rallied, some wondered whether the weekend of worrying and jitters had been worth it.  The London index closed at 2163.4, its high for the day, off 70.5, or about 3.3%.  Ambassador Paul Nitze's statement (Notable & Quotable, Sept. 20), "If you have a million people working for you, every bad thing that has one chance in a million of going wrong will go wrong at least once a year," is a pretty negative way of looking at things.  Isn't it just as fair to say that if you have a million people working for you, every good thing that has one chance in a million of going right will go right at least once a year?  Don't be such a pessimist, Mr. Ambassador.  Frank Tremdine  South Bristol, Maine  The House Aviation Subcommittee approved a bill that would give the transportation secretary authority to review and approve leveraged buy-outs of major U.S. airlines.  The collapsed plan to acquire UAL Corp., parent of United Airlines, spurred quick action on the legislation, introduced Wednesday and approved by the subcommittee on a voice vote yesterday.  The bill is expected to be taken up by the Public Works and Transportation Committee tomorrow, and a floor vote by next week will be urged.  The measure drew criticism from the Bush administration and a parting shot from financier Donald Trump, who yesterday withdrew his takeover bid for AMR Corp., the parent of American Airlines.  In a letter to subcommittee Chairman James Oberstar (D., Minn.), Mr. Trump criticized the bill as an explicit effort to thwart his bid for AMR, and said it contributed to the collapse of the deal.  Elaine Chao, deputy transportation secretary, also sent a letter to express the administration's opposition to the bill "in its present form."  Rep. Oberstar brushed off Mr. Trump's allegations as an "excuse for his own deal failing."  He also said the fact that the other letter hadn't come from Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner indicated there is "wiggle room" in the administration's position.  Mr. Oberstar and other committee members repeatedly stressed that the legislation wasn't a response to any particular market situation.  But they cited the UAL and AMR examples as reasons to move quickly to enact this legislation.  Aides both in the House and Senate said the withdrawal of the Trump bid for AMR isn't likely to deflate efforts to push the legislation.  "It's still on the fast track and we still want to do it," said one Senate aide.  The bill is aimed at addressing the concern that an airline might sacrifice costly safety measures to pay off the debt incurred in a leveraged buy-out.  Currently, the transportation secretary doesn't have clearly established authority to block mergers, but can take the drastic step of revoking the operating certificate of any carrier the official considers unfit.  Supporters of the legislation view the bill as an effort to add stability and certainty to the airline-acquisition process, and to preserve the safety and fitness of the industry.  In general, the bill would give the Transportation Department a 30-day review period before 15% or more of the voting stock of a major U.S. air carrier could be acquired.  It also would require the acquiring party to notify the transportation secretary and to provide all information relevant to determining the intent of the acquisition.  The bill would allow the secretary to reject a buy-out if sufficient information hasn't been provided, or if the buy-out is likely to weaken the carrier financially, result in a substantial reduction in size of the airline through disposal of assets, or give control to a foreign interest.  If more information is needed, the secretary would have authority to extend the review period 20 days.  All the witnesses, both congressmen and industry experts, expressed support for the bill in order to prevent profiteers from cashing in on airline profits at the expense of safe, cost-effective service.  But several committee members disapproved, some backing Mr. Trump's claim that the threat of regulation caused the failure of the UAL deal and the stock-market plunge.  One of the major concerns expressed by the dissenters was that large airlines would be prohibited from divesting themselves of smaller entities and producing independent spin-off companies.  In a possible prelude to the resumption of talks between Boeing Co. and striking Machinists union members, a federal mediator said representatives of the two sides will meet with him tomorrow.  "It could be a long meeting or it could be a short one," said Doug Hammond, the mediator, who called the agreement to meet a first step toward a resumption of negotiations.  "We're encouraged that talks are scheduled again but beyond that, we have made no expression of expectations," a Boeing spokesman said.  The Machinists union has rejected a three-year contract offer that would have provided a 10% wage increase over the life of the pact, plus some bonuses.  Currently, average pay for machinists is $13.39 an hour, Boeing said.  Now in its 13th day, the strike has idled about 55,000 machinists and has started to delay delivery of some jetliners.  With a strike fund of about $100 million, the union had said it was prepared for a long strike.  After the third week on strike, union members will begin receiving $100 a week from the fund.  Work at Boeing continues with supervisors and other non-striking personnel manning the lines.  And at the company's Wichita, Kan., plant, about 2,400 of the 11,700 machinists still are working, Boeing said.  Under Kansas right-to-work laws, contracts cannot require workers to be union members.  Boeing has declined to say how many employees are working at its giant Renton, Wash., plant.  Union officials couldn't be reached for comment.  DPC Acquisition Partners, a hostile suitor for Dataproducts Corp., said it intends to launch a tender offer for the computer printer maker's common stock.  DPC, a group led by the New York investment firm Crescott Inc., also said it plans to file preliminary materials with the Securities and Exchange Commission regarding a shareholder solicitation to oust Dataproducts' board.  DPC holds a 7.8% stake in Dataproducts and made a $15-a-share bid for the company in May, but Dataproducts management considered the $283.7 million proposal unacceptable.  A DPC spokesman declined to elaborate on the group's new plan.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Dataproducts shares jumped 62.5 cents to close at $9.375.  Dataproducts, which had been seeking a buyer for several months, announced a restructuring plan in September and took itself off the auction block.  The company's restructuring includes plans to split into three sectors, to phase out domestic printer manufacturing operations and to sell its New England subsidiary.  As part of the plan, Dataproducts announced a pact to sell $63 million of its real estate holdings to Trizec Properties Inc., a unit of Canada's Trizec Corp.  Jack Davis, Dataproducts' president, chairman and chief executive officer, said the company "is at a loss to understand DPC's intentions."  He called today's announcement "opportunistic and disruptive" and said the company intends to proceed with its restructuring.  Share prices plummeted across Europe yesterday in response to Friday's New York sell-off, but some issues staged a late comeback after Wall Street opened without another rout.  European investors have further reason for optimism today, after the U.S. rebound.  The Frankfurt Stock Exchange, which closed before the New York exchanges opened, was the hardest hit of the major European markets, with the DAX Index dropping 12.8%.  In London, prices plummeted in early trading and were off as much as 9% before coming back strong after the New York opening to close down only 3.2%.  West German Economics Minister Helmut Haussmann said, "In my view, the stock market will stabilize relatively quickly.  There may be one or other psychological or technical reactions, but they aren't based on fundamentals.  The economy of West Germany and the EC {European Community} is highly stable."  Paris, which has been the center of speculation fever in recent weeks, also was hard hit.  Share prices fell in Milan, Amsterdam, Zurich, Madrid and Stockholm.  Prices in Brussels, where a computer breakdown disrupted trading, also tumbled.  Following is a breakdown of major market activity:  FRANKFURT: One of the sharpest declines came in the financial center of Europe's strongest economy.  The DAX Index of 30 West German blue chips plunged 12.8%, a one-day record, wiping out the summer's gains.  The index closed at 1385.72, down 203.56 points.  By comparison, two years ago on Black Monday, the new index would have dropped 9.4%, according to a projection by the exchange.  Investors may have reacted so strongly to Friday's U.S. stock market loss because they had vivid memories of the Frankfurt exchange's losing 35% of its value in the 1987 crash and its wake.  This time, however, many small investors may have been hurt by acting so swiftly.  "They all went in the wrong direction," said Andreas Insam, an investment adviser for the Bank in Liechtenstein's Frankfurt branch.  He said he told clients to buy selected West German blue chips after they fell by about 10%.  After the opening was delayed 30 minutes because of the crush of sell orders, Frankfurt's normal two-hour trading session was extended 75 minutes to handle the heavy volume.  "The beginning was chaotic," said Nigel Longley, a broker for Commerzbank AG.  "It took three-quarters of an hour before enough prices could be worked out to get a reading on the market."  Institutional investors and bankers, many of whom spent the night before in their offices watching Far Eastern markets, were cautiously optimistic after the mild 1.8% decline in Tokyo stock prices.  "Everybody was still confident, including most institutional investors.  That is why everybody was a little surprised by the storm of sell orders from small private investors," said Norbert Braeuer, a senior trader for Hessische Landesbank.  Some big institutions, including banks, began picking up lower-priced shares late yesterday, but most investors wanted to see what would happen in New York before acting.  But even if Wall Street continues to stabilize, analysts here say the latest blow to investor confidence could inhibit a swift recovery for the Frankfurt exchange, which already was showing signs of weakness after the DAX had slipped from a 1989 high of 1657.61 on Sept. 8.  Some of West Germany's bluest chips took some of the biggest hits.  A 16.3% drop for Mannesmann AG and Dresdner Bank AG's 9.6% decline were especially problematic for their respective boards, whose plans for major rights issues in November could now be in jeopardy.  Dresdner Bank last month said it hoped to raise 1.2 billion marks ($642.2 million) by issuing four million shares at 300 marks each.  Yet yesterday's market cropped Dresdner's share price by 33 marks to 309 marks a share, leaving little incentive for investors to subscribe to the standing price unless the market recovers quickly.  LONDON: Headed toward a record drop at midday, the London stock market recouped two-thirds of its losses in the wake of New York's early rally.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 Share Index closed off 70.5 points, at 2163.4, its high for the day, after having plunged 204.2 points at 12:49 p.m.  It was big institutions such as Norwich Union Insurance Group, Scottish Amicable Investment Managers and Standard Life Assurance Co. that spearheaded the rally.  Attracted by low prices and encouraged by New York's performance, they scooped up equities across the board.  Volume was 959.3 million shares, more than triple recent levels.  PARIS: Late buying gave the Paris Bourse a parachute after its free fall early in the day.  The CAC General Index ended down 5.4% at 523.6, a drop of 29.6 points from Friday.  "There was a volatility in the market that I have never seen before," said Michel Vigier, a partner in brokerage firm Cholet Dupont.  "When Wall Street turned around shortly after the opening, there was panic buying in Paris."  Brokers said that as the news spread that Wall Street was moving up, traders who had called to place sell orders changed their line in mid-conversation, ordering buys instead.  Trading was driven primarily by small investors and speculators, with large institutions waiting on the sidelines until late in the day.  When Wall Street turned, however, the big boys entered the market, looking for bargains.  J.P. Morgan & Co. swung to a loss in the third quarter, while NCNB Corp. reported net income more than doubled, and Security Pacific Corp. net rose 10%.  J.P. Morgan & Co.  J.P. Morgan, as expected, posted a $1.82 billion net loss for the quarter, reflecting the New York bank's decision last month to add $2 billion to reserves for losses on loans to less-developed countries.  The reserve addition placed the parent of Morgan Guaranty Trust Co. among a few major U.S. banks that have covered nearly all their medium and long-term portfolios to less-developed countries with reserves.  The latest quarter's loss equals $9.92 a share.  In the year-earlier quarter, Morgan earned $233.6 million, or $1.25 a share.  George M. Salem, analyst at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., called the results "mildly disappointing."  Excluding the $2 billion provision and allowing for the taxes Morgan paid, earnings were about 65 cents a share, Mr. Salem said.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Morgan climbed $1.50 a share to $44.125.  Net interest income sank 27% in the quarter to $254 million from $347 million.  The interest rate on short-term funds, which banks borrow to finance longer-term loans to customers, was "sharply higher," Morgan said.  Morgan received $2 million of interest payments on its medium and long-term Brazilian loans; had they been accruing interest, net interest income would have been $35 million higher in the quarter, Morgan said.  Such loans to Argentina also remain classified as non-accruing, costing the bank $10 million of interest income in the third period.  Income from sources other than interest climbed 12% to $414 million, reflecting higher corporate-finance and other fees and gains on sales of investment securities.  "These increases were partly offset by lower trading-related" income, the bank said.  Non-interest expenses grew 16% to $496 million.  NCNB Corp.  NCNB Corp.'s net income more than doubled in the period, largely because of continued strong performance by the bank's Texas operations.  The Charlotte, N.C., company said earnings rose to $143.6 million, or $1.45 a share, from $58.9 million, or 69 cents a share, a year earlier.  The latest quarter included a gain of $56.1 million, or 59 cents a share, related to the purchase of the remaining 51% of NCNB Texas National Bank from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  The strong performance, however, contrasted with an unexpectedly large increase in the size of NCNB's problem loans, particularly in the Southeast.  In the third quarter, nonperforming assets jumped to $474.1 million, or 1.43% of net loans and leases, from $232.8 million, or 1.13% in the second quarter.  Nonperformers totaled $230.8 million, or 1.27% in the year-ago third quarter.  Included in the increase in the most recent quarter is a $33 million loan, which NCNB said it "expects to be fully repaid, with no loss, early in the fourth quarter."  The deterioration in credit quality offset strong loan growth of 17% in NCNB's Southeast operations, as well as a 28% growth in deposits resulting from an aggressive marketing campaign.  The higher rates paid on deposits also helped squeeze NCNB's net interest margin in the Southeast to 3.38% from 3.80% a year earlier.  In Big Board composite trading yesterday, NCNB jumped $3.50 a share, to $51.  Results were released after the market closed.  NCNB Texas National, formed from the remnants of of the failed First RepublicBank Corp. of Dallas, contributed $76.9 million to NCNB's bottom line in the third quarter.  NCNB said its third-quarter results reflect 100% of earnings of the Texas operation since Aug. 1.  NCNB raised some $1.9 billion in new capital during the quarter to complete the NCNB Texas purchase, and to acquire several small failed thrifts to fill out its regional franchise.  Last week, the banking company said it purchased both Freedom Savings & Loan Association, Tampa, Fla., and University Federal Savings Association of San Antonio, Texas, for $169.4 million.  In the first nine months, NCNB's net income climbed 65% to $310.9 million, or $3.30 a share, from $188.2 million, or $2.22 a share, a year earlier.  Security Pacific Corp.  Security Pacific's earnings growth slowed in the third quarter, but the Los Angeles bank holding company was still able to post a 10% increase in net income because of robust growth in residential real-estate and consumer loans.  Net rose to $185.1 million, or $1.55 a share, from $167.9 million, or $1.47 a share, a year earlier.  The company said the gain resulted mainly from a $54 million increase in net interest income, reflecting a 33% increase in real estate loans (mainly residential), and a 19% rise in consumer loans.  These high-yielding loans in effect replaced some low-yielding assets such as inter-bank loans, which were allowed to decrease.  As a result, Security Pacific's net interest margin fell only 13 basis points, a more mild decrease than some major banks outside California, which have been reporting more sluggish earnings.  Security Pacific shares closed at $44.625, down 37.5 cents, in Big Board composite trading.  The earnings represent a 0.89% return on assets for Security Pacific, and an 18.9% return on equity.  The loan growth offset continuing real-estate loan losses in the depressed Arizona market.  Security Pacific reported a 33% increase in net credit losses for the quarter, to $109 million from $81.9 million in the year-ago period.  Nonperforming loans grew slightly to $1.75 billion at Sept. 30, from $1.7 billion a year ago.  Security Pacific's loan-loss provision was down 22%, or $30.4 million, because it added to its foreign-debt reserve the year before.  Non-interest income fell 6% in the quarter, mainly because of an unusual gain a year earlier from the sale of Hong Kong banking operations.  Non-interest expense grew only 4% in the period.  For the nine months, net rose 17% to $548.9 million, or $4.67 a share, from $469.4 million, or $4.13 a share, a year earlier.  LIN Broadcasting Corp. said it won't take a position on a revised tender offer by McCaw Cellular Communications Inc. to buy LIN and has asked for clarification of the offer.  The new offer, which seeks 50.3% of the cellular and broadcasting concern, is for $125 a share for 22 million LIN shares.  McCaw's revised tender offer would require McCaw to begin an auction process in July 1994 that would buy out remaining holders at a per-share price roughly equivalent to what a third party might then have to pay for all of LIN.  LIN is asking McCaw to clarify its tender offer, which challenges an agreement between BellSouth Corp. and LIN to merge their cellular-telephone businesses.  BellSouth has notified LIN that it would "shortly respond to the McCaw proposal in as full and effective a manner as is warranted."  The LIN board said holders may be misled by the provision in the McCaw proposal that "guarantees" private market value after five years for the remaining shares.  McCaw has "no obligation to purchase and the definition of private market value is uncertain," the LIN board said.  The board added that McCaw would be able to control LIN's operations and could, "therefore, operate LIN in a manner which could diminish its private market value and attractiveness to a third-party purchaser in five years."  In national over-the-counter trading, LIN closed at $104.75, down $2.75.  A group of institutional investors in Telerate Inc. said that Dow Jones & Co.'s $18-a-share offer for the electronic financial information services company is "grossly inadequate."  In a letter filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the group, which holds about 4.5 million Telerate shares, or about 4.7% of the shares outstanding, said " . . . at present none of us believes an offer for less than $25 per share would be fair and some believe that $25 is too low."  The letter was dated Oct. 6.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Telerate shares closed yesterday at $18.875, down 75 cents a share.  Dow Jones, publisher of The Wall Street Journal, has launched an $18-a-share, or $576 million, tender offer to acquire the remaining Telerate shares outstanding; Dow Jones owns 67% of Telerate.  Telerate has rejected the offer, which expires Nov. 3.  The group includes Putnam Cos. and various affiliates based in Boston; Wells Fargo Bank, San Francisco; the California Public Employees Retirement System, Sacramento, Calif., and T. Rowe Price Associates Inc., Baltimore.  Among other issues, the group's letter said it has "concerns as to whether Dow Jones's offer meets the applicable requirements of procedural fairness."  A spokesman for Dow Jones said he hadn't seen the group's filing, but added, "obviously Dow Jones disagrees with their conclusions.  Our offer is to buy any and all shares tendered at $18 a share."  U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills said the first dispute-settlement panel set up under the U.S.-Canadian "free trade" agreement has ruled that Canada's restrictions on exports of Pacific salmon and herring violate the accord.  Mrs. Hills said the U.S. and Canada have until Nov. 13 to resolve the dispute.  If a solution isn't reached by then, she said, the U.S. would have the right to suspend some trade concessions to Canada equivalent in value to the losses suffered by U.S. fish-processing companies in Alaska and the Pacific Northwest.  However, in Ottawa, Canadian Trade Minister John Crosbie said the dispute-settlement panel accepted the "legitimacy of Canada's position on the use of these landing requirements to conserve and manage these important fisheries."  Questioned about the seeming contradiction in the U.S. and Canadian government views of the panel's report, an aide for Mrs. Hills said the panel had clearly ruled that the Canadian trade restrictions "are illegal."  The U.S. trade representative declined to put a dollar estimate on the losses resulting from the Canadian export restrictions.  Canada initially had an export prohibition that was replaced by regulations requiring that such fish had to be brought ashore in British Columbia by commercial fishermen prior to export.  This action was defended by the Canadian government on conservation grounds.  Mrs. Hills said yesterday that the dispute-settlement panel rejected this Canadian government argument.  "We fully expect that Canada will comply with the panel's ruling" that the "landing requirement" also must be ended, she said.  Earlier, an international panel set up under the rules of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade in Geneva determined that the original Canadian fish-export restrictions violated GATT rules.  Mrs. Hills said the U.S. won't accept any delays after Nov. 13 because U.S. fish-processing firms enter into contracts in the fall to purchase the next season's catch.  She said the Canadian restrictions must be removed before such contracts are concluded.  Idle Thought  To spend a carefree, idle day,  When duty calls, to pay no heed,  To while the precious hours away --  Character is what you need.  -- May Richstone.  ---  Telecussed  The guy who throws an intercept  'Cause his receiver slips  Should somehow be advised that we  At home can read his lips.  -- Dick Emmons.  BancOklahoma Corp. said it completed a restructuring agreement previously agreed to by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp., creditor banks and subordinated debenture holders.  The plan would permit the bank holding company to retire its bank and debenture obligations through exchanges of cash and equity.  The FDIC, which in 1986 provided $130 million in open-bank assistance to BancOklahoma's Bank of Oklahoma, Tulsa, unit will continue to maintain $90 million in preferred stock in the Tulsa bank unit.  In exchange for the other $40 million, the FDIC will receive additional warrants entitling it to buy 60% of BancOklahoma's common stock outstanding, up from the 55% option the FDIC received under terms of the 1986 capital infusion.  In exchange for the $76 million they are owed, creditor banks will receive 3.9 million shares of BancOklahoma common stock and the proceeds from the future sales of four subsidiary banks to private buyers, the bank holding company said.  Also under the agreement, debenture holders will get one million shares of common stock in exchange for $7.7 million in debentures and holders of BancOklahoma's series A preferred stock will receive 1.25 shares of common stock for every share of preferred they own, the company said.  Bear Stearns's chief economist, Lawrence Kudlow, in the Sept. 29 issue of the firm's Global Spectator:  Were it true that a weak currency paves the way for trade surpluses, then presumably Argentina would be the center of today's global economy.  BSN Corp. said it will begin an offer tomorrow to exchange up to one million of its common shares and all of its $16.6 million in 7 3/4% convertible debentures due 2001 for a package of new debt and common stock warrants.  Under terms of the offer, the sporting goods maker will swap $9 face amount of 9 1/4% subordinated notes due 1996 and one warrant for each common share.  Each warrant allows the holder to buy one BSN share for $10.75 a share at any time over the next seven years.  BSN currently has 4.6 million common shares outstanding.  BSN also is offering $850 face amount of new notes and 64 common-stock warrants for each $1,000 face amount of its convertible debt outstanding.  The company said it can redeem the warrants at its option for $1 each.  The offer isn't contingent on a certain amount of debt or stock being exchanged.  BSN said it is making the offer to shrink its capital and increase shareholder value.  If all the bondholders and holders of one million common shares accept the offer, BSN will increase its debt by $9 million, but it also will recognize a $2 million gain from retiring the old debt, said Michael J. Blumenfeld, president.  "We have sufficient cash flow to handle that," he said.  The offers are scheduled to expire in mid to late November.  Merrill Lynch & Co.'s net income dropped 37%, while Bear Stearns Cos. posted a 7.5% gain in net, and PaineWebber Group Inc.'s profit fell, but would have risen without a special gain a year ago.  At Merrill Lynch, third-period net was $41 million, or 34 cents a share, down from $65.6 million, or 58 cents a share, a year ago.  Total revenue reached $2.83 billion, up 10% from $2.57 billion.  The firm's drop in net reflected weaker revenue in transactions for its own account -- a decline of 19% to $314.6 million on reduced revenue from trading fixed-income securities.  Investment banking revenue fell 22% to $296.6 million on fewer equity and municipal underwritings.  Merrill Lynch's commission revenue grew 21%, however, to $462.8 million, on higher share prices and volume and on strong sales of mutual funds.  Revenue derived from interest and dividends jumped 30% to $1.4 billion.  Asset-management fee revenue grew 12% to $151 million.  The brokerage also reported a loss of $2.2 million from the discontinued operations and disposal of its Fine Homes International Limited Partnership real-estate subsidiary.  Bear Stearns said net in the first quarter ended Sept. 29 reached $22.1 million, or 23 cents a share, from $20.5 million, or 20 cents a share, in the year-earlier quarter.  Gross revenue rose 21% to $580.4 million from $478.9 million.  Profit from trading for its own account dropped, the securities firm said.  Investment banking revenue climbed 25%, while commission revenue advanced 31% on a stronger retail market.  Bear Stearns is the holding company for Bear, Stearns & Co., the investment banking and brokerage firm.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Bear Stearns shares closed at $13.625, down 25 cents.  Separately, PaineWebber posted net income for the third quarter of $16.8 million, or 41 cents a share, reflecting a "broad-based improvement" in the company's core businesses.  Retail profit surged, but the company said it was only a "modest contributor" to third-quarter results.  A year ago, net at the New York investment banking firm was $20.9 million, or 50 cents a share, including a special pretax gain of $46.3 million from the sale of the company's interest in National Car Rental Systems Inc. Revenue was $444.9 million, including net interest, down slightly from $450.7 million.  In Big Board composite trading yesterday, PaineWebber closed at $18.50, up 75 cents.  Seafirst Corp. said it signed an agreement with builder Martin Selig to purchase its headquarters building, the Columbia Seafirst Center, for $354 million.  Purchase of the 76-story structure is subject to execution of a definitive agreement, approval by the boards of Seafirst and its parent company BankAmerica Corp., and approval by regulators.  The market upheaval apparently hasn't triggered any cash crunch -- yet.  Individual investors, investment firms and arbitragers who speculate in the stocks of takeover candidates can suffer liquidity and payment problems when stocks dive; those investors often borrow heavily to buy their holdings and use the stocks as collateral for loans.  But several large banks said yesterday they detected no signs of unusual demand for credit that would signal such difficulties.  "We're seeing nothing out of the ordinary," said one official at a Top 10 bank.  "That's good news, because we all swim in this water."  Added another executive at a big bank: "We were all a little goosey over the weekend trying to forecast what would happen {Monday}, but it's been very quiet.  Now, as for tomorrow, hell, who knows?"  What happened Friday shows that financial markets are not yet sufficiently coordinated to handle another meltdown in prices.  No fiddling with systems and procedures will ever prevent markets from suffering a panic wave of selling.  But markets can operate with greater or lesser efficiency.  After the 1987 plunge, markets agreed that it would be wise to halt trading whenever panic conditions arose.  The New York Stock Exchange adopted two specific circuit breakers: If the Dow Jones index falls 250 points in a day, the exchange will halt trading for one hour; if the decline hits 400 points, the exchange will close for an additional two hours.  The rationale is that an interruption of trading will allow investors to reconsider their strategies, calm sellers and lead buyers to enter the market at indicated new price levels.  It is impossible to know whether that theory is realistic.  A temporary cessation of trading may indeed discourage a selling panic from feeding on itself.  But there is also the possibility that shutting down markets will intensify fears and cause an even more abrupt slide in prices.  What happened Friday was the worst of all worlds.  The futures exchanges followed their own pre-set circuit breakers and shut down at about 3 p.m. for 30 minutes, after the Standard & Poor's 500 stock index had fallen 12 points, or about 100 points on the Dow Jones index.  Options markets stopped trading in many securities.  The New York Stock Exchange, under its own rules, remained open.  With nowhere else to go, sellers, and particularly program traders, focused all their selling on the New York Stock Exchange.  As liquidity on that market weakened, prices fell sharply.  Had the futures and options markets been open, additional liquidity would have been provided and the decline, most probably, would have been less intense.  At 3:30, after intense telephone negotiations between the trading markets and Washington, the futures exchanges reopened.  Futures trading, however, was halted altogether at 3:45, after the futures markets had dropped an additional 30 points, which is the daily limit for price declines.  At this point, the options markets also shut down and once more left all sales to be handled by the New York Stock Exchange.  It is time to recognize that the New York Stock Exchange, the futures markets and the options markets, though physically separate, have actually become so closely intertwined as to constitute one market effectively.  Traders can vary their strategies and execute their orders in any one of them.  It therefore makes no sense for each market to adopt different circuit breakers.  To achieve maximum liquidity and minimize price volatility, either all markets should be open to trading or none.  Synchronized circuit breakers would not have halted the slide in prices on Friday, but they probably would have made for smoother, less volatile executions.  It's time for the exchanges and the Securities and Exchange Commission to agree on joint conditions for halting trading or staying open.  Let's not have one market shut down for 30 minutes when the Dow declines 100 points and another shut down for an hour after a 250-point decline.  The need for hurried last-minute telephone negotiations among market officials will disappear once rules are in place that synchronize circuit breakers in all markets.  The new circuit breakers, if they are to be applied at all, will require that futures and options trading continue as long as the New York Stock Exchange remains open.  The rules should be established by agreement of the officials of all affected exchanges acting under the oversight and with the approval of the government regulatory agencies.  Should the SEC and the Commodities Futures Trading Commission (which, with the SEC, regulates the Chicago stock-index markets) be unable to agree, the issue may have to be resolved by decision of the Treasury secretary.  In many ways, our financial markets are better prepared today to handle a decline than they were two years ago.  The New York Stock Exchange now has the capacity to handle a volume of nearly a billion shares a day.  Telephone service has been improved for customers trying to reach their brokers, and specialists -- who I believe should stay, despite the urgings of some post-crash critics -- have larger capital positions. (Of course, specialists' actions alone can never prevent a major crack in stock prices.  Witness the fact that trading in some stocks closed early Friday and opened late Monday because of an excess of sell orders.) But the task of improving market performance remains unfinished.  ---  Mr. Freund, former chief economist of the New York Stock Exchange, is a professor of economics at Pace University's business school in New York.  A UNIFIED EUROPE poses labor problems and prospects for U.S. firms.  The "social dimension" -- worker concerns -- of the European Community's plan to open its internal borders in 1992 could set the effort "off the rails" if not done reasonably, says General Electric senior vice president Frank Doyle.  U.S. companies wanting to expand in Europe face "tough pressure" from unions in nations such as West Germany, which play a big consulting role in management decisions, he says.  FMC Corp. and Baxter International say unions also won't like plant relocations and needed restructuring, which means layoffs.  Many employers have already begun moving to southern countries such as Spain and Italy, where wages are low and unions are weaker; demand for trained labor and managers will rise there, FMC says.  Pfizer, Fluor and GE see big "EC 92" pluses: a push for job training and ease in moving and finding workers.  CLUBBING A FAN wasn't the Baltimore Orioles' fault.  So said a federal judge, in a case involving two players for the minor league Bluefield, Va., Orioles, a Baltimore farm team.  The players were heckled by a patron during a July 4, 1988, game with the Martinsville Phillies.  Like its parent that year, "Bluefield was not having a good year," the judge said.  After the game ("Bluefield lost, 9-8, stranding three runners in . . . the ninth," he noted), trouble began.  More taunting in the parking lot, the players said, led to a fight.  The fan said he was punched and kicked by one player and that the other broke his jaw with a baseball bat.  The judge dismissed the fan's suit against the team, however, ruling the Orioles innocent of negligent hiring, and not responsible for a fight that was outside the players' employment.  PROPOSALS ARISE for coping with the shortage of nurses.  An Association of Academic Health Centers report urges freeing nurses from duties that don't require special skills.  It also recommends better retirement and day-care benefits, and basing pay on education, experience and nurses' demanding work schedules.  But it opposes an American Medical Association proposal for creating a "registered care technologist," as "potentially divisive"; it says the job would entail an unwanted new doctor's "bedside" extension.  Over a third of 618 hospitals surveyed by consultant Hewitt Associates use a "clinical ladder," basing advancement on performance and education.  Many also use recruiting bonuses, tuition reimbursement, loan repayment or child-care help.  Some give lump-sum incentives.  MRA Staffing Systems signs up nurses for paid travel, promising annual income up to $50,000 and free or subsidized housing.  TREATING EMPLOYEES with respect is crucial for managers, says consultant Hay Group after surveys of a million workers.  It's in their top five "work values."  Fully 80% of employees who say their bosses treat them with respect, but only a third of those who don't feel respected say they're satisfied with where they work.  SPRUCING UP THE DIGS: About 200 employees of the Maryland Department of Economic and Employment Development for four months painted walls, polished and carpeted floors, bought plants, cleaned windows and blinds, and hung pictures at the agency's Baltimore office.  The 3,000 hours of work will save the state $55,000.  CURBING WAGE BOOSTS will get high priority again in 1990 collective bargaining, a Bureau of National Affairs survey of 250 companies with pacts expiring next year indicates.  Despite labor-shortage warnings, 80% aim for first-year wage increases of under 4%; and 77% say they'd try to replace workers, if struck, or would consider it.  TEMPORARY WORKERS have good educations, the National Association of Temporary Services says; its survey of 2,508 such employees shows 82% with more than a high-school education, and 31% with college degrees.  About 12% have retired from a full-time job, while 54% were asked to stay on full time.  HOME-SALE LOSSES rise, but they're often covered by employers.  But they search for ways to limit the damage.  A third of 439 companies surveyed by the Employee Relocation Council report a rise in 1988 sales losses over 1987.  About 72% reimburse for all or some losses.  Since 1984, more companies give sales-loss aid, as many real-estate values depreciated, the council says.  RJR Nabisco pays up to $30,000 of losses, including improvements.  Goodrich won't ensure loss coverage, but will prevent a "catastrophic loss"; it has given some employees the full purchase price when values fell from concern over dangers posed by a disposal site.  Federal Express, Dow Chemical, Ford and National City Corp. will buy the home or let the worker sell to an outside firm, but usually won't cover a loss.  Since 1984, firms offering prepurchase house appraisals, to deter overpaying, rose to 40% of those the council polled, from 28%.  THE CHECKOFF: The National Academy of Engineering gives two inventors of the semiconductor microchip a $350,000 achievement award. . . .  Now, that's reactionary: Letter Carriers union president Vincent Sombrotto accuses Philadelphia postmaster Charles James of "12th century . . . oppressive management tactics."  Yesterday was, in the words of New York Stock Exchange Chairman John J. Phelan Jr., just your "reasonably normal, 400 million-share, up 88-points day."  When it was all over and stocks had staged a huge recovery, Big Board officials were self-congratulatory about how well the day had gone.  They said the exchange's trading procedures, personnel, equipment and links with other exchanges couldn't have performed better.  "We had no operating problems at all," Mr. Phelan said after the market closed.  "All the things that we set up to slow down the process, to let people know that the market was in an extreme position, worked extremely well."  Prices for the 416.3 million shares that changed hands during the session were carried on the exchange's trading tape with barely a delay, officials said.  While reaching blockbuster proportions yesterday, the volume was still well within the 600 million-share capacity that the exchange has said it can handle daily since beefing up its computers after the October 1987 crash.  The so-called circuit breakers devised by the Big Board and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange to quell free falls in stock and futures prices weren't triggered yesterday because the markets were higher for most of the day.  Despite traders' complaints, Mr. Phelan said the links with the Chicago futures market worked as planned in Friday's rout to provide a cooling-off period.  Of greater help, the Big Board chairman said, was the "natural circuit breaker" of the weekend, that provided a breathing period that "brought rationality back to the market."  Chicken Chains Ruffled  By Loss of Customers  FAST-FOOD chicken chains, faced with a worsening business slump, are struggling to hatch some new marketing strategies.  The Crest Report, which tracks consumer purchases, says customer traffic at chicken restaurants fell 10% in the second quarter, while the overall fast-food customer count was down 2%.  Chicken business is off largely because of more competition from grocery-store convenience food, home-delivered pizza and other takeout fare, says a spokesman for the report, a publication of NPD Group, a market research firm in Port Washington, N.Y.  The loss of more customers is the latest in a string of problems.  Church's Fried Chicken Inc. and Popeye's Famous Fried Chicken Inc., which have merged, are still troubled by overlapping restaurant locations.  Chicken chains also are feeling more pressure from McDonald's Corp., which introduced its McChicken sandwich this year and recently tested the sale of individual pieces of chicken.  New management at Kentucky Fried Chicken, a unit of PepsiCo Inc., has fought back with new medium and large chicken sandwiches for the lunch crowd.  And the chain is testing products that aren't fried, such as "char-grilled" chicken, to try to win health-conscious consumers.  Kentucky Fried Chicken also is testing home-delivery of chicken, which could be a hit with stay-at-home diners.  But some fast-food industry analysts say problems with keeping chicken warm and fresh must be solved first.  A Kentucky Fried Chicken spokesman, however, disputed the notion that the delivery service experienced problems in some markets where testing has been discontinued.  He says the test is continuing in Chicago, Columbus, Ohio, and a few other cities.  The advertising industry is buzzing with rumors that Kentucky Fried Chicken will drop Young & Rubicam and seek a new ad agency.  But the company declines to comment.  Emanuel Goldman, a PaineWebber Inc. analyst, predicts Kentucky Fried Chicken will post an 11% drop in 1989 net income.  "They've been laggard," he says, "but they'll have to become more aggressive."  Reluctant Advertisers  Try Soft-Sell Spots  CALL IT un-advertising.  Pittsburgh consultant David Bear is selling a soft approach to clients who want exposure yet shun pushy ads.  His ploy: 60-second radio spots that offer helpful hints.  The only plug for the sponsor is a brief mention at the end of the spot.  The messages resemble the Business Traveler, a daily dose of travel tips developed by Mr. Bear and sponsored by travel agencies in several major cities.  New un-advertisers include Burt Hill Kosar Rittlemann Associates, a Butler, Pa., architectural firm.  Its radio series features such spots as "Floodlights: Evening Wear for Urban Structures" and "Building a Place to Park."  A harder sell, says John Kosar, the firm's president, would "detract from the profession."  Hospitals have signed up to use the messages to promote fundraisers, and Equitable Gas Co. is considering the format to offer energy tips to consumers.  But such spots can be too soft.  "There's always a risk of lost messages," says John Fitzgerald, chairman of Ketchum Advertising USA, which created similar radio spots for Pittsburgh National Bank.  "It's a question of how much credibility you gain for the possible loss of recognition."  Retailer Sees Pitfalls  In Environmental Push  HERE'S a retailer that's getting tough in the push for environmentally safe packaging and products.  Big Bear Supermarkets Inc., a grocery chain based in San Diego, plans to display shelf cards and distribute pamphlets recommending products deemed safe for the environment.  The choices will be based on research by the San Diego Environmental Health Coalition and will include products like Murphy's Oil Soap and other noncorrosive cleaners.  But the chain is quickly realizing the pitfalls of such endorsements.  For example, it recommends nonchlorinated dishwasher detergent and puts Sunlight on its environmentally safe list.  That doesn't thrill Procter & Gamble Co., maker of Cascade dishwasher detergent.  A company spokesman questioned the validity of the list, noting that chlorine is present in all major dishwasher detergents.  In fact, Lever Bros. confirms that its Sunlight brand does contain chlorine bleach, even though it isn't listed on the label for the powder version.  Thomas G. Dahlen, Big Bear's executive vice president, said the chain is still reviewing its product list to avoid such problems.  "Our intent is to promote the best alternative," he says.  "And it's important that we be accurate."  But in the end, customers' wishes are what will prevail.  Big Bear doesn't care for disposable diapers, which aren't biodegradable.  Yet parents demand them.  Says Mr. Dahlen, "We'll still be forced to sell items we might not philosophically agree with."  Odds and Ends  NEATNESS does count -- at least in the grocery store.  A study by Safeway's Scanner Marketing Research shows soap sales climbed 5% when bars were neatly stacked on shelves instead of dumped in a wire basket. . . .  Which celebrity endorsers are most believable?  For the third year in a row, consumers voted Bill Cosby first and James Garner second in persuasiveness as spokesmen in TV commercials, according to Video Storyboard Tests, New York.  Michael J. Fox replaced Bruce Willis in third place; Cher placed fourth for the second time.  Health and Human Services Secretary Louis Sullivan has chosen Antonia Novello to be the next surgeon general, Bush administration officials said.  If she is nominated by President Bush and confirmed by the Senate, Dr. Novello would succeed C. Everett Koop, who rattled liberals and conservatives alike with his outspoken views on a range of health issues.  Dr. Novello, an expert on pediatric kidney diseases, is deputy director of the National Institute of Child Health and Human Development.  She has also served on several task forces on acquired immune deficiency syndrome.  Dr. Novello's office said she wouldn't talk with reporters, and it refused to release any information about her.  The newsletter Medicine & Health, which first disclosed her selection by Dr. Sullivan, said she is 44 years old and she studied at the University of Puerto Rico School of Medicine.  The continuing series of HUD scandals is a sadly predictable result of pork-barrel politics.  Nevertheless, lobbies such as the National Association of Home Builders (NAHB) continue to pressure Capitol Hill for more special-interest spending.  Kent Colton, NAHB executive vice president, argues that the U.S. faces a multifaceted housing crisis -- reduced affordability of homes for first-time buyers, increased homelessness, and lower apartment construction rates -- that will be "very difficult" to solve "without expanded federal resources."  There's nothing unusual about business groups pushing for more government spending.  But the NAHB was created in 1943 out of an organization that made its name fighting a Roosevelt administration proposal to take over all defense housing production.  Through the years the association has been an active member of the taxpayer's coalition, pushing for such initiatives as the balanced-budget amendment.  Yet on matters close to, er, home . . .  "The HUD budget has dropped by more than 70% since 1980," argues Mr. Colton.  "We've taken more than our fair share.  I wouldn't have a problem if other programs had taken a similar hit."  But NAHB support for subsidies is not related to the current housing crunch; over the years the NAHB has backed a host of public programs.  It once pushed for a national housing production goal set by the federal government and has regularly advanced anti-recession housing measures.  Moreover, explains one HUD official, the NAHB remains susceptible to internal pressure from members that specialize in subsidized production.  The association is pushing an extensive and expensive wish-list, which would substantially boost spending above the current level of more than $15 billion annually.  It would like to peg the ceiling on Federal Housing Administration mortgage guarantees to 95% of the median price in a particular market, instead of limiting it to $101,250; reduce (or even eliminate) FHA down-payment requirements and increase the availability of variable-rate mortgages; expand the Veterans Affairs Department loan guarantee program; provide "adequate" funding for the Farmers Home Administration (FmHA); increase federal funding and tax incentives for the construction of low-income and rental housing, including $4 billion in block grants to states and localities; and "fully fund" the McKinney Act, a $656 million potpourri for the homeless.  Direct federal subsidies for housing construction have proved intolerably expensive in the past, and inevitably are twisted to the benefit of well-connected developers and lobbyists, as demonstrated by the ongoing HUD scandal, or congressmen.  Indirect subsidies, through the FHA, for instance, are little better.  Though Mr. Colton says expanding FHA lending would result in "no cost to the government," the mere diversion of funds from other parts of the economy and from other forms of housing (such as low-income) to the single-family home market would result in a major expense.  More important, housing programs run by HUD, the VA, and FmHA are awash in red ink.  The FHA alone lost $4.2 billion in fiscal 1988; the government's equity in the agency, essentially its reserve fund, fell to minus $2.9 billion.  The federal government has had to pump in $2.28 billion into the VA housing program since 1984 to keep the fund afloat and the VA requested an additional $120 million for the fiscal year just ended.  All told, the federal government already guarantees more than $900 billion of mortgages.  In its nicely produced publication "Where Will Our Children Live?" the NAHB does acknowledge that "of course, the full measure of housing affordability cannot be provided by the federal government."  It points to the pernicious impact of local government regulation, particularly zoning and building fees, which pushes the price of housing out of the reach of low- and middle-income people.  But while the NAHB has suggested actions that states and localities should take to reduce regulatory barriers, the association has proposed no activist legislative program -- comparable to, say, its detailed request for more federal subsidies -- to eliminate counterproductive controls.  The association, a majority of whose 156,000 members build fewer than 25 units a year, is like many other business lobbies.  Explains Sheila MacDonald of the National Taxpayers Union: "It treads in two worlds.  The builders like the subsidies, but at the same time they tend to be fiscal conservatives in terms of major issues, such as the balanced-budget amendment."  Unfortunately, the organization's desire for pork tends to override its commitment to overall fiscal responsibility.  Two years ago when the NAHB lobbied for the $19 billion omnibus housing bill, the organization "basically dropped out of the taxpayers' coalition," says Ms. MacDonald.  As Mr. Colton of the NAHB acknowledges: "Government is not going to solve the problem. . . .  The real key is to have the economy working and interest rates down."  More money for HUD will increase the deficit and destabilize the economy; more money to municipalities that are wrecking their local housing markets will further insulate them from the destructive effects of their policies.  Is this what the home builders want?  ---  Mr. Bandow is a Cato Institute fellow.  (See related story: "And Bills to Make Wishes Come True" -- WSJ Oct. 17, 1989.)  In an attempt to give new momentum to European Community plans for a single currency, EC government leaders are likely to agree to set a date for starting formal talks on amending the EC's founding Treaty of Rome.  According to diplomatic sources in Brussels, most EC leaders agree that talks should begin in the second half of 1990, and will make a declaration on that during a summit meeting in Strasbourg, France, on Dec. 8 and 9.  The only strong opposition to changing the EC treaty comes from British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher, who is opposed to creating a single EC currency.  But the process of convening the intergovernmental conference doesn't require unanimity.  Setting a date to start treaty negotiations has no legal significance in itself, but could be viewed as an important psychological push.  French President Francois Mitterrand fought to set a date for the conference during the EC summit in Madrid last June, but the move was scuttled because of opposition by Mrs. Thatcher and West German Chancellor Helmut Kohl.  Diplomatic sources said Mr. Kohl may now agree to set a date for the conference to make it clear that West Germany is still committed to EC unity.  The latest crewcut in the equities markets reminds me of the joke T. Boone Pickens tells about the guy who was run over by the parade.  When asked "What went wrong?" the unfortunate victim replied, "It was a combination of things."  And so it was on Gray Friday.  The grand marshal of this parade would appear to have been excess leverage.  Even if that is so, however, it's probably the case that no barriers should have been erected to stop the procession before the end of the rout(e).  The ceremonies began Friday afternoon when word spread that the UAL buy-out was collapsing.  Although the union-bidder expects to patch together a substitute offer, consisting of less cash, the failure to get cash from Japanese and American banks confirmed a growing fear among arbitragers that the pageant of high-leverage takeover deals is ending.  Lots of other entries made up the parade, of course -- notably a surprisingly large increase in producer prices, signalling Federal Reserve tightness; and the Bush administration's (temporary?) defeat in trying to lower the capital-gains tax.  As usual, few favorable reviews were heard for that ever-present marching band of program traders, although most serious studies suggest they only play the music that others write.  What really spooked the crowds along Wall Street, however, was the sudden concern that, whatever the reason, the pool of debt capital is drying up.  Gray Friday reflects a panic mainly by the takeover arbitragers, rather than the small investor, as their highly margined investments in the "deal" stocks are jeopardized by the unexpected drying up of the lubricant for deal financing.  Deal stocks led the market down as they absorbed the heaviest losses.  UAL, which triggered the slide, opened Monday at $224, down about 20% from Thursday's close.  AMR opened Monday at $80, down nearly 20% from Thursday's close. (Both took further hits yesterday.) Hilton lost 20% on Friday; Paramount lost almost 11%.  A careful look reveals that where deal financing has been secured, the target's stock price was not affected on Friday.  The multibillion-dollar prospects, where the bidder must line up a consortium of banks and/or issue billions in high-yield debt, were where the damage was concentrated.  The market for so-called junk bonds has been setting the stage for Friday's dramatic march for several weeks.  The growing financial difficulties of recent high-leverage restructurings or takeovers, such as Resorts International, Integrated Resources, and Campeau's retailing empire, have cast a pall over the entire market for high-yield securities.  Investors have reacted by ignoring recent efforts to float junk bonds by Ohio Mattress and by forcing Ramada to postpone indefinitely its planned junk-bond sale and restructuring.  As a result, high-yield mutual funds have declined across the board and the many firms planning to sell $11 billion in junk bonds before year-end are experiencing anxious times.  These are all market excesses (putting aside the artificial boosts that the tax code gives to debt over equity), and what we've seen is the market reining them in.  Of course, Washington hadn't been silent in the days leading up to the debacle, and its tendency to meddle in the leverage equation remains a troublesome prospect, but those preliminary steps shouldn't distract us from the basic market fundamentalism that was at work on Friday.  If it is correct to find that concerns over corporate debt and LBOs caused Gray Friday, what are the implications for policy makers?  After all, the stock market's response to the collapse of the UAL deal might be taken to confirm the anti-debt direction of regulators.  Is this a case where private markets are approving of Washington's bashing of Wall Street?  Absolutely not.  To the extent that Friday's sell-off reflected a sudden reappraisal of the excesses of leverage, the message is that Wall Street and the private markets are fully capable of imposing the appropriate incentives and sanctions on corporate behavior.  The national economic interests are much better served allowing the private interests of bankers and investors be the ultimate judges of the investment quality of various LBO deals and leveraged restructurings.  The recent difficulties in the junk-bond markets and the scarcity of bank capital for recent deals underscores the wisdom of letting the free markets operate.  If takeover premiums become excessive, if LBO dealmakers become too aggressive, then the private market will recognize these problems more quickly and accurately than will policy makers, and the markets will move with lightning speed to impose appropriate sanctions.  Yes, the broader exchanges got caught up in the spiral, but they rode the tiger up all year.  Not surprisingly, he sometimes bites.  The arbitragers and takeover initiatiors got killed on Gray Friday, while the besieged managers of prospective targets cheered lustily.  If you identify with the besieged managers, you must concede that speedy and effective relief from the excesses of the takeover market is more likely to come from the marketplace than from Washington.  If you side with the arbitragers and raiders, you clearly have more to fear from private investors than from regulators, although the Delaware courts should never be underestimated.  The truth is, Washington understands politics better than economics.  Although the average citizen is probably not harmed too much from Washington's rhetorical war against Wall Street regarding excessive financial leveraging, actual legislation would probably impose considerable harm.  Any such attempt to distinguish "good debt" from "bad debt," or to draw the line at a particular industry, such as the airlines, is likely to blunt the spur that the proper amount of leverage provides both to equity markets and economic efficiency in general.  Far better for policy makers to concentrate on the war against drugs, Panama and the deficit, all of them parades that seem never to end.  ---  Mr. Jarrell, former top economist at the Securities and Exchange Commission, teaches at the University of Rochester's Simon Business School.  Tokyo share prices rebounded Tuesday morning, with the Nikkei index of 225 selected stocks rising 618.69 points to close the morning session at 35087.38.  The index slid 647.33 points, or 1.8%, on Monday.  In the first 25 minutes of Tuesday's trading the Nikkei index soared 664.83 points, to 35133.83.  By 10 a.m. Tokyo time, the index was up 435.11 points, to 34903.80 as investors hailed New York's overnight rally.  Monday's slide came in a relatively calm session that didn't provide much direction for other markets.  Shares also closed sharply lower across Europe, particularly in Frankfurt, although London and a few other markets recovered some ground after stocks began to rebound in New York.  Other Asian and Pacific markets had sharper losses than Tokyo, but the selling wave stopped short of precipitating another market crash.  All eyes were on Tokyo at the opening because it was the first major market to trade since Friday's 190.58-point plunge on Wall Street.  But rather than set the tone for other markets, Japan's major institutional investors chose to remain on the sidelines.  Still, despite the sudden reappearance of stock-market turbulence, managers of Japanese investment funds said they weren't planning to unload U.S. or European equities.  "We didn't trade much today, as our policy now is to wait and see," said a fund manager at Taisho Life Insurance Co.  "We would like to wait and see until trading goes around through Europe and New York."  The institutions appeared confident that Japanese regulators would step in to ensure orderly trading if necessary, and there was considerable speculation during the day that the Finance Ministry was working behind the scenes to do just that.  But in the absence of panicky trading, its presence was never overtly felt.  At the close, the Nikkei average of 225 stocks stood at 34468.69, down 647.33 points, or 1.8%.  The broader Tokyo Stock Price Index sank 45.66, or 1.7%, to 2600.88.  The day's decline was generally in line with analysts' weekend predictions.  Declining issues swamped advancers, 941-105.  But volume was thin at 526.2 million shares, compared with 574.7 million Friday.  The market opened sharply lower, with the Nikkei average down nearly 600 after 20 minutes.  A midmorning rebound brought it back to show a gain of about 200 at the end of the morning session, but the rally failed in the afternoon, and the market closed near the day's low.  The smaller stocks in the Tokyo market's second section also posted their biggest decline of the year.  The Tokyo Stock Exchange index for the second section fell 100.96, or 2.7%, to 3655.40.  Many investors, trying to outperform the market's major indexes, have flocked to these small issues in recent weeks.  Japanese investors and traders expressed relief that the Tokyo market didn't fall more sharply.  But its performance did bear some resemblance to events of two years ago, during the October 1987 global stock market crash.  On Oct. 16, 1987 -- the Friday before the Black Monday crash -- the New York market dropped 4.6%, and Tokyo followed on Monday with a 2.4% drop.  This time, Wall Street's plunge of 6.9% Friday was followed by yesterday's 1.8% loss in Tokyo.  Two years ago, Tokyo's biggest fall came the day after New York's 22.6% Black Monday plunge, when the Nikkei average fell 14.9%.  Thus, market participants yesterday were looking ahead nervously to Wall Street's opening.  But in New York yesterday, the Dow Jones Industrial Average surged 88.12 to close at 2657.38 on heavy volume of 416,290,000 shares, although declining issues still outnumbered advancing ones on the broad market.  Nobuto Yasuda, a director at Yamaichi Investment Trust & Management Co., called yesterday's session "a good scenario" for Japan.  "Now we are looking for the time to place buy orders," he said.  "For us institutional investors, the chance for buying has come."  Isao Ushikubo, general manager of the investment research department at Toyo Trust & Banking Co., also was optimistic.  He described Friday's plunge in the U.S. as a "fleeting" event resulting in part from excessive merger and acquisition activity.  "Unless there is a panic, this is the best time to buy, as was the case two years ago," he said.  "Those shares which had posted gains on M&A speculation were dashed with cold water, but as far as major stocks are concerned, there isn't much impact."  Other fund managers were similarly sanguine.  "We have no plans to adjust our asset allocation in foreign equities," said Masato Murakami, chief portfolio manager in the pension fund management department at Yasuda Trust & Banking Co.  He said Friday's Wall Street decline was "well within the range of volatility" that Yasuda Trust plans for when it charts its overseas investment strategy.  Among other Asian and Pacific markets, Malaysia and Singapore had the biggest losses, with the Kuala Lumpur composite index in Malaysia falling 11.5% and Singapore's Straits Times Industrial Index down 10%.  Major indexes declined more than 8% in Australia and New Zealand and 6.5% in Hong Kong.  Bangkok, Manila, Seoul, Taipei and Jakarta escaped with slightly smaller losses.  Brokers and fund managers said the region's markets were reacting to Friday's Wall Street plunge even though that decline was due to local factors such as failed corporate buy-outs and a deteriorating junk-bond market.  "It's pure psychology," said William Au Yeung, an account executive for Drexel Burnham Lambert (HK) Ltd. in Hong Kong.  "Markets in this region aren't so geared to leveraged buy-outs, and their economies generally are in good shape, but there's no doubt that Asia is still following America's lead."  Several analysts said Malaysia and Singapore had the biggest losses because they are relatively open to rapid cash flows.  Hong Kong is the region's next most open market, but many foreign investors have been staying away from it since it plunged in June amid political turmoil in China.  "Singapore took the hit because when people want to get out, they tend to go where the liquidity is," said Elizabeth Hambrecht, a regional analyst with Baring Securities (Hong Kong) Ltd.  She pointed out that even after Monday's 10% decline, the Straits Times index is up 24% this year, so investors who bailed out generally did so profitably.  Similarly, Kuala Lumpur's composite index yesterday ended 27.5% above its 1988 close.  In Hong Kong, the Hang Seng Index fell 180.60 to finish at 2601.70.  Trading was heavy at about one billion shares, compared with 473.9 million Friday.  But the session was orderly, in contrast to the market's four-day closure after the 1987 crash.  Richard Chenevix-Trench, a director at Hong Kong-based Baring International Fund Managers Ltd., said the market probably hasn't hit bottom yet but is close.  "If New York doesn't collapse, I see maybe another 5% on the downside, not counting the risk of bad news out of China," he said.  In Australia, Sydney's All Ordinaries index closed at 1601.5, down 8.1%, its biggest drop since October 1987.  But volume rose only to 162 million shares from 143 million Friday.  Nestor Hinzack, an analyst at brokerage firm Burdett, Buckeridge & Young Ltd., described the market's performance as "sheep-like" as investors fled to bluechip Australian stocks and shunned entrepreneurial companies they perceived as having any takeover premium built into the price.  London's Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index, the most closely watched market barometer, ended at its intraday high of 2163.4, down 70.5, or 3.2%.  At its low, shortly before Wall Street opened, it was off more than 130 points.  The Financial Times 30-share index closed 79.3 points lower at 1738.7.  Volume more than doubled to 959.3 million shares from 457.7 million Friday.  Prices on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange tumbled in heavy trading.  The decline in the German Stock Index of 203.56 points, or 12.8%, to 1385.72 was the Frankfurt market's steepest fall ever.  Retail investors dumped holdings on a massive scale, pushing some blue-chip shares down as much as 20%.  Analysts cited memories of two years ago, when many small investors held on to their shares after the October crash but the West German market continued to decline steeply for the next three months.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Oct. 13 Oct. 12 Year  @U.S. ........................ 306.5 326.5 + 19.7  @Britain ..................... 667.6 668.4 + 22.2  @Canada ...................... 427.4 439.0 + 16.4  @Japan ....................... 1523.9 1513.8 + 7.3  @France ...................... 551.4 552.4 + 24.6  @Germany ..................... 255.2 257.1 + 22.7  @Hong Kong ................... 2104.7 2108.8 + 3.7  @Switzerland ................. 228.0 228.5 + 31.8  @Australia ................... 348.4 345.6 + 20.0  @World Index ................. 524.7 533.4 + 6.1  ---  @ Weekly Percentage Leaders  Last week's best and worst performing stocks among those issues that make up 80% of the world's stock market capitalization (in local currency)  @Issue (Country) Close % Chg  @ Winning Issues  @Neusiedler (Austria) .................. 7550.0 + 21.8  @Stad Rotterdam (Dutch) ................ 53.1 + 18.0  @Ariadne Australia (Australia) ......... 0.2 + 17.6  @Wang Laboratories B (U.S.) ............ 5.5 + 15.8  @Kone B Free (550.0) ................... 15.8 + 15.8  @Creditanstalt Vorzug (Austria) ........ 4490.0 + 14.5  @Nintendo (Japan) ......................15800.0 + 14.5  @Kokusai Electric (Japan) .............. 3900.0 + 14.4  @Toyota Motor Corp. (Japan) ............ 2790.0 + 14.3  @Paribas (Cie Financiere) (France) ..... 602.0 + 14.2  @ Losing Issues  @Western Union (U.S.) .................. 0.469 - 58.3  @Imperial Corp (U.S.) .................. 2.25 - 30.8  @Bell Group ............................ .... -  @Ramada (U.S.) ......................... 9.625 - 28.0  @Owens-Corning Fiberglass (U.S.) ....... 25.75 - 24.5  @Hilton Hotels (U.S.) .................. 86.0 - 10.4  @Elec and Eltek (Hong Kong) ............ 0.445 - 19.1  @Conagra (U.S.) ........................ 32.0 - 19.0  @Bally Manufacturing (U.S.) ............ 19.875 - 18.9  @Amstrad (Britain) ..................... 0.52 - 18.8  @Source: Morgan Stanley Capital Intl.  Perspective  Frank Lloyd Wright is reported to have said once that if you tipped the world on its side, everything loose would end up in California.  We've always thought that Mr. Wright underestimated California's vitality, but maybe the state's la-la factions are starting to overwhelm the forces that made it such a significant place.  What else is one to make of the whacky save-the-earth initiative just proposed by several major environmental groups and organized by the state's attorney general?  If passed by the voters, the recently announced initiative would phase out major pesticides, reduce carbon dioxide emissions by 40%, ban new offshore drilling, ban chemicals thought to deplete the ozone layer, and create a new state environmental officer armed with a $40 million budget to sue any firm or agency he thinks is being too dirty.  The initiative is based largely on the wish-lists of the green lobby: the Sierra Club, the League of Conservation Voters, the Natural Resources Defense Council, the National Toxics Campaign and the Citizens for a Better Environment.  Interestingly, the Environmental Defense Fund is having nothing to do with this one.  Not only Californians but all Americans would pay if this thing passed.  The initiative bars the sale of any crops in California that don't meet the initiative's standards.  Kansas wheat farmers and Florida fruit growers would have to adjust or give up the California market.  In other words, California is presuming to take control of the nation's farm policy.  As usual the green lobby's proposal is disconnected from scientific reality.  Consider the greenhouse-effect provision.  The proposed initiative would mandate a reduction of carbon dioxide of 40%.  Even if one buys into the whole greenhouse theory, it is inconceivable that reductions in a single state could have any impact on what is billed as a global problem.  But if rational science and economics have nothing to do with the new environment initiative, what is going on?  The first place to look under these circumstances is at the ways in which the sponsors themselves will benefit.  The key here is the ambition of state Attorney General John Van de Kamp.  He's running for governor.  Mr. Van de Kamp is the one who collected the plans from the various radical environmental groups and cobbled them into a single unwieldy initiative to be placed on the ballot for election on Nov. 6, 1990.  That's also the day of the gubernatorial election.  The initiative seems to have been crafted to include all the hot issues that set off the wealthy Hollywood weepers who donate money.  And it allows Mr. Van de Kamp to get around campaign spending limits.  He can spend the legal maximum for his campaign; all the spending for the Van de Kamp initiative (on which there are no limits) is gravy.  This initiative is being labeled The Big Green, but maybe it should be called The Big Greenback. (The Republican candidate, Sen. Pete Wilson, is playing the initiative fundraising game too, sponsoring his own crime initiative.)  While it is possible that the Big Green initiative will be ruled unconstitutional, it is of course conceivable that in modern California it could slide through.  This is the state that recently passed the Prop. 65 anti-toxic initiative.  If this new proposal ever does become law, the green lobby will benefit directly.  The initiative creates a free floating state environmental officer to sue companies or government agencies that do things he doesn't like.  That means the NRDC and such groups no longer would have to spend as much money on litigation; taxpayers would bear the cost.  Mr. Van de Kamp and his allies may be hoping that the environment is such a mom and apple-pie issue among certain segments of California's population now that almost any collection of anti-scientific, anti-pocketbook nonsense can pass under its rubric.  Of course the state's liberals are not yet a nation unto themselves.  George Bush, for example, may decide that he doesn't want to be the President who lost control of interstate commerce to an attorney general from California.  And some other segments of California's political and media culture may yet start to point out that the initiative would impose significant costs on the state's less affluent citizens in the form of higher food prices and lost jobs.  This grandiose initiative will help California define itself for the futureeither as a state still tethered to economic and scientific reality, or as one being led to wherever its la-la activists want to take it.  First, there was a death watch.  Then exhilaration.  Spurred by waves of large-scale buying in blue-chip stocks, the Dow Jones Industrial Average rallied yesterday and erased about a half of Friday's 190.58-point plunge, gaining 88.12 to 2657.38.  It was the fourth-biggest advance for the average of 30 blue chips, on frenetic New York Stock Exchange volume of 416,290,000 shares -- the highest since the days after the 1987 crash.  While the advance cheered investors who feared a 1987-style crash would occur yesterday, it was strictly a big-stock rally fed by huge buying by bargain-hunting institutions and program traders.  A troubling sign: Declining stocks on the Big Board outnumbered advancers, 975 to 749, and the over-the-counter market that includes many smaller stocks suffered aftershocks of Friday's late Big Board plunge.  The Nasdaq OTC index closed down 6.31 to 460.98.  Meanwhile, in a divergence in two of the market's most important indicators, the Dow industrials' sister average, the 20-stock Dow Jones Transportation Average, tumbled 102.06 to 1304.23 -- its second-worst decline next to the 164.78-point fall during the 1987 crash.  Transports plunged on takeover disappointments in two airline stocks, UAL and AMR, which each fell more than 20% when they reopened for trading yesterday after being suspended Friday afternoon.  UAL, the takeover stock at the center of Friday's 190.58-point market plunge, fell 56 7/8 to 222 7/8 on nearly 2.3 million shares.  Overall, "this is a pleasant rally but it's very selective," said Arthur Cashin Jr., a veteran PaineWebber Inc. trader at the Big Board.  "Everyone was a little concerned about the general narrowness of the rally and failure of the OTC market to get into plus territory.  It's just a strange feeling.  I don't think anyone left the place whistling Dixie."  The rally gave credence, at least for now, to the pre-trading declaration of Big Board Chairman John J. Phelan Jr. that Friday's market debacle was "an abnormal condition, and not a disaster."  But to traders, it looked like disaster on the 9:30 a.m. opening bell.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average opened down 1.64 shortly after 9:30.  But most of the 30 blue-chip stocks in the average, including Eastman Kodak and General Motors, couldn't trade because of the heavy backlog of sell orders left over from Friday's late-afternoon rout.  At 9:45, Procter & Gamble -- one of the most important Dow bellwethers of late -- opened down 2 3/4 to 117.  The Dow dropped to a quick 27-point loss, and to many traders it looked as if stocks were headed for yet another big tumble.  More stocks opened over the ensuing half hour, as the 49 Big Board specialist firms in charge of keeping the market orderly groped to find buy orders from major brokerage firms to match the selling flood.  Then, to make matters worse, computerized sell programs kicked in, hammering stocks into steeper losses.  There was heavy stock-index arbitrage, as traders sold big baskets of stock and bought stock-index futures to profit from the price discrepancies between the two markets.  This was a hangover from Friday, when Standard & Poor's 500-stock index futures had closed at a sharp discount to stocks.  The onslaught of the program selling dashed any hopes that some of the big program trading firms would hold off until the market stabilized.  They didn't.  The Dow accelerated its slide, losing 63.52 in the first 40 minutes of trading.  With program traders seemingly in charge, buyers backed away from the market and watched stocks fall.  Then at 10:15 the Dow suddenly started to rebound, and when it shot upward it did so even faster than the early-morning fall.  And this time, it wasn't just the program traders who were responsible.  All the selling had pushed stocks to such cheap values that big investment banks and major money management firms started buying stocks heavily.  The program traders were in there, too, of course.  But according to one trader, the programmers "didn't look as dominant on the upside as on the downside because there was {also} a lot of bargain-hunting" by institutions.  Roland M. Machold, director of the New Jersey Division of Investment, which oversees $29 billion in investments, said the "first thing we did was to double our orders" yesterday morning.  "With the market down like this, we'll probably take another $50 million and put it in" the market.  Trading in Walt Disney Co. particularly caught traders' eyes.  According to Big Board officials, Disney had one of the biggest sell-order imbalances on Friday; it was one of the seven stocks that couldn't finish trading that day.  The stock opened late at 114 1/2, down 8 1/2.  But then it shot upward 7 1/2 as Goldman, Sachs & Co. stepped in and bought, traders said.  However, Disney specialist Robert Fagenson said: "I would be surprised if Goldman represented 4% of the opening volume."  Around Wall Street, trading desks were relieved that they could at least play the market yesterday, in contrast to Friday's gridlock.  At Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Inc., head equity trader Dudley Eppel said: "I think the opening was constructive.  It was orderly.  We put some orders together.  There wasn't a lot of panic selling, either domestically or internationally. . . .Not like Friday where they just took {the market} apart."  Still, the market hadn't yet crossed into positive territory, and traders were glum.  But in another dramatic burst, the Dow tacked on 42 points in five minutes, and at 10:25 the index showed a gain of 5.74.  On the Big Board floor and on trading desks, traders yelped their approval.  Grinned Griffith Peck, a trader in Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.'s OTC department: "I tell you, this market acts healthy."  Around him, scores of traders seemed to get a burst of energy; their boss broke out bottles of Perrier water to cool them off.  Among Big Board specialists, the cry was "Pull your offers" -- meaning that specialists soon expected to get higher prices for their shares.  "It was bedlam on the upside," said one Big Board specialist.  But not everybody was making money.  The carnage on the Chicago Board Options Exchange, the nation's major options market, was heavy after the trading in S&P 100 stock-index options was halted Friday.  Many market makers in the S&P 100 index options contract had bullish positions Friday, and when the shutdown came they were frozen with huge losses.  Over the weekend, clearing firms told the Chicago market makers to get out of their positions at any cost Monday morning.  "They were absolutely killed, slaughtered," said one Chicago-based options trader.  Some traders said that the closely watched Major Market Index, whose 20 stocks mimic the Dow industrials, didn't lead yesterday's big rally.  James Gallagher, a partner at specialist Fowler & Rosenau, said, "The difference between today and two years ago" -- "Terrible Tuesday," Oct. 20, 1987 -- "is that then we needed a savior to go into the Major Market Index, spend $2 million and get the program rally started.  This time {institutions} saw the programs coming and backed away and backed away.  Then when the market was at a technical level to buy, they came in with a vengeance."  However, according to one analyst, the timing of Major Market Index futures buying just before the turnaround was similar to that of Terrible Tuesday.  "Futures were pulling the stock market higher," said Donald Selkin, head of stock-index futures research at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc.  Although the Big Board's specialist firms struggled through another highly volatile trading session, their performance yesterday was better than during Friday's late-afternoon chaos, according to traders and brokers who work with them.  Specialists were criticized for their inability to maintain orderly markets during the Friday plunge.  But yesterday, even with halts in such major blue-chip stocks as Merck, "we expected (the halts) and it wasn't too bad," said Donaldson's Mr. Eppel, who had been critical of the specialists' performance on Friday.  According to a Big Board official, while many stocks opened late, there were subsequent trading halts in only three issues -- AMR, Merck and Valero Energy.  Merck is one of the most important stocks in the Major Market Index.  No sector of the market has been spared during the past two days' gyrations.  Yet from the Dow industrials' high on Oct. 9 through Friday's plunge, relatively good performances have been turned in by real-estate, utilities, precious metals and life insurance stocks.  And yesterday, the top performing industry group was oil field equipment issues.  For example, Halliburton jumped 3 1/4 to 38, Schlumberger rose 2 1/2 to 43 1/4 and Baker Hughes rose 1 1/8 to 22.  Because of the UAL and AMR tumbles, airlines were the weakest sector of the market yesterday.  Philip Morris was the Big Board's most active issue, rising 2 1/4 to 43 1/4 on nearly eight million shares.  Among other major issues, Coca-Cola Co. closed up 2 at 66 3/4 on 1.7 million shares and American Telephone & Telegraph rose 3 1/4 to 43 on nearly 7.8 million shares.  Shares of International Business Machines, which reported earnings yesterday, finished at 103, up 1, after slipping below 100 during Friday's session for the first time in five years.  Shares of three brokerage firms rose after they reported earnings.  Merrill Lynch added 1 3/4 to 28, PaineWebber rose 3/4 to 18 1/2 and Bear Stearns rose 3/8 to 14 1/4.  Federal National Mortgage Association, a recently hot stock, climbed 4 to 124 on nearly 1.6 million shares.  At a news conference after the close of trading yesterday, the Big Board's Mr. Phelan and other exchange officials praised the performance of their computers and personnel.  Mr. Phelan said that program trading strategies weren't responsible for triggering Friday's decline despite a jump in the use of the computer-driven strategies in recent months.  Some 24 million of the more than 100 million shares traded in the final 90 minutes of Friday's session, when the plunge in stock prices was concentrated, were program-related, he said.  Program trades make up 10% of the exchange's volume on an average day, but despite the increase Friday, it was "certainly not something you would say precipitated the market decline," Mr. Phelan said.  Mr. Phelan expressed relief that the market rebounded yesterday.  "Obviously, every time we get this kind of reaction, it's going to make everybody nervous, including me," he said.  He said that exchange officials had conversations with Wall Street firms throughout the weekend and that "all the participants behaved very, very responsibly today."  Meanwhile, Peter DaPuzzo, Shearson's head of retail equity trading, praised institutional investors in the OTC market, who were heavy buyers of the Nasdaq's biggest technology issues yesterday amid a flood of selling by other investors.  "The institutions can't be criticized for their behavior," Mr. DaPuzzo said in an interview.  "It was the opposite of what happened on Oct. 19.  They used their judgment.  They didn't panic during the first round of selling this morning.  Instead, they bought on weakness and sold into the strength, which kept the market orderly.  Maybe they learned from experience."  Mr. Phelan said the performance of specialists during Friday's plunge was admirable, because out of 1,640 Big Board common stocks traded during the day only seven were closed and weren't reopened before the close.  "They did an excellent job," Mr. Phelan said of the specialists.  Wall Street traders on Friday had complained about the trading suspensions.  ---  James A. White and Sonja Steptoe contributed to this article.  West Germany's Green Party joined its ideological soulmates Jeremy Rifkin and the Christic Institute in the legal battle to ground the Atlantis shuttle and its plutonium-powered Galileo probe to Jupiter.  The anti-defense Greens wanted a Washington federal appeals court to block today's scheduled liftoff long enough for them to ask the World Court to "order" a permanent cancellation of the $1.5 billion flight.  A three-judge appeals panel yesterday refused to comply, though liberal Judge Pat Wald went out of her way to deny that this was a "frivolous" case.  Of course it was.  NASA should now sue for fines against all three politico-plaintiffs, foreign and domestic, for bringing this mischievous case.  A House-Senate conference approved a permanent smoking ban on all domestic airline routes within the continental U.S. and on all flights of six hours or less to Alaska and Hawaii.  The restrictions would cover all but a small percentage of domestic air traffic, and represent a major expansion of the current smoking ban on flights of two hours or less.  The exemption allowed on longer flights to Alaska and Hawaii appears to be largely a face-saving concession for the traditionally powerful tobacco industry, which has found itself increasingly isolated in the face of public pressure in recent years.  By a 6-4 margin, House negotiators initially rejected last night a Senate provision covering all domestic flights.  But the six-hour compromise was soon agreed to in subsequent discussions.  As a practical matter, flights from the West Coast to Hawaii would be covered as they are under the time limit, but the language would exempt longer routes beginning, for example, in Chicago or on the East Coast.  Within the Senate, the ban has had aggressive support from Sen. Frank Lautenberg (D., N.J.), who has used his position as a Senate Appropriations subcommittee chairman to garner votes for the initiative.  The measure is attached to the more than $26 billion fiscal 1990 transportation bill within Mr. Lautenberg's jurisdiction, and the final compromise is laced with more than $205 million in road projects earmarked by members as well as funds sought by major airports, including Denver.  From the outset, the tobacco industry has been uncertain as to what strategy to follow.  But the industry retains support in the House leadership through the influence of grower states, such as North Carolina.  Majority Whip William Gray owes a political debt to Southern agriculture lawmakers for his rise in the House, and the Philadelphia Democrat used his position in the conference to salvage the exemption from a total ban.  Although the smoking provision has attracted the most public interest, the underlying bill was the subject of behind-the-scenes lobbying because of its impact on air transportation and the more mundane, but politically important, projects of members.  In a stark lesson in the power of the appropriations committees, the House deliberately killed a handful of projects backed by lawmakers in Florida, Illinois and Pennsylvania who had voted against the panel leadership on the House floor.  "Anybody can vote as they want," said Rep. William Lehman (D., Fla.), head of the House conferees.  "But if you make a request, you should support the committee."  Within the Federal Aviation Administration, the final bill promises to increase spending for facilities and equipment by more than 20% from last year, and total operations would rise to $3.84 billion -- a 12% boost.  The facilities account includes $40 million for Denver's ambitious new airport, and the competition for these funds created shifting alliances between urban lawmakers representing established airports in Philadelphia and Michigan and the major carriers to Denver, United and Continental.  Leery of the costs -- and, critics say, competition -- the airlines have sought to gain leverage over the city of Denver.  Texas Air Corp., which owns Continental, and the Air Transport Association were prominent in the lobbying.  The industry sought to impose conditions that would have delayed funds for the project until Denver and the airlines had agreed to leases for 50% of the gates.  But this was rejected in favor of much looser language directing the Transportation Department to review the costs of the first phase, expected to cost about $2 billion.  Though smaller in total dollars, the conference agreed to preserve an estimated $30.6 million in controversial subsidies to carriers serving rural or isolated airports.  The sum is more than double what the House had approved for the program, but the list of qualified airports would be cut by 22 under new distance requirements and limits on the level of subsidy.  Congress previously cut six airports this year.  The impact of the changes is to eliminate many of the most excessive cases where the government has been paying more than $200 for each passenger in subsidies.  Among rail and highway accounts, the agreement provides $615 million for Amtrak, including $85 million for capital improvements.  And federal-formula grants for mass transit would be effectively frozen at $1.625 billion, or $20 million more than last fiscal year.  Enjoying several blockbuster movie hits including "Batman," Los Angeles-based Guber-Peters Entertainment Co. reported earnings for the first quarter ended Aug. 31 of $5.8 million, or 50 cents a share, compared with a year-earlier loss.  Sony Corp., which has offered to acquire the movie-production company, is seeking to free its top executives, Peter Guber and Jon Peters, from an exclusive agreement with Time Warner Inc.'s Warner Communications Inc. so they can run Columbia Pictures Entertainment Inc.  Sony two weeks ago agreed to acquire Columbia for $3.4 billion, or $27 a share.  Warner sued Sony and Guber-Peters late last week; Sony and Guber-Peters have countersued, charging Warner with attempting to interfere in Sony's acquisition of the two companies.  Guber-Peters's net income in the latest quarter compared with a net loss of $6.9 million, or 62 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  The company said revenue rose 138%, to $10.9 million from $4.6 million, reflecting the success of its movies "Gorillas in the Mist" and "Rainman," as well as the box-office smash "Batman."  A group including Jon M. Huntsman of Salt Lake City, said it boosted its stake in Aristech Chemical Corp. to 8.36% of the the common shares outstanding.  As previously reported, Huntsman Holdings Corp., owned by Jon M. Huntsman and other members of his family, proposed that Banstar Corp., an affiliate of Huntsman Holdings, acquire Aristech in a friendly transaction for $25-a-share in cash, or $817.5 million.  In a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Huntsman group said it controls 2,720,675 Aristech common shares, including 306,000 shares bought from Aug. 21 to Oct. 13 for $20 to $20.875 per share.  Officials at Aristech, based in Pittsburgh, declined comment.  Congress has been critical of the Bush administration for not sending enough aid to Poland, so it is getting ready to send its own version of a CARE package.  Last month, the Senate voted to send a delegation of congressional staffers to Poland to assist its legislature, the Sejm, in democratic procedures.  Senator Pete Domenici calls this effort "the first gift of democracy."  The Poles might do better to view it as a Trojan Horse.  It is the vast shadow government of 15,000 congressional staffers that helps create such legislative atrocities as the 1,376 page, 13-pound reconciliation bill that claimed to be the budget of the United States.  Maybe after the staffers explain their work to the Poles, they'd be willing to come back and do the same for the American people.  Waterford Wedgwood PLC, a financially troubled Irish maker of fine crystal and Wedgwood china, reported that its pretax loss for the first six months widened to 10.6 million Irish punts ($14.9 million) from 5.8 million Irish punts a year earlier.  The results for the half were worse than market expectations, which suggested an interim loss of around 10 million Irish punts.  In a sharply weaker London market yesterday, Waterford shares were down 15 pence at 50 pence (79 cents).  The company reported a loss after taxation and minority interests of 14 million Irish punts, compared with a loss of 9.3 million Irish punts for the year-earlier period.  There weren't any extraordinary items.  Sales for the total group rose 27% to 168.1 million Irish punts compared with 132.6 million Irish punts a year ago.  Waterford has decided against paying an interim dividend.  Waterford said the appointment of a new management team and the signing of a comprehensive labor agreement are expected to enhance the company's long-term prospects.  The sudden "flight to quality" that triggered Friday's explosive bond-market rally was reversed yesterday in a "flight from quality" rout.  The setback, in which Treasury bond prices plummeted, reflected a rebound in the stock market and profit-taking.  "It was a pretty wild day.  Our markets were closely tied to the stock market," said Joel Kazis, manager of trading at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co. "Friday's flight to quality was no longer needed once the stock market found its legs," he said.  Some fixed-income investors had expected a further drop in stock prices after the nearly 200-point drop in the Dow Jones Industrial Average on Friday.  That caused investors to flee stocks and buy high-quality Treasury bonds, which are safer than other types of securities.  But when stocks began to climb instead, prices of Treasury bonds declined.  Contributing to the selling pressure were dispatches by several investment firms advising clients to boost their stock holdings and reduce the size of their cash or bond portfolios.  Among the firms were Merrill Lynch & Co. and Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  The bond market seemed to ignore evidence that the Federal Reserve eased credit conditions slightly by allowing the federal funds rate to drift as low as 8 1/2%.  The closely watched rate on federal funds, or overnight loans between banks, slid to about 8 3/4% last week, down from its perceived target level of about 9%.  The rate is considered an early signal of changes in Fed policy.  Traders said yesterday's modest easing didn't stir much enthusiasm because it had been widely expected.  In fact, some economists contend that the latest easing started last week.  Others note that some investors were disappointed because they had expected a more aggressive easing.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond, ended about 1 3/4 points lower, or down about $17.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The reversal was even more evident among shorter-term Treasury securities.  After Treasury bill rates plummeted as much as 0.70 percentage point on Friday, they gave back three-fourths of that amount yesterday.  The bond-equivalent yield on three-month Treasury bills, for example, was quoted late yesterday at 7.72%, compared with 7.16% Friday.  Investment-grade corporate bonds, mortgage-backed securities and municipal bonds also fell.  But prices of junk bonds, which were battered Friday in near standstill trading, rebounded to post small gains after a volatile trading session.  Junk bonds opened as much as four points lower but staged a modest comeback as stock prices firmed.  Some traders said the high-yield market was helped by active institutional buying.  In particular, they said, firms such as First Boston Corp. and Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. began making a market in junk issues early in the session when prices hit severely depressed levels.  "I think the willingness of securities companies to make markets for high-yield issues improved the sentiment for junk bonds," said John Lonski, an economist at Moody's Investors Service Inc.  U.S. Treasury bonds were higher in overnight trading in Japan, which opened at about 7:30 p.m. EDT.  The benchmark 30-year bond, for example rose one point in early Japanese trading in reaction to a quick 600-point drop in the Tokyo stock market.  But as Japanese stocks rebounded, Treasurys retreated and ended just modestly higher.  Many U.S. trading operations, wanting to keep a watchful eye on Japanese trading as an indication of where U.S. trading would begin, were fully staffed during the Tokyo trading session.  "Most of the action was during the night session," said Michael Moore, trading manager at Continental Bank.  Jay Goldinger, who often trades overnight for Capital Insight Inc., Beverly Hills, Calif., said trading in Tokyo was "very active" but highly volatile.  "We went down 3/4 point in 10 minutes right before lunch, then after lunch we went up 3/4 point in 12 minutes," he said.  In Tokyo, trading is halted during lunchtime.  Tokyo's market turned out to be a bad bellwether for U.S. trading.  When the market opened here, bonds prices fell as the stock market regained strength.  The bond market's focus on stock activity was so strong yesterday that it overshadowed today's slate of economic data, which includes the government's report on August U.S. merchandise trade and September industrial production.  Industrial production is expected to have declined 0.2%, according to a consensus of economists surveyed by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report.  The August trade deficit is expected to have widened to $9.1 billion from $7.58 billion in July.  A widening of that magnitude, said one New York trader, is "not a favorable number. . . .  It could do damage to us."  Meanwhile, agency supply is expected to weigh heavily on the market today when the Federal Home Loan Bank prices a $2.3 billion offering of one-year, three-year, five-year and 10-year maturities.  Tomorrow, the Resolution Funding Corp. will provide details of its first bond issue, which is expected to total between $4 billion and $6 billion and carry a maturity greater than 20 years.  Resolution Funding is a division of Resolution Trust Corp., the new federal agency created to bail out the nation's troubled thrifts.  And this week the Tennessee Valley Authority plans to price a $3 billion offering, its first public debt borrowing in 15 years.  "There's lots of supply," the New York trader said.  "We have a couple or three tough weeks coming."  Treasury Securities  Prices of Treasury bonds tumbled in moderate to active trading.  The benchmark 30-year Treasury bond was quoted late at a price of 101 19/32, compared with a closing price of 103 12/32 Friday.  The yield on the benchmark issue rose to 7.97% from 7.82%.  The latest 10-year notes were quoted late at 100 3/32 for a yield of 7.97%, compared with 101 9/32 to yield 7.84%.  Short-term interest rates fell yesterday at the government's weekly Treasury bill auction.  The average discount rate on new three-month Treasury bills was 7.37%, the lowest since the average of 7.36% at the auction on Oct. 17, 1988.  The average discount rate was 7.42% on new six-month bills, the lowest since the average of 7.35% at the auction on July 31, 1989.  Here are auction details:  Rates are determined by the difference between the purchase price and face value.  Thus, higher bidding narrows the investor's return while lower bidding widens it.  The percentage rates are calculated on a 360-day year, while the coupon-equivalent yield is based on a 365-day year.  @ 13-Week 26-Week  @ Applications .......... $22,864,405,000 $23,502,815,000  @ Accepted bids ......... $7,600,145,000 $7,623,255,000  @ Accepted at low price.. 25% 89%  @ Accepted noncompet'ly.. $1,107,760,000 $1,006,645,000  @ Average price (Rate)... 98.137 (7.37%) 96.249 (7.42%)  @ High price (Rate) ..... 98.160 (7.28%) 96.249 (7.42%)  @ Low price (Rate) ...... 98.129 (7.40%) 96.244 (7.43%)  @ Coupon equivalent ..... 7.61% 7.82%  Both issues are dated Oct. 19.  The 13-week bills mature Jan. 18, 1990, and the 26-week bills mature April 19, 1990.  Corporate Issues  Investment-grade corporate bonds ended one to 1 1/2 point lower.  There were no new issues.  Foreign Bonds  Foreign bonds surged as the dollar weakened against most major currencies.  Among benchmark issues:  -- Japan's No. 111 4.6% bond due 1998 ended on brokers screens at 96.15, up 1.17 point.  The yield was 5.245%.  -- West Germany's 6 3/4% issue due June 1999 ended at 98.30, up 0.91 point to yield 6.99%.  -- Britain's 11 3/4% bond due 2003/2007 ended 1 1/8 higher at 111 19/32 to yield 10.12%, while the 11 3/4% notes due 1991 rose 21/32 to 98 26/32 to yield 12.74%.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities gave up most of Friday's gains as active issues ended 24/32 to 30/32 point lower.  Dealers said morning activity was hectic as prices dropped in response to gains in the stock market and losses in Treasury securities, but trading slowed to moderate levels in the afternoon.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for November delivery were quoted late yesterday at 98 4/32, down 30/32 from Friday; 9 1/2% securities were down 27/32 at 100 5/32; and 10% securities were at 102 2/32, off 24/32.  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. 9% securities were at 97 1/4, down 3/4.  On Friday, mortgage issues gained as much as 1 5/32.  Late yesterday Ginnie Mae 9% securities were yielding 9.39% to a 12-year average life assumption, as the spread above the Treasury 10-year note narrowed 0.01 percentage point to 1.42.  Traders said there were some busy dealings in Freddie Mac and Federal National Mortgage Association securities because underwriters from last week's heavy slate of real estate mortgage investment conduit issues moved to gather collateral for new deals.  Offsetting the Remic-related purchases were continued heavy sales by mortgage originators, which are producing increased amounts of fixed-rate mortgage-backed issues with lower rates.  There was no new-issue activity in the derivative market.  Municipals  Rebounding stocks and weaker Treasury prices drove municipal bonds 1/4 to 3/4 point lower in late dealings.  The session losses left municipal dollar bonds close to where they were before the 190.58-point drop in the Dow Jones Industrial Average Friday prompted a capital markets rally.  Trading was hectic during the morning, with players trying to gauge whether equities would continue Friday's free fall or stabilize after a brief spot of weakness.  Tax-exempts started the session flat to a touch higher on anticipation of further stock market erosion, but bond prices rapidly turned south as it became more clear that a repeat of the October 1987 crash wasn't at hand.  Professionals dominated municipal trading throughout the session.  Traders said retail investors seemed to be hugging the sidelines until a measure of volatility is wrung out of the market.  New Jersey Turnpike Authority's 7.20% issue of 2018 was off 3/4 at 98 1/2 bid, yielding 7.32%, up 0.07 percentage point from late Friday.  Florida Board of Education's 7 1/4% issue of 2023 was 5/8 point weaker at 99 1/2 bid.  The 7 1/8% issue of Triborough Bridge and Tunnel Authority of New York, due 2019, was off 5/8 at 98 1/8 bid.  And Fairfax County, Va., Water Authority's 7 1/4% issue of 2027 was down 3/4 at 99 7/8 bid.  Serial bond yields were up about 0.05 percentage point.  BMA Corp., Kansas City, Mo., said it's weighing "strategic alternatives," for its Business Men's Assurance Co. unit, and is contacting possible buyers of the life and health insurance operation.  A BMA spokesman said "runaway medical costs" have made health insurance "a significant challenge," and margins also have been pinched by changes in the mix of life-insurance products consumers now demand.  The Business Men's Assurance unit represented about $288 million of the company's $488 million in 1988 revenue, and the unit's operating income was about $10 million, said the spokesman.  BMA's investment banker, Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc., has been authorized to contact possible buyers for the unit.  Laidlaw Transportation Ltd. said it raised its stake in ADT Ltd. of Bermuda to 29.4% from 28%.  A spokesman for Laidlaw declined to disclose the price the Toronto transportation and waste services concern paid for the additional shares, which he said were acquired "over the last couple of weeks."  The spokesman said Laidlaw wouldn't increase its stake in ADT beyond 30% "without a great deal of thought" because of British takeover regulations that require a company acquiring more than 30% to extend an offer to the rest of the company's shareholders.  ADT, a security services and auctions company, trades on London's Stock Exchange.  Laidlaw is 47%-controlled by Canadian Pacific Ltd., a Montreal transportation, resources and industrial holding concern.  Nintendo Co., a Japanese maker of video games, electronic information systems and playing cards, posted a 23% unconsolidated surge in pretax profit to 61.41 billion yen ($429 million) from 50 billion yen ($349.9 million) for the fiscal year ended Aug. 31.  Sales surged 40% to 250.17 billion yen from 178.61 billion.  Net income rose 11% to 29.62 billion yen from 26.68 billion.  Pershare net fell to 423.3 yen from 457.7 yen because of expenses and capital adjustments.  Without detailing specific product breakdowns, Nintendo credited its bullish upsurge in sales -- including advanced computer games and television entertainment systems -- to surging "leisure-oriented" sales in foreign markets.  Export sales for leisure items alone, for instance, totaled 184.74 billion yen in the 12 months, up from 106.06 billion in the previous fiscal year.  Domestic leisure sales, however, were lower.  Hertz Corp. of Park Ridge, N.J., said it retained Merrill Lynch Capital Markets to sell its Hertz Equipment Rental Corp. unit.  "There is no pressing need to sell the unit, but we are doing it so we can concentrate on our core business, renting automobiles in the U.S. and abroad," said William Slider, Hertz's executive vice president.  "We are only going to sell at the right price."  Hertz Equipment had operating profit before depreciation of $90 million on revenue of $150 million in 1988.  The closely held Hertz Corp. had annual revenue of close to $2 billion in 1988, of which $1.7 billion was contributed by its Hertz Rent A Car operations world-wide.  Hertz Equipment is a major supplier of rental equipment in the U.S., France, Spain and the U.K.  It supplies commercial and industrial equipment including earth-moving, aerial, compaction and electrical equipment, compressors, cranes, forklifts and trucks.  Interspec Inc. reported a net loss of $2.4 million for the fiscal third quarter ended Aug. 31.  It said the loss resulted from startup and introduction costs related to a new medical ultrasound equipment system.  In the year-earlier quarter, the company reported net income of $955,000, or 15 cents a share.  The manufacturer of ultrasound diagnostic systems, based in Ambler, Pa., reported a nine-month net loss of $2.43 million compared with net income of $2.71 million, or 44 cents a share, for the nine-month period a year earlier.  In over-the-counter trading, Interspec fell 37.5 cents to $4.25.  Allegheny Ludlum Corp. expects to report third-quarter net of about $34 million, or $1.50 a share, down from $38.4 million, or $1.70 a share, a year earlier, Richard P. Simmons, chairman and chief executive officer, told institutional investors in New York.  Sales for the Pittsburgh-based producer of specialty steels and other materials fell to about $265 million in the third quarter from $320.5 million a year earlier, he said.  He said the third-quarter estimate indicates profit for the nine months of $4.65 a share, "almost equal to the full-year 1988 earnings" of $108.6 million, or $4.81 a share.  In the first nine months of 1988, net was $85 million, or $3.76 a share.  Mr. Simmons said the third-quarter results reflect continued improvements in productivity and operating margins.  He said capital spending next year will rise to about $45 million from about $35 million this year.  U.S. Banknote Co. said it again extended the expiration date of its $7-a-share tender offer for International Banknote Co. to Nov. 15.  U.S. Banknote said it is in negotiations to sell "certain facilities," which it didn't name, to a third party, and it needs the extension to try to reach a definitive agreement on the sale.  U.S. Banknote said it believes the sale, if completed, apparently would satisfy antitrust issues raised by the U.S. Justice Department about U.S. Banknote's offer to buy International Banknote.  Both of the New York-based companies print stock certificates and currency.  U.S. Banknote said "there can be no assurance" a sale agreement would be concluded.  It also said the tender offer would probably have to be extended further to complete financing arrangements.  U.S. Banknote said Citibank extended the expiration date of its commitment for senior secured financing to Nov. 15.  The offer, made June 1, has been extended several times.  Closely held U.S. Banknote offered the $7 a share, or $126 million, for as many as 14.9 million shares, or 78.6%, of International Banknote's shares outstanding.  U.S. Banknote said that as of Oct. 13, 16.1 million shares, or about 84.3% of the fully diluted shares outstanding, had been tendered.  Gitano Group Inc. said it agreed to buy 50% of Regatta Sport Ltd., a closely held apparel maker, with the assumption of $3 million of contingent debt.  Under the terms of the contract, New York-based Gitano has the option to acquire the remaining 50% of Regatta, a maker of men's and women's clothes sold primarily in department stores, under certain conditions.  That 50% is now held by Clifford Parker, Regatta's president and chief executive officer, who will continue to manage Regatta's operations under Gitano.  In 1989, Regatta will have sales "in excess of $10 million" and will show a profit, Mr. Parker said.  Gitano, which makes budget-priced apparel sold mainly through mass merchandisers like K mart and Wal-Mart, said the Regatta acquisition will enhance its strategy to expand into department stores.  This fall, Gitano began manufacturing moderately priced clothes aimed at department stores under the Gloria Vanderbilt trademark, which Gitano recently acquired.  Enron Corp., Houston, said the sale of preference units of its newly formed Enron NGL Partners L.P. master limited partnership subsidiary will result in an undetermined gain in the fourth quarter.  In the year-ago quarter, the natural gas concern had net income of $25.2 million, or 34 cents a share, on revenue of about $1.46 billion.  Those results included a $2.7 million charge related to the retirement of debt.  In a related move, Enron said it increased the number of the partnership's units it will offer to 6,930,000 from 5,500,000.  The old and revised numbers both include over-allotment provisions.  Enron said each unit will be priced in the $19-to-$21 range and will represent about 80% of the partnership equity.  Net proceeds from the offering are expected to be close to $200 million.  Goldman, Sachs & Co., and Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. are lead underwriters.  Arthur M. Goldberg said he extended his unsolicited tender offer of $32 a share tender offer, or $154.3 million, for Di Giorgio Corp. to Nov. 1.  DIG Acquisition Corp., the New Jersey investor's acquisition vehicle, said that as of the close of business yesterday, 560,839 shares had been tendered.  Including the stake DIG already held, DIG holds a total of about 25% of Di Giorgio's shares on a fully diluted basis.  The offer, which also includes common and preferred stock purchase rights, was to expire last night at midnight.  The new expiration date is the date on which DIG's financing commitments, which total about $240 million, are to expire.  DIG is a unit of DIG Holding Corp., a unit of Rose Partners L.P. Mr. Goldberg is the sole general partner in Rose Partners.  In August, Di Giorgio, a San Francisco food products and building materials marketing and distribution company, rejected Mr. Goldberg's offer as inadequate.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Di Giorgio closed at $31.50 a share, down $1.75.  What doesn't belong here?  A. manual typewriters,  B. black-and-white snapshots,  C. radio adventure shows.  If you guessed black-and-white snapshots, you're right.  After years of fading into the background, two-tone photography is coming back.  Trendy magazine advertisements feature stark black-and-white photos of Hollywood celebrities pitching jeans, shoes and liquor.  Portrait studios accustomed to shooting only in color report a rush to black-and-white portrait orders.  And black-and-white photography classes are crowded with students.  What's happening in photography mirrors the popularity of black and white in fashion, home furnishings and cinematography.  On Seventh Avenue, designers have been advancing the monochrome look with clothing collections done entirely in black and white.  And classic black-and-white movies are enjoying a comeback on videocassette tapes, spurred, in part, by the backlash against colorization of old films.  "The pendulum is swinging back to black and white," says Richard DeMoulin, the general manager of Eastman Kodak Co.'s professional photography division.  Until two years ago, sales of black-and-white film had been declining steadily since the 1960s.  But last year, buoyed by increased use in advertising and other commercial applications, sales increased 5%, and they are expected to jump at least that much again this year.  Photographic companies are scrambling to tap the resurging market, reviving some black-and-white product lines and developing new ones.  At Kodak, which largely ignored the market for years, black-and-white film sales now account for nearly 15% of the company's $3 billion in film and paper sales annually, up from 10% three years ago.  The Rochester, N.Y., photographic giant recently began marketing T-Max 3200, one of the fastest and most sensitive monochrome films.  Aimed at commercial photographers, the film can be used in very low light without sacrificing quality, says Donald Franz of Photofinishing Newsletter.  Also trying to snare a portion of the $2 billion-a-year industry is Agfa Corp., a unit of Bayer AG. Agfa recently signed Olympic gold medalist Florence Griffith-Joyner to endorse a new line of black-and-white paper that's geared to consumers and will compete directly with Kodak's papers.  Slated for market by the end of the year, the paper "could have been introduced a long time ago but the market wasn't there then," says an Agfa spokesman.  The biggest beneficiary of the black-and-white revival is likely to be International Paper Co.'s Ilford division, known in the industry for its premium products.  Sales of Ilford's four varieties of black-and-white film this year are outpacing growth in the overall market, although the company won't say by exactly how much.  "We hope the trend lasts," says Laurie DiCara, Ilford's marketing communications director.  Why all the interest?  For baby boomers who grew up being photographed in color, black and white seems eye-catching and exotic.  "It has an archival, almost nostalgic quality to it," says Owen B. Butler, the chairman of the applied photography department at Rochester Institute of Technology.  "You can shift out of reality with black and white," he adds.  Such features have been especially attractive to professional photographers and marketing executives, who have been steadily increasing their use of black and white in advertising.  Processing of black-and-white commercial film jumped 24% last year to 18.7 million rolls.  Consider Gap Inc., whose latest ad campaign features black-and-white shots of Hollywood stars, artists and other well-known personalities modeling the retailer's jeans and T-shirts.  Richard Crisman, the account manager for the campaign, says Gap didn't intentionally choose black and white to distinguish its ads from the color spreads of competitors.  "We wanted to highlight the individual, not the environment," he says, "and black and white allows you to do that better than color."  The campaign won a Cleo award as this year's best ad by a specialty retailer.  Even food products and automobiles, which have long depended on color, are making the switch.  Companies "feel black and white will convey a stronger statement," says Marc L. Hauser, a Chicago photographer who is working on a black-and-white print ad for Stouffer Food Corp.'s Lean Cuisine.  Other companies that are currently using two-tone ads include American Express Co. and Epson America Inc.  Portrait studios have also latched onto the trend.  Using black and white, "we can make housewives look like stars," says John Perrin.  His On-Broadway Photography studio in Portland, Ore., doubled its business last year and, he says, is booked solid for the next five.  One customer, Dayna Brunsdon, says she spurned a color portrait for black and white because "it's more dramatic.  I show it to my friends, and they all say 'wow.' It isn't ordinary like color."  Still, most consumers aren't plunking black-and-white film into their cameras to take family snapshots.  One big obstacle is that few drugstores develop the film anymore.  Typically, it must be mailed to a handful of processors and may take a week or more to be processed and returned.  Black-and-white film costs consumers a little less than color film, and processing costs the same.  But for photofinishers, developing costs for black-and-white film are higher.  Some companies are starting to tackle that problem.  Ilford, for example, recently introduced a black-and-white film that can be processed quickly by color labs.  Intent on wooing customers, the company is also increasing its sponsorship of black-and-white photography classes.  Similarly, Agfa is sponsoring scores of photography contests at high schools and colleges, offering free black-and-white film and paper as prizes.  And Kodak is distributing an instructional video to processors on how to develop its monochrome film more efficiently.  Other companies are introducing related products.  Charles Beseler Co., a leading maker of photographic enlargers, introduced last month a complete darkroom starter kit targeted at teen-agers who want to process their own black-and-white photographs.  The kit, which has a suggested retail price of $250 and has already become a bestseller, was introduced after retailers noticed numerous requests from parents for children's photography equipment.  "It seems computers as hobbies have waned," says Ian Brightman, Beseler's chairman and chief executive officer.  But some industry observers believe the resurgence of black and white is only a fad.  They cite the emergence of still electronic photography, more newspapers turning to color on their pages and measurable improvements in the quality of color prints.  "Black and white hasn't made the same quantum leaps in technological development as color," says Mr. Butler of the Rochester Institute.  "The color print today is far superior to prints of 10 years ago.  You can't say the same with black and white."  But when Popular Photography, a leading magazine for photographers, selected 15 of the greatest photos ever made for its latest issue celebrating photography's 150th anniversary, all were black and white.  "It's got a classic spirit and carries over emotionally," says Alfred DeBat of Professional Photographers of America.  "That's the appeal."  McClatchy Newspapers Inc. said improvements in advertising and subscription revenue led to a 21% gain in third-quarter profit to $8.8 million, or 31 cents a share, from $7.2 million, or 25 cents a share.  Sales rose more than 7% to $94.9 million from $88.3 million.  The Sacramento, Calif., company also attributed improved performance to a lower effective tax rate and higher interest income.  For the nine months, the newspaper chain had almost a 23% increase in profit to $23.6 million, or 83 cents a share, from $19.2 million, or 68 cents a share.  Sales grew almost 7% to $279.1 million from $261.3 million.  McClatchy publishes the Sacramento (Calif.) Bee and Tacoma (Wash.) News Tribune, and other papers in Western states.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, the company closed at $25.25 a share, down 25 cents.  Agip S.p.A. and Societe National Elf Aquitaine, the state oil companies of Italy and France, respectively, submitted an offer to buy Gatoil Suisse S.A.  The price wasn't disclosed.  A spokesman for Gatoil said that the Swiss oil concern was examining the offer, submitted last Friday, along with two other offers, also submitted last week.  Those two offers were private and the spokesman refused to identify the bidding companies.  The spokesman further said that at least two more offers are expected from other companies within two weeks.  Gatoil Suisse owns an oil refinery in Switzerland with a capacity of 70,000 barrels a day, along with a network of gasoline retailing outlets.  While Friday's plunging stock market prompted new fears about the economy's prospects, a little-known indicator that has faithfully foreshadowed the economy's ups and downs by exceptionally long lead times points to a sustained rise in overall business activity.  The barometer, developed by analysts at Columbia University's Center for International Business Cycle Research here, reached a record high of 223.0 in August, the latest month available, and the Columbia researchers estimate that it has moved even higher since then.  The latest reading of 223.0 was up from 222.3 in July and 215.3 as recently as March.  The August rise marked the fifth straight monthly gain for the indicator, which uses the 1967 average as a base of 100.  In contrast, the Commerce Department's widely followed index of leading indicators, while up in August, has fallen repeatedly since reaching a high early this year.  Its ragged behavior through much of 1989 has prompted some forecasters to anticipate the start of a new recession perhaps before year's end.  But the far stronger showing of the Columbia index "makes a recession any time soon highly unlikely," says Geoffrey H. Moore, the director of the Columbia facility.  A leading authority on the business cycle, Mr. Moore also is a member of the Business Cycle Dating Group, the panel of private economists that decides for the government when expansions and recessions begin and end.  The group normally convenes only when a change in the economy's general course seems likely.  "No meeting is scheduled because the expansion shows no sign of going off the tracks," Mr. Moore reports.  Based largely on the recent strength in their index, called the long leading indicator, the Columbia analysts foresee uninterrupted economic growth through the rest of this year and next year as well.  They expect a 2.6% rise in 1990 in the gross national product, after adjustment for inflation.  Underlying this optimism is the index's longstanding ability to signal recessions or recoveries, as the case may be, by substantially greater periods than the Commerce Department's index of leading indicators.  Over the full post-World War II era, the Columbia index, on the average, has entered sustained declines 14 months before the onset of recessions and turned up eight months before recoveries.  The comparable lead times for the Commerce index, whose components include the stock market, are far shorter -- 10 months before recessions and only three months before recoveries.  The Columbia economists also have reconstructed how the long leading index would have behaved, had it existed, in 1929, before the stock market crash in October that ushered in the Great Depression.  The indicator reached a peak in January 1929 and then fell steadily up to and through the crash.  "It was an entirely different pattern from what we're seeing now," Mr. Moore says.  A major source of the recent strength in the long leading indicator has been the performance of the Dow Jones corporate bond-price index, which is not a part of the Commerce index.  In August, the bond measure was at its highest monthly average since early 1987.  It also rose last Friday, while the stock market sagged.  Other components of the long leading indicator include a ratio of prices to unit labor costs in manufacturing industries, the M2 version of the money supply, adjusted for inflation, and the volume of new home-building permits.  Notably absent from the Columbia index is the stock market, which Mr. Moore says "is simply no longer such a good indicator of the economy's long-range prospects, though it still is useful for anticipating some short-run twists and turns."  As recently as 1975, the stock market -- as reflected in the Standard & Poor's index of 500 common stocks -- was rated by the National Bureau of Economic Research as the best of the 12 leading indicators that then made up the Commerce index.  It was assigned a mark of 80 out of a possible 100, compared with scores ranging as low as 69 for the other components.  The stock market has lost some precursory power, analysts at the Columbia center claim, because of the growing impact of international developments.  "Stocks have become more sensitive to factors not directly tied to the domestic economy," Mr. Moore says, citing the exchange rate for the dollar on currency markets, the foreign-trade balance and inflows of foreign capital.  He also feels that the rise of such computer-based practices as program trading has diminished the stock market's relevancy to the economic outlook.  BSN S.A., a leading French food group, said it agreed to acquire Birkel G.m.b.H., a West German pasta maker.  The value of the acquisition wasn't disclosed.  The move is in line with BSN's strategy of gradually building its share of the European pasta market through external growth.  BSN will initially acquire a 15% interest in Birkel, a closely held concern.  The French group has an agreement giving it the right to buy all the shares outstanding, and this could be completed within a few months, a BSN spokeswoman said.  The takeover was submitted for approval by the West German cartel office, BSN said.  Birkel is West Germany's second-biggest producer of pasta, with sales of 250 million marks ($133.4 million) in 1988.  It has 750 workers at three production units in southwest Germany, and is that nation's leading producer of pasta sauces.  The acquisition strengthens BSN's position in the European pasta market.  The French group currently ranks second after Barilla Group of Italy, whose sales are chiefly in the Italian market.  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it reduced its rating on $281 million of senior and subordinated debt of this thrift holding company, to C from Ca, saying it believes bondholders will recover only "negligible principal."  The agency said it confirmed American Continental's preferred stock rating at C. American Continental's thrift unit, Los Angeles-based Lincoln Savings & Loan Association, is in receivership and the parent company has filed for protection from creditor lawsuits under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code.  ---  CENTRUST SAVINGS BANK (Miami) -- Moody's Investors Service Inc. downgraded its ratings on the subordinated debt of CenTrust to Caa from B-3.  The rating agency also reduced the ratings for long-term deposits to B-3 from Ba-3 and for preferred stock to Ca from Caa.  The rating agency said about $85 million in securities was affected.  The downgrades were prompted, Moody's said, by the continuing turmoil in the junk bond market and the suspension of dividends on CenTrust's preferred stock.  Moody's also said it believed the proposed sale of 63 CenTrust branches to Great Western Bank could, if completed, endanger the thrift's funding and market position.  THE STOCK MARKET AVOIDED a repeat of Black Monday as prices recovered from an early slide, spurred by bargain-hunting institutions and program traders.  The Dow Jones industrials closed up 88.12 points, at 2657.38, the fourth-biggest gain ever, after being down as much as 63.52 points in the morning.  The rally erased about half of Friday's 190.58-point plunge, but analysts are cautious about the market's outlook.  The dollar also rebounded, while bond prices plummeted and Treasury bill rates soared.  Junk bonds also recovered somewhat, though trading remained stalled.  Gold also rose.  Tokyo stock prices bounced back in early trading Tuesday following a 1.8% plunge on Monday.  The dollar also moved higher in Tokyo.  ---  Donald Trump withdrew his $7.54 billion offer for American Air, citing the "recent change in market conditions."  AMR slid $22.125, to $76.50.  Also, a UAL group tried to get financing for a lower bid, possibly $250 a share.  UAL fell $56.875, to $222.875.  Leveraged buy-outs of airlines would be subject to approval by the transportation secretary under a bill passed by a House subcommittee.  ---  IBM's earnings tumbled 30% in the third quarter, slightly more than expected.  The computer giant partly cited a stronger dollar and a delay in shipping a new high-end disk drive.  Analysts are downbeat about IBM's outlook for the next few quarters.  ---  U.S. auto makers plan to decrease car production 10.4% in the fourth quarter, with virtually all the decline coming from the Big Three.  Output at Japanese-owned and managed plants in the U.S. is due to rise 42%.  ---  Budget director Darman said he won't give federal agencies much leeway in coping with Gramm-Rudman spending cuts, which took effect yesterday.  Darman hopes to prod Congress to finish a deficit plan.  ---  The S&L bailout agency would be restricted by a new bill in how it raises capital.  The Ways and Means plan would create another possible obstacle to selling sick thrifts.  ---  A natural gas rule was struck down by a federal appeals court.  The regulation had prevented pipeline firms from passing part of $1 billion in costs along to customers.  ---  The Supreme Court agreed to decide whether a federal court may dismantle a merger that has won regulatory approval but been ruled anticompetitive in a private suit.  ---  Merrill Lynch's profit slid 37% in the third quarter.  Bear Stearns posted a 7.5% gain, while PaineWebber had a decline due to a year-ago gain.  ---  Blue Arrow of Britain plans to return to the name Manpower and take a big write-off.  The moves may help the firm solidify its dominance of the U.S. temporary-help market.  ---  J.P. Morgan posted a $1.82 billion loss for the third quarter, reflecting a big addition to loan-loss reserves.  NCNB's profit more than doubled.  ---  K mart agreed to acquire Pace Membership Warehouse for $322 million, expanding its presence in the growing wholesale-store business.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 416,290,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2657.38, up 88.12; transportation 1304.23, off 102.06; utilities 214.73, up 2.77.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3393.51, off 27.78.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 129.72, off 0.15; spot index 130.16, up 0.91.  Dollar: 141.85 yen, off 0.25; 1.8685 marks, off 0.0055.  Monday, October 16, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 8 3/4% high, 8 1/2% low, 8 5/8% near closing bid, 8 3/4% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.:8.30% 5 to 44 days; 8.20% 45 to 59 days; 8% 60 to 89 days; 7.875% 90 to 119 days; 7.75% 120 to 149 days; 7.625% 150 to 179 days; 7.375% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000:8.40% 30 days; 8.33% 60 days; 8.26% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.05% one month; 8.02% two months; 8% three months; 7.98% six months; 7.95% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market:8.40% one month; 8.40% three months; 8.40% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.40% 30 days; 8.35% 60 days; 8.27% 90 days; 8.20% 120 days; 8.15% 150 days; 8.02% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% one month; 8 5/8% to 8 1/2% two months; 8 9/16% to 8 7/16% three months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% four months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% five months; 8 1/2% to 8 3/8% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 1/2% one month; 8 1/2% three months; 8 7/16% six months; 8 3/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 15%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, October 16, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.37%, 13 weeks; 7.42%, 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.83%, standard conventional fixedrate mortgages; 7.875%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par).9.82%, standard conventional fixed rate-mortgages; 8.70%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.49%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Intel Corp. said it reached an agreement with Alliant Computer Systems Corp. to develop software standards for Intel's i860 microprocessor.  The i860, introduced earlier this year, is Intel's entry in the crowded market for reduced instruction set computing, or RISC, computers.  Intel, based in Santa Clara, Calif., is the market leader for traditional microprocessors with its 8086 family that forms the heart of IBM-compatible personal computers.  Under the agreement, Intel will invest $3 million to acquire a 4% stake in Alliant, a maker of minisupercomputers for scientists and engineers.  Alliant, based in Littleton, Mass., will license its parallel-computing technologies to Intel, providing users a way to let many i860 microprocessors in a single computer work on a problem simultaneously.  Alliant said it plans to use the microprocessor in future products.  It declined to discuss its plans for upgrading its current product line.  Omnicare Inc., which intends to expand its position in the medical and dental markets, said it acquired a cotton and gauze products division from closely held Sterile Products Corp. for $8.2 million.  Omnicare said it expects the division to add "substantial sales volume and to make a positive contribution to our earnings in 1990 and beyond."  In 1988 the Cincinnati company earned $3.1 million, or 32 cents a share, on revenue of $148.5 million.  Omnicare said the division operates under the trade name ACCO and supplies the medical and dental markets.  The business, based in St. Louis, had sales of more than $14 million in the fiscal year ended March 31, Omnicare said.  Burmah Oil PLC, a British independent oil and specialty chemicals marketing concern, said SHV Holdings N.V. of the Netherlands has built up a 6.7% stake in the company.  James Alexander, a Burmah spokesman, said SHV had previously owned "a little under 5%" of Burmah for about two years.  The Dutch company hadn't notified Burmah of its reason for increasing the stake, he said.  SHV, which last year merged its North Sea oil and gas operations with those of Calor Group PLC, has been pegged by speculators as a possible suitor for Burmah Oil in recent weeks.  SHV also owns 40% of Calor.  Burmah, which owns the Castrol brand of lubricant oils, reported a 17% rise in net income to #43.5 million ($68.3 million) in the first half.  J.P. Industries Inc. said it signed a definitive agreement to sell its Builders' Hardware Group to closely held Nalcor Inc. of Beverly Hills, Calif.  Terms weren't disclosed, but a J.P. Industries spokesman said the amount J.P. Industries will get for the group is "a little better than expected by the marketplace, and the marketplace had been expecting $25 million to $30 million."  The group consists of Weslock Corp. and JPI Modern Inc. J.P. Industries, which is based in Ann Arbor, Mich., said the sale completes a previously announced program to divest itself of its hardware and plumbing supplies operations.  The company's remaining business is the manufacture and sale of engine and transmissions products for industrial and transportation applications.  Citing a $3.1 million provision for doubtful accounts, Dallas-based National Heritage Inc. posted a loss for its fourth quarter ended June 30.  A unit of troubled Southmark Corp., the operator of nursing homes and retirement centers said it sustained a net loss of $1.6 million, or nine cents a share, compared with net income of $1.3 million, or eight cents a share, a year earlier.  Operating revenue rose 13% to $22.2 million from $19.7 million in the year-earlier quarter.  The company said the $3.1 million reserve was created to reflect doubt about the collectability of receivables owed to National Heritage by some of the real estate partnerships it manages.  The company also said expenses incurred by the previous board and management in the recent contest for control were recognized primarily in the first quarter ended Sept. 30.  National Heritage stock fell 12.5 cents yesterday to close at $1.375 a share in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  United Biscuits (Holdings) PLC, a British food producer, announced the creation of a European group to bring together its trading interests in the region.  The new group will comprise all of United Biscuit's manufacturing and marketing operations in the food sector apart from those based in the U.S.  United Biscuits said the combined group, which will include businesses such as McVities biscuits and Terry's confectionery, will have annual sales of more than #1.5 billion ($2.35 billion) and trading profit of more than #160 million ($251 million).  "The new structure will enable United Biscuits to focus clearly upon opportunities for planned growth during the 1990s," said Bob Clarke, deputy chairman and group chief executive.  Last month, United Biscuits agreed to sell its entire restaurant operations to Grand Metropolitan PLC for #180 million.  An American journalist now is standing trial in Namibia.  This is the place that world opinion has been celebrating over in the expectation that it's going to hold an election.  The most likely winner will be the Marxist-dominated SWAPO rebels.  The U.S. journalist's "crime" was writing that the head of the commission charged with overseeing the election's fairness, Bryan O'Linn, was openly sympathetic to SWAPO. Shortly after that, Mr. O'Linn had Scott Stanley arrested and his passport confiscated.  Mr. Stanley is on trial over charges that he violated a proclamation, issued by the South African administrator general earlier this year, which made it a crime punishable by two years in prison for any person to "insult, disparate or belittle" the election commission.  The Stanley affair doesn't bode well for the future of democracy or freedom of anything in Namibia when SWAPO starts running the government.  To the extent Mr. Stanley has done anything wrong, it may be that he is out of step with the consensus of world intellectuals that the Namibian guerrillas were above all else the victims of suppression by neighboring South Africa.  SWAPO has enjoyed favorable Western media treatment ever since the U.N. General Assembly declared it the "sole, authentic representative" of Namibia's people in 1977.  Last year, the U.S. brokered a peace settlement to remove Cuba's "Afrika Korps" from Angola and hold "free and fair" elections that would end South Africa's control of Namibia.  The elections are set for Nov. 7.  In July, Mr. Stanley, editor of American Press International, a Washington D.C.-based conservative wire service, visited Namibia to report on the U.N.-monitored election campaign.  He interviewed Mr. O'Linn, head of a commission charged with investigating electoral intimidation, and reported that Mr. O'Linn was openly sympathetic to SWAPO and indeed had defended its leaders in court.  After Mr. Stanley's article was published in two Namibian newspapers, Mr. O'Linn had criminal charges brought against their editors, publisher and lawyer.  Mr. Stanley was arrested and charged along with the others when he returned to Namibia this month.  Both the State Department and the Lawyers Committee for Freedom of the Press have protested Mr. Stanley's detention.  Mr. Stanley's arrest is the latest in a series of incidents that threaten to derail Namibia's elections.  Both South African and SWAPO extremists are intimidating voters.  The U.S. is in the habit of arranging peace settlements and then washing its hands over the tragic results.  It now has the chance to redress that record in Namibia.  State and the human-rights community should insist that Mr. Stanley and his fellow defendants be released and that the United Nation's monitors make certain that Mr. O'Linn's commission investigates election complaints from all sides.  Commodity futures prices generally reflected the stability of the stock market following its plunge Friday.  Yesterday, the stock market's influence at first created nervousness.  Later, however, it became more of an undercurrent than a dominating force as individual markets reacted more to their own factors.  Gold, the traditional haven in times of financial crisis, continued its inverse lockstep with the dollar, rising early in the day as the currency fell, and then giving up some of its gains as the dollar recovered.  Copper and crude oil reacted sharply to the concern that a crash yesterday could have a potentially devastating effect on the economy.  Copper fell and showed little rebound through the day as one of the major supply problems that had been supporting prices appeared to be solved.  Crude oil declined early, but as the stock market retained early gains, it, too, became stronger, ending with a small net loss.  Trading in cotton and sugar was nervous and showed small declines.  In Chicago, grain and soybean prices rose slightly.  Livestock and meat prices, however, dropped on concern that a financial crisis would cut consumption of beef and pork.  In commodity markets yesterday:  PRECIOUS METALS: Futures prices were moderately higher as gold gave up some of its early gains and platinum behaved independently, first falling and then later rising.  Silver performed quietly.  The spot October gold price rose $4 to $367.30 an ounce.  The more active December delivery gold settled with a gain of $3.90 an ounce at $371.20, after trading as high as $374.  December silver was up 2.3 cents an ounce at $5.163.  Platinum behaved more like an industrial metal, easing early on concern over a possible weaker economy, but recovering later, as the stock market strengthened.  Gold was nowhere the spectacular performer it was two years ago on Black Monday.  For one thing, last Friday, precious metals markets closed before the stock market went into its late-in-the-day nose dive, so it couldn't react to it.  Back on Friday, Oct. 16, l987, the stock market declined during the day, and gold prices surged as the stock market fell.  The October 1987 contract that day rose as much as $8.70 to as high as $471.60, and the more deferred positions, due to mature as late as March 1989, rose as much as $9.60.  On Black Monday, Oct. 19, 1987, the October contract tacked on further gains, rising to as high as $491.50 for a gain of almost $20 on top of the Friday advances, before giving up almost $10 of that at the close.  Yesterday's October gain of $4 was miniscule compared with that.  One analyst, Peter Cardillo of Josephthal & Co., New York, said the gold market already had some good price-supporting technical factors that would have caused prices to rise, with or without the stock market.  "What the stock market did was cause the rise to take place earlier than it would have happened," said Mr. Cardillo.  There's a good chance that gold will retain its gains and rise further, he said.  He expects a drop in interest rates, which would help gold by keeping the dollar from rising.  Finally, according to Mr. Cardillo, the impact of the strong dollar should be reflected in reduced exports in the August merchandise trade deficit, when the figures are released today.  This would be damaging to the dollar and supportive for gold, he said.  ENERGY: Worried that Friday's 190-point stock market plunge might be a harbinger of things to come for the economy, petroleum futures traders called a halt to the recent string of increases in crude oil futures prices.  The U.S. benchmark crude, West Texas Intermediate, closed at $20.59 a barrel for November delivery, down 30 cents.  Some analysts said crude was due for a correction anyhow, following several days of significant gains.  But most market observers agreed that Friday's stock market drop is what dampened spirits in the petroleum pits yesterday.  Until yesterday, futures prices had been headed up on expectations that world oil demand will continue to be strong.  The Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries increased its production ceiling for the fourth quarter based on projections of robust demand.  So any bearish indicator, such as Friday's precipitous drop in the stock market, sends shivers through the oil markets as well.  Indeed, after reacting early in the trading day to Friday's plummet, futures prices firmed up again as traders took note of the stock market's partial recovery yesterday.  COPPER: Futures prices fell and showed little rebound as one major labor problem that had been underpinning prices appeared to be solved.  The December contract declined 3.05 cents a pound to $1.2745.  Prices were down from the outset of trading on concern that a drop in the stock market might create a weakened economy and a consequent reduction in copper use.  But the recovery in the stock market provided little help for copper as word spread that a three-month strike at the Highland Valley mine in British Columbia was about over, according to an analyst.  Highland Valley is a large Canadian producer and principal supplier to Japan, which recently began seeking copper elsewhere as its inventories shrank.  Last week it was reported that company and union negotiations had overcome the major hurdle, the contracting out of work by the company.  Now, the analyst said, only minor points remain to be cleaned up.  "For all intents and purposes, an agreement appears to have been achieved," he said.  Copper inventories in New York's Commodity Exchange warehouses rose yesterday by 516 tons, to 10,004 tons.  London Metal Exchange copper inventories last week declined 13,575 tons, to 89,300 tons.  The LME stocks decline was about as expected, but the Comex gain wasn't.  However, this was brushed aside by concern over the stock market, the analyst said.  At one point in futures trading, as the stock market firmed, the December contract rose to as high as $1.2965, but it wasn't able to sustain the gain.  "It was simply overbought," he said, and selling by funds that are computer guided helped depress prices.  COTTON: Futures prices eased, more in reaction to Hurricane Jerry than to any influence of the stock market.  The December contract ended with a loss of 0.22 cent a pound, at 74.48 cents.  Technical considerations following the hurricane, which was a factor in the market Friday, caused prices to decline yesterday, said Ernest Simon, cotton specialist for Prudential-Bache Securities, New York.  Prices rose sharply Friday as the storm approached Texas and Louisiana, which is part of the Mississippi Delta cotton-growing area.  However, after absorbing the potential effect of the hurricane, prices began to slip late Friday, Mr. Simon said.  That selling continued yesterday and kept prices under pressure, he said.  Colder weather is being predicted for the high plains of Texas and the northern states of the Delta during the coming weekend, Mr. Simon said.  That hasn't yet captured traders' attention, he added.  SUGAR: Futures prices declined.  The March contract was off 0.32 cent a pound at 13.97 cents.  At one point in early trading the March price rose to as high as 14.22 cents when the stock market recovered, but the price then fell back.  A price-depressing factor, one analyst said, was that India, which had been expected to buy around 200,000 tons of sugar in the world market, didn't make any purchases.  India recently bought 200,000 tons and was expected to buy more, the analyst said.  Another analyst thought that India may have pulled back because of the concern over the stock market.  "India may have felt that if there was a severe drop in the stock market and it affected sugar, it could buy at lower prices," said Judith Ganes, analyst for Shearson Lehman Hutton, New York.  At any rate, she added, "India needs the sugar, so it will be in sooner or later to buy it."  FARM PRODUCTS: The prices of cattle and hog futures contracts dropped sharply because traders speculated that the stock market plunge Friday will linger in the minds of U.S. consumers long enough to prompt them to rein in their spending at the supermarket, which would hurt demand for beef and pork.  The price of the hog contract for October delivery dropped its maximum permissible daily limit of 1.5 cents a pound.  The prices of most grain futures contracts rose slightly yesterday out of relief that the stock market was showing signs of recovering.  Earlier in the session, the prices of several soybean contracts set new lows.  A broad rally began when several major processors began buying futures contracts, apparently to take advantage of the price dip.  Knight-Ridder Inc. said it would report increased earnings per share for the third quarter, contrary to reported analysts' comments that the publishing company's earnings would be down.  A company spokesman said he believed the confusion was caused when James Batten, Knight-Ridder's chairman and chief executive, told New York analysts two weeks ago that Knight-Ridder's earnings per share for the first nine months of 1989 would "be behind a little bit" from like period of 1988.  The Knight-Ridder spokesman said the third-quarter earnings that the company plans to report Oct. 24 are expected to be up.  The spokesman said he was "comfortable" with revised analysts' projections that the company would report earnings of between 62 cents and 64 cents a share, compared with the 53 cents a share it reported for the 1988 third quarter.  Knight-Ridder said it agreed with estimates that net income for all of 1989 would be around $2.86 a share, compared with $2.59 a share a year earlier.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Knight-Ridder closed at $51.75, down 37.5 cents.  DD Acquisition Corp. said it extended its $45-a-share offer for Dunkin' Donuts Inc. to Nov. 1 from yesterday.  The offer has an indicated value of $268 million.  DD Acquisition is a partnership of Unicorp Canada Corp.'s Kingsbridge Capital Group unit and Cara Operations Ltd.  As previously reported, under the terms of a confidentiality agreement with Dunkin' Donuts, the partners agreed to keep their offer open until Nov. 1, and not to acquire any additional shares except through a tender offer expiring on that date.  DD Acquisition said that it already owns 15% of the common shares of the doughnut shop chain and that as of the close of business Friday an additional 11% had been tendered to its offer.  Dunkin' Donuts is based in Randolph, Mass.  Cara Operations, a food services concern, and Unicorp, a holding company with interests in oil and natural gas and financial services, are based in Toronto.  Golden West Financial Corp., riding above the turbulence that has troubled most of the thrift industry, posted a 16% increase of third-quarter earnings to $41.8 millon, or 66 cents a share.  The company earned $36 million, or 57 cents a share, in the year-ago quarter.  Herbert M. Sandler, chairman and chief executive officer of the Oakland, Calif., savings-and-loan holding company, credited the high number of loans added to the company's portfolio over the last 12 months for broadening its earning asset base and improving profit performance.  However, the executive noted that slackening demand for new mortgages depressed new loan originations to $1 billion, 30% below the same period last year.  In savings activity, Mr. Sandler said consumer deposits have enjoyed a steady increase throughout 1989, and topped $11 billion at quarter's end for the first time in the company's history.  Deposit growth amounted to $393 million, more than double the year-ago figure.  Whirlpool Corp., Benton Harbor, Mich., said it has developed a process to recover environmentally harmful chlorofluorocarbons, or CFCs, that previously entered the atmosphere during in-home repair of refrigerators and freezers.  The maker of home appliances said the process, which involves the use of a multilayer plastic bag during repairs to capture the gaseous substance and transport it to a recycling center, is already in use at a number of its service centers, and will be available to all authorized repair centers by spring.  Earlier repairs vented the CFCs out of the home through a hose directly into the atmosphere.  CFCs are widely used as solvents, coolants and fire suppressants.  But their use has been linked to a potentially dangerous depletion of the Earth's ozone layer, and a number of companies are seeking to curtail use, or at least emission, of the substance.  Whirpool said, "We see this process as a small but important step toward eventual elimination of CFC use in appliance manufacture."  Maxus Energy Corp., Dallas, said it discovered a new oil field northeast of its previously discovered Intan Field in the southeast Sumatra area of Indonesia.  Maxus said it didn't run a production test on the three discovery wells it drilled in the field, which is about 1.6 miles from the Intan Field, because the wells are similar to others drilled at its Intan and Widuri fields.  However, Maxus said it believes the reserves in the field are about 10 million barrels of oil.  The Intan Field has estimated reserves of 50 million barrels and the Widuri Field has estimated reserves of 225 million barrels.  Maxus, an independent oil and gas concern, is the operator and owns a 56% interest in the new field, called Northeast Intan.  Other interests are owned by BP Petroleum Development (SES) Ltd., C. Itoh Energy Co. Ltd., Deminex Sumatra OEL G.m.b.H., Hispanoil (Sumatra) Production Ltd., Hudbay Oil (Indonesia) Ltd., Inpex Sumatra Co. Ltd., Lasmo Sumatra Ltd., Sunda Shell, TCR Sumat A.G. and Warrior Oil Co.  The production-sharing contract area is held with Pertamina, the Indonesian state oil company.  Environmental Systems Co. said it is restating its results to reduce its reported net income for the first nine months of its fiscal year after discovering it took tax credits that already had been taken last year.  The Little Rock, Ark., hazardous-waste services company said the restatement will reduce its net for the nine months ended July 31 to $2.5 million, or 17 cents a share, from $3.7 million, or 26 cents a share.  Net for the third quarter, restated, is $1.6 million, or 10 cents a share.  The company previously reported net of $2.3 million, or 15 cents a share.  The company said that for financial reporting purposes last year it took tax credits that will be recognized for tax purposes this year.  But because of confusion, it took those credits again in reporting its results through the first nine months.  Jack W. Forrest, Environmental Systems president and chief executive officer, said the change increases the company's effective tax rate to about 35% from 20%.  Memotec Data Inc. said it signed a definitive merger agreement with ISI Systems Inc. under which Memotec will acquire ISI for $20 (U.S.) a share, or about $130 million, in cash and securities.  In American Stock Exchange composite trading, ISI closed up $3.125 at $18.625.  In Montreal Exchange trading, Memotec closed unchanged at 10.625 Canadian dollars (US$9.05).  Memotec said under the agreement, ISI, a Braintree, Mass., provider of computer software and services to the insurance industry, will merge with a U.S. unit of Memotec created for that purpose.  Memotec is a Montreal-based maker of telecommunications products and provider of telecommunications and computer services.  Memotec said the agreement calls for it to make a $20-a-share cash tender offer for all shares outstanding of ISI.  But it said Charles Johnston, ISI chairman and president, agreed to sell his 60% stake in ISI to Memotec upon completion of the tender offer for a combination of cash, Memotec stock and debentures.  Memotec said the tender offer is conditioned on, among other things, holders tendering at least 15% of the shares outstanding, other than the shares held by Mr. Johnston.  ISI said its board has instructed management to accept inquiries from any others interested in making a bid.  ISI said it can withdraw from the merger agreement with Memotec if a better bid surfaces.  CMS Energy Corp., Jackson, Mich., said it has resumed the purchase of its common stock under a program approved by its directors in 1987.  At the time of the original announcement, CMS said its board authorized the purchase of as many as five million of its shares.  A spokesman said 2.6 million shares have been purchased since then.  The company said it will buy additional shares "from time to time in the open market or in private transactions at prevailing market prices."  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, CMS Energy closed at $34.375 a share, down 62.5 cents, from the closing price of $37.375 a share on Thursday, before Friday's plunge.  The utility company currently has about 82.1 million shares outstanding.  Morgan Stanley & Co. will act as the exclusive broker for the repurchase.  Hughes Aircraft Co., a unit of General Motors Corp., said it agreed to purchase the Electro-Optics Technology division of Perkin-Elmer Corp.  Terms of the agreement weren't disclosed.  But for the fiscal year ended July 31, 1988, the most recent period for which results were broken out, the Perkin-Elmer unit accounted for more than half the $145 million in sales recorded by the company's government systems sector.  Perkin-Elmer, which is based in Norwalk, Conn., said the sale of the Danbury, Conn., unit is consistent with its restructuring strategy announced in April.  In addition to making electro-optical systems, the unit also makes laser warning receivers.  These are used aboard military helicopters to warn pilots that a laser weapon has been focused on them.  Hughes of Los Angeles said the PerkinElmer unit's work complements efforts by its Electro-Optical and Data Systems group, which makes infrared sensors, military lasers and night vision equipment.  Hughes said it expects the sale to close by year end.  The Communications Workers of America ratified a new regional contract and all but one of the local agreements with Bell Atlantic Corp.  CWA's New Jersey Commercial local, which represents about 2,500 service representatives and marketing employees, rejected the tentative agreement.  Both the union and the regional telephone company said they were working together to resolve differences.  The new three-year contracts, which replace ones that expired Aug. 5, cover 41,000 Bell Atlantic employees.  The ratification follows a 23-day strike against the Philadelphia-based company.  Meanwhile, CWA and International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers members remain on strike against Nynex Corp., the New York-based regional phone company.  The unions and the company last week agreed to mediation.  The CWA represents 40,000 Nynex workers and the IBEW represents 20,000 workers.  For the moment, at least, euphoria has replaced anxiety on Wall Street.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average jumped sharply yesterday to close at 2657.38, panic didn't sweep the world's markets, and investors large and small seemed to accept Friday's dizzying 190-point plunge as a sharp correction, not a calamity.  Many went bargain-hunting.  Among those sighing with relief was John H. Gutfreund, chairman of Salomon Brothers, who took to the firm's trading floor to monitor yesterday's events.  As the rally gained strength at 3:15 p.m., he smiled broadly, brandished his unlit cigar and slapped Stanley Shopkorn, his top stock trader, on the back.  At first, it seemed as if history might repeat itself.  As trading opened yesterday morning on the Big Board, stocks of many of the nation's biggest companies couldn't open for trading because a wave of sell orders was overwhelming buyers.  By 10:10, the Dow Industrials were off 63.52 points, and the stock of UAL Corp., whose troubles had kicked off Friday's plunge, still hadn't opened.  But then, as quickly as the Dow had fallen, it began to turn around.  It ended with a gain of 88.12 points.  By the market's close, volume on the New York exchange totaled more than 416 million, the fourth highest on record.  The Big Board handled the huge volume without any obvious strain, in sharp contrast to Black Monday of 1987.  But the rally was largely confined to the blue-chip stocks, which had been hard hit during Friday's selling frenzy.  Overall, more Big Board stocks lost money than gained.  And many arbitragers, already reeling from Friday's collapse of the UAL deal, were further hurt yesterday when a proposed takeover of AMR Corp., the parent of American Airlines, collapsed.  Indeed, the Dow Jones Transportation Average plunged 102.06 points, its second-worst drop in history.  World-wide, trading was generally manageable.  The Frankfurt stock exchange was hardest hit of the major markets, with blue chips there falling 12.8%.  In London, a midday rally left the market's major index off 3.2%, and Tokyo's leading stock index fell only 1.8% in surprisingly lackluster trading.  Other, more thinly traded Asian markets were hit harder than Tokyo's, but there were no free-fall declines.  Investors big and small say they learned valuable lessons since the 1987 crash: In this age of computerized trading, huge corrections or runups in a few hours' time must be expected.  What's more, such short-term cataclysms are survivable and are no cause for panic selling.  Stephen Boesel, a major money manager for T. Rowe Price in Baltimore, says, "There was less panic than in 1987: We had been through it once."  In Somerset, Wis., Adrian Sween, who owns a supplier of nursing-home equipment and isn't active in the stock market, agrees.  "I look at it as a ho-hum matter," he says.  Many other factors played a part in yesterday's comeback.  The Federal Reserve signaled its willingness to provide liquidity; the interest rate on its loans to major banks inched downward early in the day.  Foreign stock markets, which kicked off Black Monday with a huge selling spree, began the day off by relatively modest amounts.  The dollar, after falling sharply in overnight trading to 139.10 yen, bounced back strongly to 141.8, thus easing fears that foreigners would unload U.S. stocks.  And the widely disseminated opinion among most market experts that a crash wasn't in store also helped calm investors.  Many major institutions, for example, came into work yesterday ready to buy some of the blue chips they felt had been sharply undervalued on Friday.  Still, amid all the backslapping and signs of relief over yesterday's events, some market professionals cautioned that there is nothing present in the current market system to prevent another dizzying drop such as Friday's.  "There is too much complacency," says money manager Barry Schrager.  Computers have increasingly connected securities markets world-wide, so that a buying or selling wave in one market is often passed around the globe.  So investors everywhere nervously eyed yesterday's opening in Tokyo, where the Nikkei average of 225 blue-chip stocks got off to a rocky start.  The average plunged some 600 points, or 1.7%, in the first 20 minutes of trading.  But the selling wave had no conviction, and the market first surged upward by 200 points, then drifted lower, closing down 647.  Unlike two years ago, most of Japan's major investors chose to sit this calamity out.  In Merrill Lynch & Co.'s Tokyo trading room, some 40 traders and assistants sat quietly, with few orders to process.  Clients "are all staying out" of the market, one Merrill trader says.  The relative calm in Tokyo proved little comfort to markets opening up in Europe.  Frankfurt's opening was delayed a half hour because of a crush of sell orders.  "The beginning was chaotic," says Nigel Longley, a broker for Commerzbank AG.  In London, the view from the trading floor of an American securities firm, Jefferies & Co., also was troubling.  A computer screen displaying 100 blue-chip stocks colors each one red when its price is falling.  The screen was a sea of red.  "I see concern, but I don't see panic," says J. Francis Palamara, a New Yorker who runs the 15-trader office.  London's blue-chip stock index turned up just before 8 a.m. New York time, sending an encouraging message to Wall Street.  When trading opened in New York at 9:30 a.m. EDT, stocks fell sharply -- as expected.  Futures markets in Chicago had opened at a level suggesting the Dow would fall by about 60 points.  With sell orders piled up from Friday, about half the stocks in the Dow couldn't open on time.  By 9:45, the industrial average had dropped 27 points.  By 10 a.m., it was down 49.  Ten minutes later, the Dow hit bottom-down 63.52 points, another 2.5%.  But shortly before then, some of Wall Street's sharpest traders say, they sensed a turn.  "The first thing that caught my eye that was encouraging was Treasury bonds were off," says Austin George, head of stock trading at T. Rowe Price.  "It meant that people weren't running pell-mell to the safety of bonds."  Shortly after 10 a.m., the Major Market Index, a Chicago Board of Trade futures contract of 20 stocks designed to mimic the DJIA, exploded upward.  Stock traders were buoyed -- because an upturn in the MMI had also started the recovery in stocks on the Tuesday following Black Monday.  "The MMI has gone better," shouted a trader in the London office of Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Shearson's London trading room went wild.  Traders shouted out as their Reuters, Quotron and Telerate screens posted an ever-narrowing loss on Wall Street.  Then, nine minutes later, Wall Street suddenly rebounded to a gain on the day.  "Rally, rally, rally," shouted Shearson's Andy Rosen.  "This is panic buying."  Major blue-chip stocks like Philip Morris, General Motors and Proctor & Gamble led the rally.  Japanese were said to be heavy buyers.  German and Dutch investors reportedly loaded up on Kellogg Co. Then, traders say, corporations with share buy-back programs kicked into high gear, triggering gains in, among other issues, Alcan Aluminium and McDonald's.  Walt Disney Co., which had one of the biggest sell-order imbalances on Friday and was one of seven stocks that halted trading and never reopened that day, opened yesterday late at 114.5, down 8.5.  But then it suddenly burst upward 7.5 as Goldman, Sachs & Co. stepped in and bought almost every share offer, traders said.  By 10:25, the Dow had turned up for the day, prompting cheers on trading desks and exchange floors.  Among Big Board specialists, the cry was "Pull your offers" -- meaning that specialists soon expected to get higher prices for their shares.  "It was bedlam on the upside," said one Big Board specialist.  "What we had was a real, old-fashioned rally."  This technical strength spurred buying from Wall Street's "black boxes," computer programs designed to trigger large stock purchases during bullish periods.  Typical, perhaps, was Batterymarch's Dean LeBaron.  Mr. LeBaron, who manages $10 billion, says, "We turned the trading system on, and it did whatever it was programmed to do."  Asked what stocks the computer bought, the money manager says, "I don't know."  Not everybody was making money.  The carnage on the Chicago Board Options Exchange, the nation's major options market, was heavy after the trading in S&P 100 stock-index options was halted Friday.  Many market makers in the S&P 100 index options contract had bullish positions Friday, and when the shutdown came they were frozen with huge losses.  Over the weekend, clearing firms told the Chicago market makers to get out of their positions at any cost Monday morning.  "They were absolutely killed, slaughtered," said one Chicago-based options trader.  Meanwhile, a test of the stock market's rally came at about 2 p.m., with the Dow at 2600, up 31 points on the day.  Charles Clough, a strategist at Merrill Lynch, says bargain hunting had explained the Dow's strength up to that point and that many market professionals were anticipating a drop in the Dow.  Moreover, the announcement that real estate magnate and sometime raider Donald Trump was withdrawing his offer for AMR Corp. might have been expected to rattle traders.  Instead, the rally only paused for about 25 minutes and then steamed forward as institutions resumed buying.  The market closed minutes after reaching its high for the day of 2657.38.  Across the country, many people took yesterday's events in stride, while remaining generally uneasy about the stock market in general.  Says James Norman, the mayor of Ava, Mo.: "I don't invest in stocks.  I much prefer money I can put my hands on."  While Mayor Norman found the market's performance Monday reassuring, he says, he remains uneasy.  "We have half the experts saying one thing and half the other" about the course of the economy.  Ralph Holzfaster, a farmer and farm-supply store operator in Ogallala, Neb., says of the last few days events, "If anything good comes out of this, it might be that it puts some of these LBOs on the skids."  Says Gordon Fines, a money manager at IDS Financial Services in Minneapolis, "You're on a roller coaster, and that may last.  The public is still cautious."  Skipper's Inc., Bellevue, Wash., said it signed a definitive merger agreement for a National Pizza Corp. unit to acquire the 90.6% of Skipper's Inc. it doesn't own for $11.50 a share, or about $28.1 million.  NP Acquisition Co., a National Pizza unit, plans to begin a tender offer for Skipper's on Friday, conditioned on at least two-thirds of Skipper's shares being tendered.  Pittsburg, Kan.-based National Pizza said the transaction will be financed under its revolving credit agreement.  In national over-the-counter trading, Skipper's shares rose 50 cents to $11.  Skipper's said the merger will help finance remodeling and future growth.  Skipper's previously turned down a $10-a-share proposal from National Pizza and Pizza Hut Inc. questioned whether the purchase would violate National Pizza's franchise agreements.  National Pizza said it settled its dispute with Pizza Hut, allowing it to make the purchase.  Also, Skipper's results began to turn around, permitting a higher offer, National Pizza said.  For the 12 weeks ended Sept. 3, Skipper's had net income of $361,000, or 13 cents a share, compared with a net loss a year earlier.  Revenue was $19.9 million.  EAST GERMANS RALLIED as officials reportedly sought Honecker's ouster.  In what was considered the largest protest in the Communist state's 40-year history, at least 120,000 demonstrators marched through the southern city of Leipzig to press demands for democratic freedoms, opposition activists said.  Police didn't intervene.  Meanwhile, as the first of more than 1,300 East Germans trying to flee to the West through Poland renounced their citizenship, a West German newspaper reported that regional Communist officials demanded the dismissal of hard-line leader Honecker.  Secretary of State Baker, in a foreign policy speech, called for the reunification of Germany, saying it was the "legitimate right" of the German people.  ---  Gorbachev blamed the Soviet Union's press for contributing to the nation's mounting problems.  At a meeting Friday, the Kremlin leader complained about recent articles that raised the possiblity of civil unrest, and accused the media of fueling panic buying of goods by publishing stories about impending shortages.  ---  House-Senate conferees approved a permanent smoking ban on domestic airline routes within the continental U.S. and on flights of less than six hours to Alaska and Hawaii.  The curbs would cover all but a small percentage of flights, and represent an expansion of the current ban on flights of less than two hours.  ---  E. Robert Wallach was sentenced by a U.S. judge in New York to six years in prison and fined $250,000 for his racketeering conviction in the Wedtech scandal.  Wallach, an associate of ex-Attorney General Meese, was found guilty in August of taking $425,000 in illegal payoffs from the now-defunct defense contractor.  ---  NASA resumed the countdown for today's launch of the space shuttle Atlantis, and a federal appeals court in Washington dismissed a lawsuit by anti-nuclear groups to delay the flight because the plutonium-powered Galileo space probe was aboard.  The space agency said it didn't expect weather or protesters to block the liftoff.  ---  The Bush administration is preparing to extend a ban on federal financing of research using fetal tissue, government sources said.  A temporary prohibition was imposed in March 1988.  While anti-abortion groups are opposed to such research, scientists have said transplanting such tissue could be effective in treating diabetes.  ---  Delegates from 91 nations endorsed a ban on world ivory trade in an attempt to rescue the endangered elephant from extinction.  Five African nations, however, said they would continue selling the valuable tusks.  ---  Mubarak held reconciliation talks with Gadhafi at the Egyptian resort of Mersa Metruh.  It was the Libyan leader's first trip to Egypt in 16 years.  They announced a reduction in formalities for travel, but didn't show any real signs of resuming full diplomatic ties.  The Egyptian president said he would visit Libya today to resume the talks.  ---  Seoul and Pyongyang reached a tentative agreement to allow visits between families on the divided Korean peninsula.  Such family reunions would be the second since 1945.  Differences remained between the North and South Korean governments, however, over conditions for the exchanges.  ---  Freed black nationalists resumed political activity in South Africa and vowed to fight against apartheid, raising fears of a possible white backlash.  The nation's main white opposition party warned that the government's release Sunday of eight black political prisoners risked bringing chaos and eventual black Marxist rule to the nation.  ---  The White House said Bush is "fully satisfied" with CIA Director Webster and the intelligence agency's performance during the Oct. 3 failed coup in Panama.  The Washington Post reported that unidentified senior administration officials were frustrated with Webster's low-profile activities during the insurrection and wanted him replaced.  ---  Poland's legislature approved limits on automatic wage increases without special provisions for food price rises.  The vote was considered a test of the Solidarity-led government's resolve to proceed with a harsh economic-restructuring program.  ---  Norway's King Olav V installed a three-party non-Socialist government as Gro Harlem Brundtland's three-year-old Labor regime relinquished power.  The 19-member cabinet is led by Prime Minister Jan Syse, who acknowledged a "difficult situation" since the coalition controls only 62 seats in Oslo's 165-member legislature.  ---  El Salvador's government opened a new round of talks with the country's leftist rebels in an effort to end a decade-long civil war.  A spokesman said the guerrillas would present a cease-fire proposal during the negotiations in Costa Rica that includes constitutional and economic changes.  --- The State Department said there was a "possibility" that some Nicaraguan rebels were selling their U.S.-supplied arms to Salvadoran guerrillas, but insisted it wasn't an organized effort.  Separately, Secretary of State Baker complained about a U.N. aide who last week told the Contras to disband as part of a regional peace accord.  ---  Died: Cornel Wilde, 74, actor and director, in Los Angeles, of leukemia. . . .  Danilo Kis, 54, Yugoslav-born novelist and essayist, Sunday, in Paris, of cancer.  British retail sales volume rose a provisional 0.4% in September from August and was up 2.2% from September 1988, the Department of Trade and Industry said.  For the three months ended in September, retail sales volume was down 0.5% from the previous three months and up 1.2% from a year earlier.  Chicago investor William Farley agreed to sell three divisions of Cluett Peabody & Co. for about $600 million to Bidermann S.A., a closely held clothing maker based in Paris.  Shortly after completing the $1.56 billion acquisition of West Point-Pepperell Inc. in April, Mr. Farley's holding company, Farley Inc., said it was considering the sale of Cluett, a leading shirt maker and one of West Point-Pepperell's biggest units.  Included in the sale are Cluett units that make men's shirts under the Arrow name, socks under the Gold Toe name and menswear through the Schoeneman division.  The companies said the agreement is subject to Bidermann's receipt of financing and to regulatory and other approvals.  They said the sale is expected to be concluded by the end of November.  Mr. Farley said the sale of three of Cluett's four main divisions plus other "anticipated" West Point-Pepperell asset sales by December, should bring in a total of about $700 million.  He didn't elaborate on other asset sales being considered.  Mr. Farley followed a similar pattern when he acquired Northwest Industries Inc. and then sold much of its assets.  But he kept Fruit of the Loom Inc., the underwear maker that he still controls and serves as chairman and chief executive.  Cluett was an independent company until West Point-Pepperell acquired it for $375 million in cash and stock in 1986.  In the fiscal year ended Sept. 30, 1988, Cluett had operating profit of $37 million on sales of $757 million.  Bidermann sells clothes under various labels, including Yves Saint Laurent and Bill Robinson for men and Ralph Lauren for women.  A spokesman said the company had sales of $400 million in 1988.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading, West Point-Pepperell fell 25 cents to $53.875.  Britain's Blue Arrow PLC intends to change its name to Manpower PLC and write off a chunk of the nearly $1.2 billion in good will realized in the takeover of U.S.-based Manpower Inc.  Blue Arrow Chairman Mitchell Fromstein said in an interview that the two steps may be a prelude to reincorporating the world's biggest employment-services group in the U.S. Mr. Fromstein disclosed the planned steps, expected within a few months, as Blue Arrow posted a 2.5% drop in its third-quarter pretax earnings.  The name change and good will write-off could help solidify Blue Arrow's dominance of the U.S. temporary-help market and give it a more American image as U.S. investors turn jittery about foreign stocks after Friday's market plunge.  U.S. holders now own more than 60% of Blue Arrow compared with 9% last January.  "In the U.S. market, the recognition of the Manpower name is infinitely stronger than Blue Arrow," Mr. Fromstein said.  The moves also could erase shareholders' perception of Blue Arrow as a company in turmoil.  "It further reinforces the concept that Blue Arrow is a thing of the past," said Doug Arthur, an analyst at Kidder Peabody & Co. in New York.  The proposed changes "all make a lot of sense to me," he added.  In a widely publicized boardroom coup, Mr. Fromstein ousted Antony Berry as Blue Arrow chief executive in January, a month after Mr. Berry had forced Mr. Fromstein out as the $1 million-a-year chief of Milwaukee-based Manpower.  Mr. Fromstein solidified his control in April by taking over from Mr. Berry as chairman.  But the Blue Arrow tumult isn't over yet, as the British government is investigating a disputed #25 million ($39.4 million) loan which Mr. Fromstein has said was made under Mr. Berry's direction.  Blue Arrow was able to pull off the $1.34 billion takeover of Manpower in 1987 largely because different British and American accounting standards produce higher reported earnings for British companies.  Under British rules, Blue Arrow was able to write off at once the $1.15 billion in good will arising from the purchase.  As a U.S.-based company, Blue Arrow would have to amortize the good will over as many as 40 years, creating a continuing drag on reported earnings.  Good will is the excess of cost of an acquired firm, operating unit or assets over the current or fair market value of those assets.  But with so many shares now held in the U.S., Blue Arrow reports its earnings two ways, based on both U.K. and U.S. accounting standards.  "Our balance sheets look like they came from Alice's wonderland," Mr. Fromstein said.  The British version shows "a handful of pounds of net worth" following the 1987 write-off of good will, while the American version reflects "$1 billion of net worth because almost none of {the good will} has been written off."  Mr. Fromstein said he hopes to eradicate some of the good will left on Blue Arrow's U.S. books in one fell swoop, but wouldn't specify how much.  People close to Blue Arrow suggested the write-down would represent a sizable chunk, with executives claiming prior management overstated the extent of Manpower's good will.  That move, along with the return to the Manpower name, could bolster the company's prospects during possibly difficult times for temporary help.  The number of U.S. temporary workers fell about 1% in the 12 months ending Aug. 31, after sliding nearly 3.5% in July, said Kidder Peabody's Mr. Arthur.  Blue Arrow blamed the pretax profit drop in the quarter ended July 31 partly on slower earnings growth of non-Manpower units in Britain.  Overall, pretax profit slid to #18.49 million in the quarter from #18.98 million a year earlier.  Richard G. Sim, the man credited with transforming Applied Power Inc. from an underachiever into a feisty player in the global market for hydraulic tools, hopes to guide a similar turnaround at the company's latest acquisition, Barry Wright Corp.  The 45-year-old former General Electric Co. executive figures it will be easier this time.  But analysts, while applauding the acquisition, say Applied's chief executive faces a tough challenge in integrating the two companies.  Barry Wright, acquired by Applied for $147 million, makes computer-room equipment and vibration-control systems.  The Watertown, Mass., company's sales have been dormant and its profits have dropped.  Last year's earnings of $1.3 million, including $815,000 from a restructuring gain, were far below the year-earlier $8.4 million.  Besides spurring Barry Wright's sales, which were $201.7 million in 1988, Mr. Sim must pare its costs and product line.  "The question is how long it's going to take Barry Wright to make a contribution," says F. John Mirek, an analyst at Blunt Ellis Loewi in Milwaukee.  The answer will help determine whether Applied continues to reach the ambitious goals set by Mr. Sim.  The Butler, Wis., manufacturer went public at $15.75 a share in August 1987, and Mr. Sim's goal then was a $29 per-share price by 1992.  Strong earnings growth helped achieve that price far ahead of schedule, in August 1988.  The stock has since softened, trading around $25 a share last week and closing yesterday at $23.00 in national over-the-counter trading.  But Mr. Sim has set a fresh target of $50 a share by the end of 1992.  Reaching that goal, says Robert T. Foote, Applied's chief financial officer, will require "efficient reinvestment" of cash by Applied and continuation of its healthy 19% rate of return on operating capital.  In Barry Wright, Mr. Sim sees a situation "very similar" to the one he faced when he joined Applied as president and chief operating officer in 1985.  Applied, then a closely held company, was stagnating under the management of its controlling family.  While profitable, it "wasn't growing and wasn't providing a satisfactory return on invested capital," he says.  Mr. Sim is confident that the drive to dominate certain niche markets will work at Barry Wright as it has at Applied.  He also professes an "evangelical" fervor to develop a corporate culture that rewards managers who produce and where decision-making is shared.  Mr. Sim considers the new unit's operations "fundamentally sound" and adds that Barry Wright has been fairly successful in moving into markets that haven't interested larger competitors.  "With a little patience, these businesses will perform very satisfactorily," Mr. Sim says.  Within about six months, "things will be moving in the right direction," he predicts.  Mr. Sim figures it will be easier to turn Barry Wright around since he's now in the driver's seat.  When he came to Applied, "I didn't have the power to execute as I do today," he says.  He was named chief executive officer of Applied in 1986 and became chairman last November.  At Applied, Mr. Sim set growth as his first objective.  He took the company public in an offering that netted Applied about $12.6 million, which helped launch the company's acquisition program.  Sales climbed to an estimated $245 million in fiscal 1989, ended Aug. 31, from $99.9 million in fiscal 1985.  The company expects that earnings, which have marched steadily upward in recent years, reached about $20.8 million, or $1.58 a share, in the fiscal year just ended, up from $15.2 million in fiscal 1988 and $3.9 million in 1985.  The Supreme Court agreed to decide whether a federal court, in an antitrust lawsuit filed by state officials or private parties, may dismantle a merger that it has ruled anti-competitive.  The high court agreed to hear the state of California's challenge to the legality of the acquisition of Lucky Stores Inc., a supermarket chain, by American Stores Co. which owns another chain, Alpha Beta Stores Inc.  Under federal antitrust law, the Federal Trade Commission and the Justice Department have the authority to ask a federal court to order the divestiture of a merger that has been completed but has been found to be anticompetitive.  But even after the federal agencies have approved a merger, federal antitrust law allows states or other affected parties to sue to challenge the merger on the grounds that it is anticompetitive.  Federal appeals courts, however, disagree whether federal courts have the authority to order the break up of completed mergers in such private antitrust lawsuits.  While the high court tries to resolve the disparate views of the appeals courts, American Stores remains under a temporary order to operate the two supermarket chains as separate businesses.  American Stores' bid for Lucky Stores began as a hostile offer.  But when the tender offer was increased, Lucky's directors approved the merger and, in June 1988, American Stores' $2.5 billion purchase of Lucky Stores was completed.  The FTC reviewed the merger and, in August 1988, approved a settlement between the FTC staff and American Stores.  While the settlement was under review by the FTC, the staff required American Stores to run the Lucky and Alpha Beta chains separately.  Meanwhile, California officials, arguing that the merger would cost the state's consumers $400 million annually in higher prices, sued in federal court in September 1988.  A federal judge in Los Angeles, after a hearing but before a trial was held, reached an initial conclusion that the merger was anti-competitive.  He then issued a preliminary injunction ordering American Stores to continue to run the two chains separately.  A federal appeals court in San Francisco ruled in March that the district court's order had the same effect as requiring divestiture of one chain by American Stores.  The appeals court said federal courts lack the authority to require divestiture in private antitrust lawsuits.  In August, Supreme Court Justice Sandra O'Connor issued a temporary stay, requiring the separate operations to continue until the high court could decide whether to hear the case. (California vs.  American Stores Co.)  Court in Brief  In other action yesterday, the high court:  -- Agreed to decide whether people arrested for drunken driving must be advised of their right to decline to answer questions and to consult a lawyer before police may videotape them to preserve a record of their condition. (Pennsylvania vs.  Muniz)  -- Agreed to decide whether a federal court may fine a lawyer for filing a frivolous lawsuit although the lawyer and client voluntarily dismiss the lawsuit. (Cooper & Gell vs.  Hartmarx Corp.)  Right-to-Die Appeal  The Bush administration, in a friend-of-the-court brief, said that the Constitution gives states broad flexibility to require that medical patients in permanent, vegetative conditions continue to receive artificial feeding and fluids.  The brief, filed by Solicitor General Kenneth Starr, said the family of a Missouri woman in such a vegetative state doesn't have the constitutional right to insist the state cut off artificial feeding.  The brief makes roughly the same argument the government made last week in a brief urging more leeway for states to restrict abortions.  The brief filed yesterday says state regulations need only be "reasonable" to withstand federal court review, an easy standard for states to satisfy.  Moreover, the brief is critical of arguments for a constitutional right to privacy, saying any right for competent individuals to refuse medical treatment should be rooted in tradition and based on the 14th Amendment "due process" protection of "liberty," not on "abstract notions" of privacy, which the Constitution doesn't mention.  Abortion Case  Organizations supporting the constitutional right to abortion filed a friend-of-the-court brief in two Supreme Court cases in behalf of an unprecedented number of groups.  The brief, coordinated by the American Civil Liberties Union and Planned Parenthood Federation of America, was filed in behalf of 274 groups, although many of them were small community religious organizations rather than national in membership.  The brief argued that the 1973 decision recognizing the right to abortion, Roe vs.  Wade, was correct and shouldn't be reconsidered.  After a long day tending the searing, blackened furnaces of the Panzhihua Iron & Steel Co., Li Wankui would like to relax away from the factory.  But in these parts, the factory is everywhere.  It is employer, political czar and dance-committee chairman.  Inside the sprawling compounds that house 55,000 workers and their families, the factory operates the schools, restaurants, hospital and activities center.  The factory sells Mr. Li his food and furniture and publishes his newspaper.  It even restricts him and his wife to one child.  Sitting at home with his family around the dining table, Mr. Li turns on the evening news.  "This is the Panzhihua Factory broadcasting station," a perky anchorwoman says.  "And here's what happened today at our factory."  Panzhihua is the ultimate company town.  Nestled in the remote mountains of southern Sichuan province about 1,200 miles southwest of Beijing, it is virtually cut off from the rest of China.  With few businesses nearby, it's up to factory leaders to build high-rise housing and organize sports meets.  They truck in fresh fish from the east coast and import television sets from Japan.  "A Chinese factory director could be a mayor in the U.S.," says Mr. Li.  "But I don't think an American mayor could handle a Chinese factory."  Despite a decade-long attempt to revamp the socialist economy, China's mega-welfare state is alive and well.  Health care is free, housing costs just pennies and food is heavily subsidized.  At Panzhihua, as in other big state-run factories, workers still can count on a cradle-to-grave safety net.  Factory officials estimate that more than 10% of the work force here is redundant, but layoffs aren't allowed.  Even factory workers' children are guaranteed jobs.  The industrial monoliths are so deeply involved in the welfare system that China's leaders may never be able to modernize them, despite their glaring economic inefficiency.  Though the Panzhihua factory itself is profitable, many such enterprises aren't.  Subsidies for money-losing enterprises totaled $18 billion last year, or about one-third the total state revenue.  Life in the Panzhihua factory beats a regular rhythm, and fully absorbs workers such as Mr. Li.  A muscular 38-year-old, he rises each morning at 6 a.m. to prepare for his shift. (He is entitled to one day off after each seven days of work.)  Throwing on sweat pants and a T-shirt, he pops downstairs to a food shop, one of dozens run by the factory in Panzhihua's residential area.  Mr. Li, whose pay is the equivalent of about $80 a month, buys steamed buns and rice porridge for his family.  Breakfast for three costs a quarter.  After eating, he heads to the factory.  Panzhihua provides free bus service, but he prefers the 20-minute walk.  At the gate of the factory, a huge sign greets Mr. Li and his co-workers: "Happily, happily come to work]"  Donning denims and a hard hat, he heads to the steel-making furnace.  Since the temperature next to it can reach 540 degrees Fahrenheit, Panzhihua Iron & Steel provides workers as many free orange-flavored soft drinks as they want.  The factory produces the drinks in-house.  At lunchtime, Mr. Li walks to one of the 59 cafeterias the factory operates.  It's a chaotic scene.  Scraps of meat and bones litter the bare concrete floor.  A slop-bucket at the doorway is filled with a liquid turned blood-red from Sichuan peppers and hot sauce.  The place doesn't look like much, but the food is good, and cheap.  For about 30 cents, Mr. Li buys a bowl of pork, vegetables and rice.  At the end of Mr. Li's workday, as a new shift prepares to take over, the factory's propaganda officials go to work.  For half an hour they relate to groups of workers the latest news and views from the Communist Party.  They read speeches from top leaders and slam U.S. sanctions on China imposed after the June 4 massacre of pro-democracy protesters in Beijing.  "We want to make sure that workers have a correct opinion about events," says Yuan Changyong, the local Party chief.  The propagandists also do their part in the national effort to limit births.  Teams of officials track the contraceptive methods their workers employ and even chart menstrual cycles of female employees.  They work by persuasion and coercion, alternating doses of propaganda with threats of financial penalties for "unplanned" second births.  Zhang Shanyun, one of Mr. Li's bosses, knows the system well.  Like many married workers, Mr. Zhang lives alone at the factory.  His wife remains in the countryside, tending the farm land they possess.  Whenever Mr. Zhang wants to return to his farm, he must fill out a form detailing what kind of birth-control device he and his wife will use.  The document must be certified by factory officials and shown to leaders in his wife's village.  "No document, no visit," smiles Li Jihong, who heads birth-control efforts at the factory.  Mr. Li, however, is able to live with his wife full-time.  When he returns home, he ties on an apron and begins to prepare dinner for his family.  Most of the food comes to him via the factory, which buys 80 million tons of produce a year.  The factory sells to workers at cost, which means prices are about 50% below what the handful of independent local merchants charge.  For big occasions, the factory brings in special treats.  Earlier this year, officials shipped in fresh crabs from Guangdong province.  It turned out that few workers here in the hills of Sichuan had ever seen them, so the factory TV station ran a broadcast on the correct way to eat Guangdong crabs.  The Li family home is a simple, two-room apartment with bare concrete floors and whitewashed walls.  The basic furniture is provided by the factory, for five cents a month.  Most workers get a bed, desk and bureau.  Engineers also get a bookcase.  Mr. Li's wife, Xia Huaqiong, also works at the factory, tending the water meters during the graveyard shift.  There are few prospects for upward mobility, and Mr. Li's daughter, seven-year-old Li Shu, is certain to toil at the factory too someday, as are more than 10,000 of the workers' children.  Li Shu is in the second grade at the Xiangyang Village Elementary School for Workers' Children, one of 31 schools subsidized by the factory at a cost of more than half a million dollars a year.  Her tuition is about $1 a semester.  Mr. Li says he is content living in this one-company town.  But he concedes that the pressures of the all-powerful factory sometimes are tough to bear.  He could do with more excitement, he says.  Most evenings after the news, he leaves his wife in front of the TV set and wanders restlessly around his quiet neighborhood.  He pauses frequently to greet familiar faces: co-workers from the factory.  Inevitably, he is drawn to the Cultural Center, a drab, five-story structure with meeting rooms, stores, coffee shops, a large swimming pool and a dance hall.  The center, built and run by Panzhihua Iron & Steel, is the beginning and end of social life in this town.  Mr. Li walks upstairs to the center's second-floor library, a poorly lit room where he spends many hours leafing through a thin selection of state-controlled periodicals.  He pulls out a newspaper: The Panzhihua Iron & Steel Co. Daily.  "It's a good read," Mr. Li says.  "Quite informative."  Today's lead story: "Manager Zhao Inspects Operation of No. 4 Furnace."  Not surprisingly in this remote outpost, many of the single factory workers here fall in love with each other.  "We have a very small social circle," says Ma Yongjian, the company secretary general.  "A lot of the young workers end up getting married."  To facilitate such productive arrangements, the factory organizes dances each night, often outdoors on a concrete promenade along the banks of the Jinshajiang River.  On this evening, the dancers seem reluctant, as a sour eight-piece band plods through a series of Chinese pop songs.  But things come to life when a slender woman in a slinky black dress takes the microphone.  The band starts in, and she begins to sing "Happy birthday to you," even though it isn't anyone's birthday.  Immediately, hundreds of couples leap to their feet and rush onto the floor, dancing their well-rehearsed three-step, cheek-to-cheek.  Happy Birthday, apparently a big hit in Panzhihua, lasts for 10 glorious minutes.  As the band plays, and with romance in the air, Mr. Li recalls how he came to Panzhihua.  The factory, one of Chairman Mao's oddest follies, dates to 1965.  Mao was sure that the U.S., or perhaps the Soviet Union, was planning to attack China's coast, so he decided to set up vital industries deep in the remote interior.  Like tens of thousands of others, Mr. Li was ordered to go to Panzhihua, in 1971.  "I lived in a straw-and-mud house at the time," he says.  "But I was happy to be here, to carry on the fight against the imperialists and the revisionists."  Today the perceived threat has passed, but the factory is thriving.  What keeps Mr. Li in Panzhihua?  Partly the system.  While workers can't easily be fired, they also can't easily quit to find jobs elsewhere.  The Li family could apply for permission to do so, but hasn't tried.  "I expect I'll be in Panzhihua for the rest of my life," Mr. Li says.  "The No. 1 high school is pretty good, and I have to think of my daughter's future."  Others have fled the remote factory.  Beginning in 1979, it offered its original settlers a chance to leave.  Many had been forced to come, often leaving their families and possessions behind.  When the opportunity finally arose, thousands of workers departed, including virtually all of the factory's college graduates and senior engineers.  Ma Zhijie, deputy general manager of the factory's trading department, wants his eight-year-old son to have broader horizons, and believes education is the best ticket out of Panzhihua.  He is pushing his child to excel in school and teaches him English at home.  "I dream that my son will attend college and find a good job somewhere else," Mr. Ma says.  Panzhihua's isolation is immediately apparent.  The area was off limits to foreign visitors and reporters until 1987, and remains effectively sealed off from contact with the outside.  What the factory's workers know of the world comes filtered through the propaganda machine of official newspapers and television, as well as political study sessions.  Workers have a very sketchy knowledge, for example, about the pro-democracy movement, and its bloody suppression, in Beijing this spring.  At one point, Mr. Li repeats the theme of a recent political study class and harangues his American visitor about U.S. sanctions against China.  "The Chinese and American people have great warmth for each other," Mr. Li says, "but I must tell you frankly that I disagree with President Bush's policy toward China."  His visitor explains that, to many in the U.S., the sanctions were considered too moderate.  Many of these Americans were incensed by the killings in Beijing and denounced the Chinese government.  "Well, I certainly didn't know any of that," Mr. Li says, and abruptly closes the conversation.  As Mr. Li begins his walk back home, he displays a slight limp, the result of a back injury.  Last year, the factory sent him to northeast China to recuperate for six months, all expenses paid.  The factory provides free medical care to all workers and their families.  It runs a modern, 500-bed hospital and eight clinics, supported by $2.5 million a year in subsidies.  When Mr. Li dies, Panzhihua Iron & Steel will pay for his cremation.  And the next generation will carry on.  At the hospital, Zhong Desheng, the director, dons a doctor's smock and leads a visitor into the maternity ward.  A factory worker who has just given birth to a baby girl lies on a bed, looking bewildered.  Her baby has been snatched up by the nurses and placed alongside nine others, each tied up in a tight cotton bundle.  Mr. Zhong motions to the wriggling bundles.  "These," he says, "are the future workers of Panzhihua Iron & Steel."  Four of Britain's biggest banks said they plan to sell jointly owned Yorkshire Bank Group in an auction that could raise between #850 million ($1.33 billion) and #1 billion ($1.57 billion).  National Westminster Bank PLC, Yorkshire Bank's biggest holder with a 40% stake, said it, Barclays PLC, Lloyds Bank PLC and Royal Bank of Scotland Group PLC decided to sell the 250-branch U.K. bank after receiving "a number of approaches" from potential purchasers.  They declined to identify possible bidders.  At a news conference here yesterday, NatWest officials said they expect potential interest from banks throughout continental Europe, Australia and the U.S.  Yorkshire Bank, which had pretax profit of #100.4 million and #3.19 billion in assets last year, has Britain's ninth-largest branch network.  It is viewed by market analysts as a potential target for banks aiming to boost their U.K. presence prior to the 1992 development of a single market in financial services in the European Community.  Analysts have said the bank could fetch a price of between 8.5 and 10 times pretax profit -- or between #850 million and #1 billion.  Bill Barron, a NatWest general manager, said the banks decided to push ahead with the sale despite yesterday's sharp stock-market fall in London because the decision was strategic and independent of market valuations.  The consortium-ownership arrangement, which dates from a financial reconstruction of Yorkshire Bank in 1911, is outmoded for the increasingly competitive U.K. market, analysts say.  Barclays owns 32%, Lloyds owns 20% and Royal Bank of Scotland owns 8% of Yorkshire Bank.  The Federal Reserve gave comfort to the financial markets yesterday by allowing a key interest rate to drift downward.  In addition, Fed Chairman Alan Greenspan attempted to calm the markets by denying reports he was publicly feuding with the Treasury.  The Fed allowed the key federal funds interest rate to dip to about 8 5/8% from its levels of just below 9% last week.  That was a sign to financial markets that, at least for now, the Fed was easing its grip on credit.  Because the markets remained relatively calm, however, the Fed didn't have to inject massive amounts of money into the banking system, as it did in October 1987.  The fed funds rate is the rate banks charge on loans to each other.  The Federal Reserve can heavily influence that rate by buying and selling securities to financial institutions.  "I view this morning's action as hand holding for the financial markets," said Steven Wood, an economist with Bank of America.  He said the Fed showed it was willing to provide more money to the financial system, but it wasn't clear "how much or for how long."  Mr. Greenspan appeared in public briefly yesterday morning to deliver a speech to the American Bankers Association convention here.  In a brief comment before the speech, he said he was "surprised" that some people interpreted his recent comments in Moscow "as endeavoring to say something about current monetary or foreign exchange policies."  While visiting Moscow last week, the Fed chairman had warned that "attempts to maintain unrealistic exchange rates" may be destabilizing -- a comment some interpreted as criticism of the Treasury's efforts to push down the dollar.  "I hope my colleagues at the Gosbank {the Soviet central bank} don't misinterpret anything I said today," the Fed chairman joked before beginning the prepared text of his speech.  Mr. Greenspan also tried to reassure the markets by saying that "we at the Federal Reserve are watching the financial markets rather closely."  He said the Fed was coordinating its activities with foreign officials, and that "coordination exists at a detailed level here in the U.S. among the Federal Reserve, the SEC, the CFTC and the Treasury."  The Fed's move to ease credit wasn't an aggressive one, but it did signal a clear change of policy from before the stock market's swoon.  Government officials say it's unclear, however, where the bellwether fed funds rate, which influences other interest rates, will come to rest.  If the financial markets continue to show nervousness, the Fed may keep it close to 8 5/8%.  If problems quickly disappear, the Fed may nudge the rate up to 8 3/4.  Bush administration officials were pleased with the Fed's action, and shared Mr. Greenspan's view that there was close coordination among the various government agencies.  On Sunday, for instance, Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady held a lengthy meeting with Mr. Greenspan and SEC Chairman Richard Breeden to evaluate information on Friday's market plunge.  At that time, they concluded that the drop was concentrated among takeover stocks, and that there were no fundamental reasons it should turn into a rout Monday morning.  The administration also benefited from the expertise of Treasury Undersecretary Robert Glauber and Assistant Secretary David Mullins, two former Harvard professors who had headed up the Brady Commission's effort to investigate the 1987 crash.  The two men studied the order imbalances in the stock markets and the level of stock index futures to determine what might happen Monday morning.  That led administration officials to predict, accurately, that on Monday the market would have to drop 60 to 100 points before any recovery could begin.  Some analysts have said disagreements between the Treasury and the Fed added to an environment that allowed Friday's steep market decline to occur.  For weeks prior to the market's drop, the Treasury had been urging the Fed to bring down short-term interest rates, and the Fed had been resisting.  Also, Fed Vice Chairman Manuel Johnson and Wayne Angell, another member of the reserve board, had objected, in a vote made public Oct. 6, to the Treasury's efforts to push down the dollar by selling currency in foreign exchange markets.  Mr. Greenspan was also known to be privately unenthusiastic about the Treasury's orders for massive dollar sales.  His comments in Moscow last week were interpreted by some as a subtle attempt to make those concerns public.  Separately, David Ruder, who left the chairmanship of the Securities and Exchange Commission two weeks ago, says investors should view market volatility as a fact of modern market life.  "I do not regard the amount of the decline on Friday as unexpected or unlikely," he said in a telephone interview.  "With the market being up to 2,700 or 2,800 and the existence of derivative products . . . one can expect volatility of the magnitude we had."  But he asked that institutional investors take a socially responsible role in supporting the market.  "Institutional investors bear a responsibility to not only not sell but to step up and buy without waiting for the market to bottom," Mr. Ruder said.  Mr. Ruder, now a professor at the Northwestern University School of Law in Chicago, also expressed concern about two pauses in the Chicago Mercantile Exchange futures pits after prices had fallen and circuit breakers kicked in.  Noting that the Dow Jones industrials continued to fall as the futures were spared further carnage, Mr. Ruder said, "I think that's something that needs to be looked at very carefully."  ---  Kevin G. Salwen contributed to this article.  Congressman Lee Hamilton, an Indiana Democrat who chairs the the Joint Economic Committee, plans hearings next week on his bill to subject the Fed to greater political control.  The Fed already is experiencing political pressure to supply lower interest rates and easy money.  Former Senator William Proxmire has called the Hamilton bill the most dangerous economic legislation now before Congress, because it would give U.S. economic policy a further inflationary bias.  It isn't given much chance of passing, but its mere existence is cause for anxiety.  The U.S. and the world are not in need of new doubts about the future soundness of the dollar.  Attempts in late September to drive the dollar down through central bank interventions were ill-timed, particularly since we now know that the dollar was then in the process of taking another dive relative to oil and other producer goods.  The sharp rise in the September Producer-Price Index announced Friday fueled the stock market debacle.  The Hamilton bill would put the Treasury Secretary on the Fed's board and Open Market Committee, which charts monetary policy.  More worrisome, Congress would have a stronger supervisory role, with the Fed audited by the General Accounting Office, which Congress runs.  Those sound like innocuous changes, but they're not.  Both the Treasury and Congress traditionally have pushed for easy money, the Treasury to reduce its debt management problems and Congress to satisfy powerful producer constituencies who want a weak dollar for short-term competitive gains in world markets.  Congressional pressures on the Fed similar to those that produced the savings and loan mess are an awful thought.  Even now, the Fed cannot simply thumb its nose at the President and Congress.  But it can resist.  Paul Volcker found subtle ways to take his case to the people, with good results.  Easy money advocates, however, are adept at spreading economic myths.  There is the constant insistence that the Fed could lower interest rates were it not so obstinate.  The Fed indeed can lower short-term interest rates by pumping reserves into the banks, but it can't do much about them from there on.  If the reserves generate inflation, which is what the Fed fears most right now, interest rates will go up as lenders demand a premium.  Enough inflation can ultimately even wipe out the bond market, as it did in Britain in the 1970s, thereby crippling the economy.  The other myth is that inflation generates economic growth.  It may do that temporarily but it also sows the seeds for stagnation.  These two myths have caused the republic untold damage.  The U.S. economy took on an inflationary bias when the Fed was forced to finance an incredible spending spree by Lyndon Johnson.  Richard Nixon exacerbated the problem when, in response to pressures from Congress, he applied price and wage controls in August 1971, thereby discouraging production.  Jimmy Carter ultimately hired Mr. Volcker to kill inflation, which was reaching dangerous levels.  He did, too late to save Mr. Carter from forced retirement.  But all that was a long time ago and politicians have a way of forgetting such things.  The 1970s inflation yielded great benefits to some producer interests, including Arab sheiks, at the expense of the American middle class.  It was a classic example of how inflation transfers income to the wealthy from the middle class.  That explains why there are always powerful political interests pushing for a soft currency.  In some countries, Argentina for example, those interests have overwhelmed the government and what remains of a middle class.  The claim that inflation generates economic growth is seductive.  In fact it does the opposite.  As the charts show, the 1975-80 inflation destroyed both productivity and economic growth (see accompanying charts -- WSJ Oct. 17, 1989).  It was only after Mr. Volcker killed inflation, at the cost of a sharp but brief recession, that growth and productivity started rising once more.  Producers were forced by the discipline of sound money to slash away organizational fat and acquire more efficient equipment.  After having performed that admirable feat, however, they were back in 1985 demanding a dollar devaluation that would make it still easier for them to compete in international markets.  They got the devaluation and, as is usually the case, began picking up fat again.  So now they want another one.  Many corporate executives don't understand or don't want to understand that their own companies eventually become victims of such policies.  Inflation destroys capital investment.  Corporate depreciation reserves lose value relative to equipment replacement costs.  Investors are reluctant to invest long term.  Corporations, in effect, decapitalize themselves.  That was reflected in the stagnant stock market of the 1970s.  Strikes increase as workers demand raises to cope with rising prices, make up for what they already have lost and hedge against what they will lose in the months ahead.  Productivity falls, and weaker production further fans inflation.  The middle class gets poorer, and the poor feel greater pain than ever.  All of which explains why stock and foreign exchange markets get jittery when the Fed comes under political pressure.  Particularly so when it comes at a time when the Fed has done well.  When it tightened up last spring, the price indexes fell and the economy began to pick up speed again, which is of course exactly counter to the "inflation-fuels-growth" theory.  But not all the news is bad.  Rep. Stephen Neal (D., N.C.) wants Congress to instruct the Fed to do one thing: prevent inflation.  Nothing could be more to the point.  LAC Minerals Ltd. said it agreed to buy 65% of Denver-based Bond International Gold Inc. for $10 a share, or $373.8 million.  The stake in the gold-mining company is held by companies controlled by Australian financier Alan Bond, who has been selling assets to reduce debt.  LAC, a gold-mining company, said the transaction is to close Nov. 21, subject to regulatory approval and other customary conditions.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Bond International closed unchanged at $8.75.  The purchase helps LAC make up for a court decision earlier this year in which it lost a long legal battle with Toronto-based Corona Corp. for control of Canada's richest gold mine.  The Bond International stake would roughly double LAC's gold production and substantially reduce its average cost of producing gold.  Bond International is expected to produce about 600,000 ounces of gold in the fiscal year ending June 30, of which roughly two-thirds would be attributable to LAC from the date the acquisition is completed.  LAC itself is expected to produce about 400,000 ounces this year.  Last year, Bond International spent an average $204 to produce an ounce of gold at mines in North and South America and in Australia, significantly lower than LAC's own average cost of $260 an ounce.  Analysts say the real jewel in the Bond International crown is its 83% stake in Chile's El Indio mine, which they say had production costs of below $100 an ounce.  A LAC spokesman said the company has "enough cash" to pay for the Bond International stake without borrowing.  The spokesman said LAC has no intentions "right now" to further increase its stake in Bond International.  Dallas investor Harold Simmons says he hasn't decided to sell his Lockheed Corp. shares, after all.  In a terse news release responding to an article yesterday in The Wall Street Journal, which credited a front-page interview story in the Sunday Los Angeles Daily News, Valhi Inc. said the quotes in the articles "do not accurately reflect Valhi's and Mr. Simmons's intentions" concerning their interests in Lockheed.  Through Valhi and its affiliates, Mr. Simmons holds a 10.43% stake in the aerospace and electronics concern, and his plans concerning Lockheed have been the subject of much speculation among securities analysts.  In the Daily News story, Mr. Simmons was quoted as saying, among other things: "Actually, I wish I were out of Lockheed.  The defense industry seems to be getting more uncertain all the time.  So I'm a seller.  Put it in big black letters and underline it."  Yesterday's statement by Valhi said the quotes "take out of context and paraphrase statements made by Mr. Simmons in jest at the conclusion of a lengthy interview."  The true position is that Valhi and its affiliates, as they have said in public filings, "may increase, decrease or retain their Lockheed holdings" depending on a number of conditions.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Lockheed shares closed yesterday at $46.25 a share, off $1.75.  Douglas R. Dowie, Daily News managing editor for news, said "the quotes in the Daily News were in context and were not in jest."  The report of the interview, which was recorded, was "absolutely correct," he added.  A spokesman for Mr. Simmons declined to elaborate on the Valhi statement, and said Mr. Simmons wouldn't be available to answer questions about his remarks to the Daily News.  Tokyo share prices dropped sharply in early Monday morning trading following Wall Street's plunge on Friday.  After the initial slide, the market appeared to be turning around but by early afternoon was headed lower.  At 1:30 p.m. Tokyo time, the Nikkei index of 225 selected stocks was off 1.4%, or 482.39 points, to 34633.63.  In the first 20 minutes of trading in the morning, the Nikkei index had fallen 611.62 points or 1.7%, as nervous investors sold large capital issues.  Traders remained guarded.  Yoshiro Inoue, an analyst at Nomura Securities Co., described the steep decline in the beginning as "a New York shock."  He predicted that "there would be no steep recovery but at the same time there would be no further decline."  Said a Japanese equities trader at Jardine Flemings Securities Ltd., in Tokyo: "There is still a lot of weakness and nervousness in the market."  Last Friday, the Dow Jones Industrial Average plunged 190.58 points to close at 2569.26, its worst loss in points since the October 1987 crash.  The announcement that a group of takeover bidders for UAL Corp. had failed to raise enough money to acquire the U.S. airline was one of the main factors that triggered the sell-off, analysts said.  World stock markets, bracing over the weekend for a sharp fall in share prices Monday, were watching Tokyo closely for signals.  How far share prices fall in other markets will depend to a great extent on how the Tokyo market reacts, analysts and investors said.  "I'm hoping Japan holds tight," said Allen Wheat, head of trading at Bankers Trust Co. in London, before the Tokyo opening.  "But if Japan is wobbly, London will probably take a beating."  Prior to the Tokyo opening, few were expecting panic to set in, mainly because today's market conditions are different from those that led to the world-wide downward spiral in October 1987.  The French market could be harder hit than the London market, European analysts said, because recent unmaterialized takeover speculation in Paris has left some blue-chip stocks poised for markdowns.  "Paris has had an awful lot of froth in the past two weeks and so is probably going to be hit a bit worse than London," said David Band, chief executive officer of Barclays Bank PLC's Barclays de Zoete Wedd investment banking unit.  The Tokyo market's opening behavior seemed to be in line with predictions that a blood bath could be avoided.  Analysts in Tokyo had said over the weekend that a drop is unavoidable, but they predicted that Japan's traditionally cautious institutional investors will keep things from spinning out of control.  "The Tokyo market can't help but go down," said Hiroaki Hanao, deputy general manager of the equity department at Daiwa Securities Co.  "But it won't be such a big crash."  The Ministry of Finance and the Bank of Japan appear to be eager to put out the fire before it spreads.  Japanese newspapers reported Saturday that the Ministry of Finance and the Bank of Japan view the plunge on Wall Street as a result of U.S. domestic concerns about financing acquisitions, not as a sign of weak economic fundamentals.  There were also rumors that the Japanese financial authorities warned large brokerage firms and institutional investors over the weekend against taking any hasty actions Monday.  How effective such guidance might be remains to be seen.  One analyst said that with all eyes on the Japanese market it will be difficult this time for the Finance Ministry to try anything that could be seen as artificially propping up the market.  As Japanese investors prepare for some rough waters this week, they will be paying close attention to the foreign exchange markets.  "Tokyo is most worried about the currency," said Daiwa Securities' Mr. Hanao.  If the yen rebounds against the dollar, he said, there is less chance of an additional increase in interest rates, which could help stabilize Tokyo share prices.  Last Wednesday, the Bank of Japan raised the discount rate 0.5 percentage point to 3.75% to stem the dollar's rise.  Of ficials said they were concerned that a weaker yen will contribute to greater inflation in Japan.  In New York trading on Friday the dollar dropped 1.4% to close at 142.10 yen.  Dealers are expecting the dollar to be skittish, as the market waits for U.S. authorities to indicate their monetary policy plans.  The dollar opened in Tokyo at 139.95, down 4.05 from last Friday's Tokyo finish.  Despite currency market concerns, analysts stressed that Tokyo market conditions today aren't what they were in 1987.  Then, many market watchers in the U.S. worried that the highly speculative Tokyo market would be the one to send world markets reeling.  Now, many look to Tokyo as a potential stabilizing factor because of its resilience and quick recovery following Black Monday.  Analysts say one point in Tokyo's favor this time is the fact that for the past several weeks the market has been in relatively low gear, driven by fundamental concerns about earnings and interest rates rather than wild speculation.  On Friday, the Nikkei index rose 320.97 to close at 35116.02.  Trading volume has also fallen off in recent weeks.  "A lot of the speculative fat has been trimmed," said one analyst.  Some analysts predict that Japanese institutions may look at this as a good time to hunt for bargains.  Many Japanese funds, which closed their books at the end of September, now have huge cash positions.  "There's still lots of idle money sitting around here," said Hiroshi Ohira, chief analyst at New Japan Securities Co., citing a frequently stated reason for Tokyo's strength.  Said another foreign stock analyst: "All the Japanese brokers will try to look for the positive aspects of this."  Whatever happens in Tokyo, the powerful ripple effects are sure to be felt first in other Asian markets.  A severe drop in Japanese stock prices or a steep fall in the dollar would exacerbate price declines in smaller markets such as Hong Kong, money managers say.  In Hong Kong, brokers and fund managers expect the widely watched Hang Seng index, which closed Friday at 2782.30, to shed at least 100 points, or 5%.  Some think a sharper decline is possible.  The Hang Seng index opened at 2736, down 46.3 points, or 1.7%.  Investors have already been treating the market with some caution.  In late May and early June, when political turmoil overwhelmed China, the Hang Seng index plummeted 37% to 2093. (Hong Kong reverts to China in 1997.) Since then, international fund managers decreased their exposure to the market and only recently have begun to tiptoe back in.  "It's not like the crash in October 1987, when there was lots of optimism," said Phillip Niem, research director in Hong Kong for British-based Hoare Govette Asia Ltd.  "This time around there's lots of caution.  People are already scared.  Institutions' weighting in Hong Kong are low now anyway."  After a 108-point decline in the Dow Jones industrials on Friday, Oct. 16, 1987, the Hang Seng index plunged 420.81 points, or 11.3%, the following Monday.  Later that day Black Monday unfolded in New York, and officials closed the Hong Kong exchange for four days, a move that shook investor confidence in the market.  This time around, government and market officials said, the territory's revamped equity market will remain open regardless of what happens in New York today.  London's stock market, already wheezing under stresses of its own, is also casting a nervous eye toward Tokyo and bracing for a shock.  Many London traders planned an allnight vigil on developments in the Tokyo market.  "A lot of our guys will be sitting up all night at home, and a couple of our guys will be in the office overnight," said Mr. Wheat of Bankers Trust.  Authorities, including the Bank of England and the Securities Association, are gearing up in case a crisis wallops the London market.  The bank was in touch with other major central banks over the weekend and was preparing to make capital available to dealers if needed, as it did in the 1987 crash, according to people familiar with the bank's strategy.  However, in an unusual public statement, the bank sought to play down any note of crisis.  Said a spokesman: "There's no reason for such an exaggerated fall in London, where share values aren't underpinned in the same degree as New York by highly leveraged situations."  The Securities Association, which regulates London's stock markets, said that if prices plunge today all dealers will be ordered to report their capital and market positions daily.  "We're monitoring things very closely," a spokeswoman said.  Even before Friday's New York nosedive, the London market had been facing heavy uncertainty because of worries over the British economy.  After the one-point rise Oct. 5 to 15%, Britain's base interest rate stands at its highest level in eight years.  Many economists have been predicting that the country's economic growth will be little more than 1% in 1990.  Responding to the developments, the Financial Times 100-share index, which had been slightly higher most of the day, closed at 2233.9, down 3.9 points from Thursday.  The impending stock market troubles could pose a dilemma for already embattled Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel Lawson.  A market plunge in Britain could bring pressure for him to lower interest rates.  But a rate cut could weaken the recently depressed pound, which late Friday staged a sharp rally against the dollar after news of the New York market sell-off.  One person who firmly believes London is headed for trouble no matter what happens elsewhere is Peter Thompson.  This widely followed stock market forecaster achieved fame by predicting, in July 1987, the October crash of that year.  Mr. Thompson, a consultant to Barclay de Zoete Wedd Securities Ltd., jolted the London market last Monday by predicting that another bear market is at hand.  "London will open lower {today} whether or not Tokyo opens lower," Mr. Thompson said in an interview.  "Market makers will mark down prices so bears can't go short to them at too advantageous a price."  By going short, a market pessimist sells borrowed shares in the hope of buying them back later at a profit.  Any big drop in London prices will further cool the already jaded British appetite for leveraged buy-outs, analysts said.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Oct 12 Oct 11 Year  U.S. ....................... 326.5 328.1 + 27.5  @ Britain .................... 668.4 662.8 + 22.4  @ Canada ..................... 439.0 438.4 + 19.6  @ Japan ...................... 1513.8 1534.5 + 6.6  @ France ..................... 552.4 553.0 + 24.8  @ Germany .................... 257.1 257.6 + 23.6  @ Hong Kong .................. 2108.8 2127.7 + 3.9  @ Switzerland ................ 228.5 228.5 + 32.1  @ Australia .................. 345.6 349.6 + 19.1  @ World index ................ 533.4 535.8 + 7.9  John W. Day, president of Allied-Signal Automotive and executive vice president of Allied-Signal Inc., has been named to the board of this bank holding company.  Mr. Day, 56 years old, succeeds J. Mason Reynolds, who retired.  Dallas investor Harold Simmons, who has been gobbling up Lockheed Corp. shares and only two months ago told this newspaper that he was in the stock for the long term, now insists he wants to sell.  In an interview published yesterday with the Los Angeles Daily News, Mr. Simmons said: "Lockheed is actually just a decoy.  I have several decoys out there because there's really something else that I want to slip up on.  You've got to put out misinformation if you really want to buy something for a fair price."  Mr. Simmons, who holds 6.6 million shares, or a 10.43% stake, in Lockheed, added that he isn't at all interested in taking over the Calabasas, Calif., aerospace concern.  "Not now and not ever," he told the newspaper.  "Actually, I wish I were out of Lockheed.  The defense industry seems to be getting more uncertain all the time.  So I'm a seller.  Put it in big black letters and underline it."  Lockheed's share price on the New York Stock Exchange has been propped up in recent weeks, despite disappointing earnings, because of Mr. Simmons's interest in the company.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Lockheed slipped $1 in Friday's market slump to close at $48 a share.  Michael Lamb, who closely tracks Mr. Simmons's holdings for a Kansas City, Mo., firm called Wealth Monitors, said he is skeptical about the stated intention to sell off Lockheed shares.  He added that while one Simmons holding company, Valhi Inc., has sold 272,000 Lockheed shares in recent months, his other companies have bought up 880,000.  "Does that sound like a seller to you?"  Mr. Lamb said yesterday.  "It just doesn't make any sense."  Mr. Simmons couldn't be reached to elaborate, and Lockheed officials couldn't be reached to comment on the Daily News article.  But Mr. Lamb said it's Mr. Simmons's style to try and leave Wall Street befuddled.  He said Mr. Simmons knows the arbitrage community "can be a detriment by driving the share price up."  Mr. Lamb said if the arbitrageurs get confused, maybe they'll move out of the stock and leave more for Mr. Simmons to grab.  Vitro S.A. said it signed a definitive agreement to acquire Anchor Glass Container Corp. for $21.25 a share, or $265 million, in the largest takeover of an American company by a Mexican concern.  Anchor was relatively unaffected by Friday's market plunge, perhaps because Vitro was bidding for the company.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Anchor closed at $18.375, down $1.375.  Yesterday's announcement of the accord culminated a two-month long battle for the Tampa, Fla., maker of bottles and other glass containers.  Anchor had been fighting Vitro's earlier $20-a-share tender offer and agreed to the sweetened bid after a special committee of Anchor's board put the company on the block.  Anchor said previously that it held talks with other parties, but no other bids emerged.  Vitro, which already owns 1,430,000 Anchor shares, agreed to buy the remaining 12,470,000 shares outstanding through THR Corp., an indirect subsidiary of Vitro.  The Monterrey, Mexico, conglomerate also confirmed a previous announcement that it would acquire closely held Latchford Glass Co. of Huntington Park, Calif., in a separate transaction expected to close at the same time as the completion of the Anchor takeover.  The purchase price of the Latchford transaction wasn't disclosed.  Vitro said Security Pacific National Bank committed $139 million to finance the purchase of Anchor and an affiliate of Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. committed $155 million in a bridge loan to finance the Anchor and Latchford acquisitions.  Ernesto Martens R.,Vitro's chief executive officer, said the company intends to keep Anchor based in Tampa and that the unit would be run independently by U.S. managers.  Mr. Martens called the takeover a "unique strategic opportunity" for Vitro to become "a world player" in the glass-container industry.  Among other things, Vitro makes glass containers, flat glass and glass-making machinery.  From the professional money manager to the big overseas currency player to the little guy with his IRA in a mutual fund, the bulletin from Wall Street came as a shock -- followed swiftly by a sickening recollection of the pattern played out in the '87 crash: a 100-point-plus plunge on a Friday, a weekend of worrying in between, and then disaster on Monday.  Who could be blamed for wondering if it is all happening again, in another nervous October?  "It's scaring the hell out of me," says Tom Loughlin, a systems analyst and small investor in Boston.  Friday's events demonstrate that despite all the post-1987 studies and reforms, the stock market can still plunge with dizzying steepness.  The 190.58-point drop was the second-largest in magnitude ever, and the 12th worst on a percentage basis.  But what was most terrifying was its speed: The market dropped 154 points in only 65 minutes, pausing only as the close neared.  Moreover, this plunge came in a time of relatively benign economic conditions, raising the question of how the markets might react when a serious economic upset, such as a recession, is on the horizon.  But despite its hair-trigger edginess, whether the market today will in fact mirror 1987 with a further dive is a far different matter.  There are many reasons to think that what appeared Friday is another species of bear, and a less vicious one.  The reasons include the obvious differences in the market between this fall and 1987: Interest rates haven't been rising this time, as they were in 1987; the dollar, though hit Friday, hasn't been eroding dangerously; the economy isn't overheating; and, above all, stocks are far from being as wildly overpriced: They are selling at only about 13 times per-share earnings, compared with about 20 two years ago.  And this time, the regulators are moving with more dispatch.  The Federal Reserve has already indicated that it will provide the credit needed to see that there isn't a liquidity squeeze today.  Many traders think the Fed will quickly lower interest rates, a move that would be a plus for stocks.  -- The levels of selling of U.S and foreign stocks in Asian and European markets, which open well before New York's.  In early trading in Tokyo Monday, share prices fell 1.7%.  After the initial slide, the market appeared to be turning around but by early afternoon was headed lower.  -- Whether the buy-out of United Airlines parent UAL Corp., whose financing failure triggered Friday's free fall, can be put back together.  Late yesterday, it wasn't clear the buyers could make a new bid by today.  The lower UAL opens, the more traders who've bought with borrowed money will have to sell UAL and other takeover stocks to meet margin calls.  -- The levels of early stock-index futures trading in Chicago.  That market shut down early on Friday, leaving millions of dollars of sell orders unexecuted.  Heavy index-futures selling often pulls the stock market down.  -- The pressures on mutual-fund companies to sell stock in order to meet demands from customers for redemptions.  On Black Monday, some funds sold hundreds of millions of dollars in stocks after being inundated with redemptions.  But late yesterday, the biggest fund group, Fidelity Investments, said this weekend's redemptions were running at under one-third the level before Oct. 19, 1987.  -- Any action by the Federal Reserve.  Any move to lower interest rates, for example, would be a positive for stocks, by making fixed-income investments less competitive with them.  Much as in the 1987 crash, the spark that lit the fuse on Friday was a news announcement that, at first blush, seemed to have little bearing on the market as a whole.  When the UAL buy-out group said it couldn't get bank financing for its $6.79 billion deal, the announcement sent takeover-stock traders scrambling to sell United, other airline stocks and then other real or rumored takeover stocks.  The Standard & Poor's 500-stock index futures took only 15 minutes from the UAL announcement, at 2:54 p.m., to hit their first "circuit breaker," a 30-minute trading halt that kicks in when the futures drop the equivalent of 100 points on the Dow.  When the futures reopened at 3:30, it took only 15 minutes more for them to hit the next 100-point-equivalency limit, when S&P trading halted for the day.  At the stock market's 4 p.m. close, the Dow Jones Industrial average was withing 60 points of another circuit breaker.  Had the Dow fallen 250 points, trading on the New York Stock Exchange would have been halted for an hour.  Many investors say the circuit breakers, instituted following the 1987 collapse, provided little reassurance.  One Big Board specialist complains that the Friday futures halt, which was supposed to give the markets time to regain their equilibrium because futures prices are reported faster, was "ridiculous; anything artificial that gets in the way of this market is very hard to work with."  Some traders fear circuit breakers hold the risk of making matters worse, especially if they should halt stock trading.  But Big Board Chairman John J. Phelan Jr. maintains that the safeguards were a success Friday.  There were also complaints that the specialists on the floor of the Big Board, who are charged with making markets in individual stocks, performed poorly during the plunge.  Trading was halted in 10 stocks when specialists couldn't balance buy and sell orders in some stocks, such as entertainment giant Walt Disney Co.  Seven never reopened.  One futures executive, Christopher Pedersen of Twenty-First Securities Corp., says the specialists "were not able to handle the imbalances on the floor of the New York Stock Exchange."  But James Maguire, chairman of Henderson Brothers Inc., a Big Board specialist, retorts: "It is easy to say the specialist isn't doing his job.  When the dollar is in free fall, even central banks can't stop it."  One of the most puzzling aspects of Friday's drop was the speed with which the damage to UAL spilled over to other stocks.  Market professionals say that major arbitragers and others such as hedge funds, which were heavily invested in UAL and highly leveraged, couldn't get any cash out of their UAL positions because trading halted.  Once UAL were to reopen, such speculators faced the likelihood of margin calls -- demands from lenders to put up more cash for stock positions bought with borrowed funds.  So such traders quickly tried to raise cash by selling other so-called deal stocks, like AMR (American Airlines) and USAir.  But then trading was halted because of order imbalances -- there were far more sellers than buyers.  So the "arbs" started dumping positions in their entire portfolios, including major blue-chip stocks that have had large price runups this year, in a desperate race for cash.  AMR, subject of a $120-a-share bid from Donald Trump, saw trading in its stock halted at $98.625 a share, down $.125, but was quoted in off-exchange trading at only $81.50.  Paramount Communications Inc., the subject of takeover whispers, plunged $6.625 a share to $56.625.  Shares of Hilton Hotels Corp., which has put itself up for sale, nosedived $21.50 to $85 a share.  The deluge left some investors shaken and angry.  "Don't ask me how I am," said Marshall Front, a money manager at Stein Roe & Farnham Inc. in Chicago.  "This is incredible.  You have a classic panic."  Frederick A. Moran, president of Moran Asset Management in Greenwich, Conn., said computer-aided "program traders are the reason we had the last crash, they're the reason we're having this crash, and they're why we'll have the next crash.  They're a total outrage."  Stephen B. Timbers, chief investment officer of Kemper Financial Services Inc. in Chicago, agrees that none of Friday's events by themselves added up to a 190-point decline.  "Programs took it down.  Without the programs, I can't imagine it would have been down 50," he says.  Many market professionals say it is still too soon to know whether it was program traders, per se, who were to blame, but they generally agree that the computerized trading programs that have now been embraced by an array of professional investors and money managers accounted for the speed of the drop.  Traders say that Friday's big sellers included Salomon Brothers Inc., which was reportedly executing trades for a client switching from stocks to bonds, and Tudor Investments, a prominent player in the futures markets.  Tudor wouldn't comment; a spokesman for Salomon denied that it was a heavy seller.  Michael Steinhardt, who only last Monday was threatening a takeover of USAir using his 8.4% stake as a club, says he wished he didn't own the stock when Friday's market left him with a $12.9 million paper loss.  "This market is a mile wide and an inch deep," he says.  But Mr. Steinhardt disputed that he had been a heavy seller of other stocks Friday to make up for the USAir losses.  Several big firms that do index arbitrage, in which traders buy and sell stocks and stock-index futures simultaneously to take advantage of price differentials, say they couldn't execute trades because they couldn't be sure of prices they would get on the stock exchange floor.  One takeover stock speculator says that with individual investors frightened away from the market, the remaining participants are mainly institutions, all with instant access to the same information, and the same ability to sell in an instant -- that is, until all try to sell at once.  "If this is something that had happened over the last few weeks, nobody would have noticed," the speculator says.  "But now it just happens in an hour.  The information is very quick; it's often inaccurate; and reactions can be irrational."  The speed of Friday's drop is likely to reinforce the perception of many small investors that the markets are even more of a casino and haven't devised a manner for comfortably handling the awesome forces that technology has heaped upon them.  Despite two years of study, the marketplace remains one where ever-anxious large investors, haunted by memories of the 508-point plunge in 1987 and aided by powerful computers, can turn minor market upsets into major calamities in the space of a few hours.  Many are quick to emphasize that just because the market can fall as fast as it did Friday doesn't mean it will tank again, despite some disquieting similarities between now and October 1987.  As in 1987, this latest market slide was preceded by sparring between nations and government officials over the dollar.  In 1987, then-Treasury Secretary James Baker was threatening a big drop in the dollar if West Germany raised interest rates.  This year, Federal Reserve Chairman Alan Greenspan seemed to warn he wouldn't lower interest rates merely to keep the dollar within an agreed-on exchange range.  In another similarity to 1987, the government was threatening a crackdown on highly leveraged takeovers.  Then it was House Budget Committee Chairman Daniel Rostenkowski threatening to eliminate the tax deductibility of interest for certain debt-financed takeovers.  This year it was Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner voicing concern about airline buy-outs and threatening to force changes in the United deal. (Some think another Washington factor this time was the Senate's failure to pass capital-gains tax cut.)  But market observers point out that long-term government bond interest rates, currently at 7.85%, are 2.5 percentage points lower than the level that prevailed in October 1987, when interest rates had been rising for most of the year.  Another difference this year is that stocks' price-earnings ratios are much lower, which implies that they may not be so overpriced.  In 1987, the average P-E ratio fell from a peak of more than 20 to about 13 just after the crash.  This year, the average ratio was 14 at the market peak one week ago, and finished Friday at 13.  On the other hand, one reason those ratios were so high in 1987 was that the stock market had been anticipating an enormous rise in corporate earnings, which did in fact occur.  Between 1987 and 1989, those profits were projected to rise by 50%.  But now those earnings are hitting a plateau.  Just last week a string of earnings disappointments unnerved some market participants.  Next year, earnings are expected to inch up only 2.4%.  Another factor that has been dominating the thinking of many stock analysts is the current plight of the junk-bond market.  Although UAL, the second-largest leveraged buy-out ever, was to have been financed with bank debt instead of junk bonds, its failure to obtain financing focused attention on the entire market for leveraged deals, underscoring just how dependent the entire market has become on junk bonds.  Many stocks owe at least part of their market valuation to the perception that they could soon be the subject of a takeover or buy-out.  Attention is focused on the so-called breakup value of the stock in the hands of an imagined acquirer who would buy the company at a big premium, perhaps planning to sell it piece by piece.  Takeover specialist Carl Icahn, whose 13.1% stake in USX Corp. lost $151.2 million in value on Friday, says the stock market's downturn may reflect the end of a speculative period that has generated many leveraged buy-outs that now face problems as a result of weakness in the junk-bond market.  "While a number of LBOs are fine, there are also many where the cash flow cannot pay the interest, but {that} instead are based on the buyer selling divisions to a greater fool to pay off the debt," Mr. Icahn says.  However, Mario Gabelli, a takeover-stock investor, says that while some of the most speculative deals may now prove impossible to finance, "Companies are still going to buy companies around the world."  As on any day on Wall Street, there are plenty of people who think the market will go up, and plenty who predict a downturn.  "My advice is to buy," says Elaine Garzarelli, a market-timing expert at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., who warned clients of danger just before the 1987 crash.  She compares the current drop-off to 10%-12% corrections in 1978 and 1979.  And Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady says the market's drop Friday ought to be seen in the context of a 28.7% runup in the Dow since Jan. 1 of this year.  In addition, the stocks as a whole are up 60% from the day after the 1987 crash.  Since the market hit a record level of 2791.41 on Monday, it has declined by 222.15 points, or 8%.  Most of that occurred on Friday.  Some think the selling has a way to go.  James Awad, president of BMI Capital Corp. in New York, says that despite the more favorable valuation levels, stocks could still tumble several hundred points in the event of a breakdown in "the internal structure of the market."  Although professionals were bracing themselves for some heavy early selling on overseas markets, many didn't detect any widespread panic over the weekend among U.S. institutions and individual investors.  Many mutual funds have big cash reserves -- which they lacked in 1987 -- as a cushion against a possible cascade of telephone sell orders today.  Fidelity, which was forced to sell $800 million of stocks in the 1987 crash, has quadrupled the cash level of the giant Magellan fund.  The Boston firm says redemptions in stock funds since the Friday market drop have equaled less than 15% of those funds' total cash position of about $2 billion.  "Two years ago there were massive redemption levels over the weekend and a lot of fear around," says C. Bruce Johnstone, who runs Fidelity's $5 billion Equity-Income Fund.  "This feels more like a one-shot deal -- people aren't panicking."  Liquidity also appears to be far healthier than it was in 1987, when a lack of it brought the financial system close to break-down.  Over the weekend, Federal Reserve Chairman Greenspan phoned officials in the U.S. and abroad to reassure them that the Fed was prepared to inject massive amounts of money into the banking system if needed to prevent a financial crisis.  And Mr. Phelan, the Big Board's chairman, says that the exchange hasn't turned up any capital problems among its 49 specialist firms, suggesting that the Big Board will have the capacity to make orderly markets even if volume is heavy.  Carl N. Singer was named chairman of this communications and electronics equipment supplier, succeeding Louis H. Wolcott, who resigned from the board.  Mr. Singer will continue in his current positions as chairman of Miami-based Fundamental Management Corp., Microdyne's largest stockholder, and chairman of Mineola, N.Y.-based Robeson Industries Corp. Robert P. Adelman, former president and chief executive officer of Rogers Group, was named to the Microdyne board slot vacated by Mr. Wolcott, who will continue with Microdyne as an assistant to the president.  If one thing was clear in the chaos of Friday's market sell-off, it was that the collapse of the buy-out of UAL Corp. set the whole thing off.  But, it turns out, Wall Street -- quick to read tea leaves and quick to panic -- may have reached the wrong conclusion about the buy-out's unraveling.  As word spread Friday that many of the world's biggest banks had refused to participate in the $6.79 billion leveraged transaction, the financial markets assumed the worst: If the management of a blue-chip outfit like the parent of United Airlines can't get financing, then takeovers in general must be headed toward extinction.  The market, already chastened by a number of leveraged buy-outs gone bad, responded in a flood of sell orders.  Yet interviews with the bankers who turned down the UAL proposal suggest the market may have misinterpreted its significance.  The buy-out of UAL by a group made up of management, the pilots union and British Airways PLC, ran into difficulty because of its own unique problems, they say.  Banks didn't suddenly become unwilling to finance takeovers, they just didn't like the looks of this particular deal.  Specifically, the bankers said that UAL's management and advisers pushed too hard, trying to keep too much of the potential profit for themselves.  The airline's top two officers, chief executive Stephen M. Wolf and chief financial officer John C. Pope, for example, would have made a total of more than $100 million on the buy-out through stock options they hold, even though their proposal called for them to put only $15 million of their own funds into the deal.  Moreover, fees and interest rates paid to the banks would have been stingy -- far below those in comparable takeovers.  The banks also said they were worried that United's rosy projections of future income -- and therefore its ability to pay off the debt -- didn't adequately take into account the bumpy nature of the airline industry.  From a lender's point of view, "it's one of the worst big takeover proposals we've seen," said an official of First Chicago Corp., one of the banks asked to finance the buy-out, which notably didn't include junk bonds.  Even so, banks such as First Chicago, which has a long history of ties to UAL, stretched their lending guidelines as far as possible in hopes of making the proposal work.  "We really gave this thing nine looks," the First Chicago officer said.  It was the job of A.D. Frazier, First Chicago's commercial lending chief, to call the buy-out group and put the best possible face on the news.  "We called them back and said if they needed us -- if it would make a difference -- we'd come in," another officer familiar with the matter said.  Of course, it wasn't even close.  Other U.S. banks and, more importantly, those in Japan, also said no.  In the end, the proposal never got far beyond the original financing promises made by Citicorp and Chase Manhattan Corp., which together had agreed to commit $3 billion and said they were "highly confident" they could raise an additional $4.2 billion.  Representatives and advisers to the buy-out group, called Airline Acquisition Corp., met throughout the weekend in an effort to revise their $300-a-share offer.  But prospects of quickly putting together a new deal appeared bleak.  It is "still unclear whether this can be easily fixed," one official close to the transaction said yesterday afternoon.  A pilots union official said the group is likely to wait and see what the stock market does Monday before making any decisions.  "We've got a lot of homework to do, a lot of work ahead of us," said H. Bruce Bernstein, a lawyer at Sidley & Austin in Chicago, which is representing the bank group.  Both the banks' decision to decline financing and the stock market's reaction caught the buy-out group off guard.  Friday's dominoes began falling at 2:30 p.m., when the stock exchange halted trading in UAL, pending news.  The news came at 2:54.  Funds committed by banks for the buy-out "are not sufficient," the acquisition group announced.  UAL was trading at $279.75 at the time of the halt and never reopened for trading Friday.  However, it was later quoted by off-exchange market makers at as low as $230 a share.  At 3:30, with the market now in a free fall, representatives of the buy-out group scrambled to a hastily called meeting at Citicorp's offices at 399 Park Avenue in New York.  The group was trying to assess what it would take to resuscitate the deal.  On the way to the session, some huddled around a Quotron machine that was in the hallway outside the meeting room.  "The Dow's going down, down, down," said one observer in amazement.  The meeting itself, held in the corporate finance department on the ninth floor, was disorganized, as members of Citicorp's and Chase's syndication departments called other banks trying to figure out why they had rejected the deal.  At 3:55, five minutes before the market closed, the meeting began.  Gathered around a long table that filled the huge conference room were about 30 people, including representatives of Citicorp, Chase Manhattan, United Airlines, British Airways, Lazard Freres & Co., Salomon Brothers Inc., Skadden Arps (Mr.  Wolf's counsel) and Paul Weiss (lawyer for the pilots union).  One person who wasn't present: Mr. Wolf himself who, confident that the deal would go through, was returning from Europe, where he had pitched the proposal to several big European banks.  "People were surprised, shocked and upset," said an official at the meeting.  Mr. Wolf, reached at his Chicago home Saturday, declined to comment.  As they met to review what had gone wrong, the buy-out group quickly discovered that one of the big roadblocks had been Japanese lenders.  Although they had provided the lion's share of the financing on the Northwest Airlines buy-out just a few months before, Japanese banks had said no to UAL.  The Japanese apparently balked at several aspects of the proposal.  A senior executive at one of Japan's biggest banks says the UAL deal "was stretched.  It's a cyclical industry, and all the projections that the banks are working off are straight up.  So where's the cycle?"  Japanese lenders also recently have grown more conservative toward highly leveraged transactions, partly because of the recent cash-squeeze at Canada's Campeau Corp. following its leveraged purchase of Federated Department Stores Inc. last year.  Japanese banks are worried that the government might issue restrictive guidelines unless the banks hold down the number of risky leveraged-buy-out loans they make, says a Japanese monetary official.  "So, they are very cautious," he says.  A third problem was the potential for labor unrest at UAL, something that makes the Japanese particularly skittish.  The Japanese banks were reminded of the labor tensions at UAL all last week.  On Wednesday, the machinists union asked the U.S. Labor Department to step in to stop the buy-out.  On Thursday, at their national convention in Las Vegas, machinists union leaders discussed launching an allout campaign against UAL Chairman Wolf specifically.  The machinists have opposed the buy-out because they weren't invited to participate in the deal and because they fear all the debt that would be taken on in the transaction would overburden the company.  Machinists union leader John Peterpaul also made the union's views known in telephone conversations with representatives of Mitsubishi Bank, one of the Japanese banks that was considering participating in the financing.  In those conversations, he reiterated the union's position that it would seek significant wage increases in the round of contract talks set to begin next month.  The Japanese banks, however, weren't the only ones worried.  At First Chicago, executives were sharply divided on whether the bank should participate -- and what consequences there would be if it rejected its longtime client.  Among other things, the bank feared "we'd look like dogs" if United was able to piece together the financing and First Chicago was absent, a top lending officer said.  United's Mr. Pope was warning that just that could happen.  "Pope told us there's no question the banks are going to sign up."  As the Thursday afternoon deadline for banks neared, some lending officers at First Chicago remained in favor of joining the financing group, but the bank's "credit police" were opposed, citing the high degree of risk associated with the loan.  A vote of top officers, including Chairman Barry F. Sullivan, Thursday morning was strongly against the loan.  One official close to the transaction said banks were worried about the amount of assets the buy-out group had to cover the loans.  He said in the NWA Inc. acquisition, banks were secured with well over $1 in assets for every $1 of loan exposure.  In the UAL transaction, however, a banker's loans would have been secured with less than $1 in assets for every dollar of loans.  Another problem: The buy-out group's financial projections didn't assume any type of recession in the near future.  For instance, the group projected that revenue would increase nearly 10% annually over the next few years.  It estimated that yields -- the amount of income the airline takes in on ticket sales -- would increase an average of 3.5% a year, despite the ups and downs the industry has suffered in the last 10 years.  The projections also assumed that load factors -- the number of seats filled per aircraft -- would remain a stable 66.7% or thereabouts, even though domestic travel has been weakening.  According to a machinists union analysis of the transaction that will be presented to the Department of Transportation and a House Aviation subcommittee later this week, a "mild recession" would result in the company's taking in $3.5 billion less cash in the next four years than forecast by the buy-out group.  Clearly, any new bid will have to include more profit for lenders and that probably means less cash for UAL shareholders, including the heavily stock-optioned Messrs.  Wolf and Pope.  Citicorp, the lead bank on the financing proposal, meanwhile, has a resounding flop on its hands.  It agreed to put up $2 billion itself, while co-lead Chase Manhattan agreed to provide $1 billion.  The two New York banks have already been paid combined fees of $8 million for the commitments.  Citicorp and Chase told the buy-out group they were "highly confident" they could raise the remaining $4.2 billion needed to finance the deal. (The $7.2 billion the banks said they needed includes some refinancing of existing debt, and is therefore greater than the $6.79 billion offered for UAL.) Citibank's confidence was bolstered as recently as 10 days ago when representatives of 120 banks that had expressed interest in the UAL transaction attended a meeting with Citibank representatives.  "Ninety percent of the questions asked were friendly," said a person who attended.  "There were a lot of indications both before and after that this was a deal people thought well of."  But Citibank's confidence may also have bordered on arrogance, other bankers contend.  The recent buy-out financing of NWA, Northwest Airlines' parent, for instance, was a much more collaborative effort among several U.S. banks.  It was a far safer deal for lenders, since NWA had a healthier cash flow and more collateral on hand.  And banks' fees were much higher as well.  No wonder, then, that lenders lined up to participate.  "Perhaps lenders are finally recognizing that the stream of airline cash flow may be less predictable and a higher risk than previously considered," said Karen Firestone, a money manager at Fidelity Investments in Boston.  Ms. Firestone added, "In the same week that USAir announces they might lose money in the quarter, United is trying to get money for a $300-a-share buy-out.  It's kind of like, what's wrong with this picture?"  According to bankers and others familiar with the financing proposal, several things need to be fixed:  Fees paid to the banks, set at about 1.5% of loans, are low compared with other buy-outs, which have paid 2% to 2.5%.  Because buy-out loans often get refinanced -- and thus paid off -- ahead of schedule, banks can't count on years of interest income from these loans.  They like deals to be "front-loaded" with fees.  What's more, fees in the UAL proposal weren't structured to encourage banks to commit to lending large amounts of money.  The interest rate promised the banks was also relatively low; 2% over the rate banks charge each other in London, known as LIBOR.  And bankers were concerned that there weren't any junk bondholders or other buyers of subordinated debt standing between potential losses and the banks' senior loans.  "Most of these leveraged deals have been done with a pretty heavy layer of junk," a First Chicago executive said.  "This one has zippo."  Because the junk bond market has ground to a halt since Campeau's problems were made manifest, so-called bridge loans from Wall Street firms or other sources could be used for subordinated debt in the UAL deal.  In the meantime, though, airline executives, union officials, lawyers, investment bankers and even the machinists will have one eye on United and one eye on the stock market they helped to tank.  Says an official working on the buy-out: "As time goes by, you have to get more worried."  ---  Randall Smith and Michael R. Sesit contributed to this article.  The dollar's fall on Friday could signal a new bout of weakness for the U.S. currency and -- if it declines much further -- possibly the end of the U.S. currency's long-term climb that began in early 1988.  "The entire sentiment has changed; the dollar bulls definitely have been shaken," says Jack Kessler, senior vice president in charge of New York foreign-exchange operations for Chase Manhattan Bank.  He and others cite Friday's plunge in U.S. stock prices and the narrowing difference between interest rates in the U.S. and some of its major trading partners, particularly West Germany and Japan.  Many analysts also suspect that the Federal Reserve has begun to reduce interest rates and could go further.  Lower interest rates usually diminish a currency's appeal to international investors and speculators.  By very late in New York on Friday, the dollar had tumbled to 1.8655 West German marks and 141.50 yen -- its lows for the day -- from 1.9083 marks and 144.17 yen on Thursday.  The British pound rose to $1.5840 from $1.5523 a day earlier.  In Tokyo Monday, the dollar opened for trading at 139.30 yen, down from Friday's Tokyo close of 144 yen, and 1.8340 marks down from Friday's close of 1.8720.  By late morning, the dollar had recovered somewhat and was trading at 140.90 yen and 1.8535 marks.  "If the stock market keeps going down on Monday, you're going to see a lot of people selling dollars," says Robert Fio Rito, a trader at Harris Trust & Savings Bank in Chicago.  He added: "The mark is a good place to be."  In the short-run, the dollar's fate depends largely on the performance of the U.S. stock market today as well as the Fed's and other central banks' reaction to what happens in all world equity markets, say traders and analysts.  Not only does the dollar play a key role in determining the direction and health of the U.S. economy, but the speed with which it rises or falls is also of major concern to U.S. and foreign policy makers.  A precipitous fall by the dollar could reignite U.S. inflationary pressures by raising the price of imports and prompting U.S. manufacturers to increase domestic prices.  But if the U.S. currency were to decline in a controlled manner, it would contribute to the four-year effort by the U.S. and its major trading partners to reduce the U.S. trade deficit and correspondingly large Japanese and West German surpluses.  That's because a weaker dollar makes U.S. exports less expensive while raising the price of imports to American consumers.  Furthermore, in the current stock market climate, the dollar is the wire through which foreigners telegraph their preference -- or distaste -- for U.S. securities and signal their confidence in the American economy and financial system.  If foreigners dump U.S. stocks and return to the safety of their home markets -- as they did in October 1987 -- they must simultaneously also sell dollars for their own currencies.  Those transactions, in turn, could weaken the dollar.  Even if foreigners just withhold from buying additional U.S. securities, they reduce the demand for dollars.  Conversely, when foreigners buy American securities, they increase the demand for the U.S. currency.  However, foreigners who merely sell their American shares and buy U.S. bonds don't affect the exchange rate.  Initially on Friday, the dollar shot up in early New York activity after both the producer price index and retail sales for September came out higher than most analysts expected.  Traders concluded that U.S. interest rates would remain firm, and the dollar quickly climbed to its intraday highs of 1.9140 marks and 144.80 yen.  But the rally quickly fizzled under the weight of trader chagrin that the currency hadn't risen further, profit-taking and unconfirmed reports that the Fed was selling dollars.  A few hours later with the dollar trading at 1.8895 marks and 143 yen, the stock market began plunging, taking the U.S. currency with it.  Surprisingly, while trading was hectic, dealers say that volume was unexpectedly moderate.  "You're talking about a really thin and volatile Friday the 13th," says Carmine Rotondo, chief corporate dealer for Security Pacific National Bank.  "The decline of the dollar was more a function of market makers dragging bids down than people massively selling," adds Richard Witten, vice president in charge of foreign-exchange operations at Goldman, Sachs & Co.  From its intraday highs four weeks ago, the U.S. currency has fallen almost 7% against the mark and 5% against the yen.  In Friday's trading alone the dollar fell more than 2.5% against the mark and 2.3% against the yen from its high in early New York trading.  Currently, the dollar stands close to the upper limits of its so-called Louvre trading ranges of 1.70-to-1.90 marks and 120-140 yen, within which most traders and economists believe the Group of Seven major industrial countries have tried to keep it since February 1987.  The G-7 includes the U.S., Japan, West Germany, France, Britain, Italy and Canada.  "For all of its unfortunate aspects, Friday's events make it easier for the G-7 process to continue," says Robert Feldman, an international economist at Salomon Brothers Inc.  He added:"Until Friday morning, market people were contending that further interest-rate hikes were necessary to keep the dollar bulls from running over {the central banks}; there seemed to be a sense of the dollar bulls coming back and taking control again."  In the past week and a half, major European countries -- led by West Germany and Japan -- raised official domestic interest rates, mostly to keep their currencies from falling further and to stem the inflationary impact of those declines.  Mr. Feldman added: "But that's not the way things look now; the G-7 have some breathing room."  Analysts say that the dollar's future depends on whether U.S. stock prices keep falling; whether the Fed is forced to ease credit to ease any crisis; whether foreign equity markets also fall, and how central banks abroad react to those circumstances.  Many dealers are betting that the Fed will have to ease monetary policy, if it hasn't already.  The questions are how much and under what circumstances.  "If nothing happens abroad and the Fed is forced to ease here to calm markets, the dollar is going to go down; there would be a flight to quality as people start to worry about the U.S. financial system," says Michael D. Andrews, a vice president at Merrill Lynch & Co.  The dollar, he adds, "could take a pretty big hit," if the Fed were perceived as "being in a very difficult situation where it was fighting a fire."  In fact, Mr. Andrews and some other traders and analysts say that it isn't impossible to paint a scenario where the Fed might have to intervene to support the dollar.  Analysts believe that the Fed can tolerate a dollar as low as 1.80 marks, a level at which U.S. companies are competitive in overseas markets and yet isn't too inflationary domestically.  Much depends on how foreigners react.  If they merely sell American shares and buy U.S. bonds, that won't affect the dollar.  But if, as in October 1987, they dump dollar-denominated securities and run to foreign markets, they will increase pressure on the dollar to fall.  Some of that already began on Friday.  "Many of the banks in the U.S. called their counterparts in the Far East and Europe," says Chase Manhattan's Mr. Kessler.  "And dealers who had gone home in the Far East and Europe long dollars started selling when they were awakened during the night and told that the stock market was down, that Fed funds were at 8 3/4% and that the Fed might begin to ease," Mr. Kessler adds.  Salomon Brothers' Mr. Feldman says that further evidence of foreign selling was the dollar's plunge Friday at the same time the bond market was rallying -- which hasn't occurred in months.  "That may be a signal of a turning point in the strategies of international portfolio managers," he says.  Harris Trust's Mr. Fio Rito predicts that "an equity market hit will trigger further liquidation; with the Japanese and Germans raising {interest} rates, the fundamentals changed for the dollar."  Indeed, Salomon's Mr. Feldman notes that in September yields on three-month Eurodollar deposits were 1.5 percentage points more than on three-month marks.  By late Friday, that spread had narrowed to 0.19 percentage point.  "People began to question shifting {funds} for differences this small," he adds.  Many dealers are looking to see if the dollar tumbles below 1.85 marks, a key psychological and technical level to the many traders who use charts to predict currency movements.  "It breaks through 1.85, then you begin to question whether the dollar's long-term uptrend that began in early 1988 is still in place," says Merrill Lynch's Mr. Andrews.  The dollar isn't without its boosters, who point to reduced U.S. budget and trade deficits as well as its value as a so-called haven currency in a world rife with political instability.  "I see a stronger dollar mid to long-term," says Gilles Bazy-Sire, a first vice president at Societe Generale Securities Corp. in New York.  He says that based on the price of a similar basket of goods and services in major industrial countries, the dollar currently "is very cheap."  That, he says, "should increase the demand for dollars" by investors who want to buy real U.S. assets, such as real estate and companies.  Dollar doubters point to the prospects of a bumpy U.S. stock market at best, and the prospect of lower U.S. interest rates.  What's more, many forecasters predict that the U.S. trade deficit will begin to widen again in 1990.  In fact, many analysts estimate that the trade gap for August -- to be released tomorrow -- widened to as much as $9.6 billion from $7.6 billion the previous month.  Barring a catastrophe in the U.S. stock market, Mr. Kessler believes that the dollar in the near term should weaken further to about 1.8650-1.8850 marks and 142-143.50 yen.  But he adds: "My gut feeling is that we can even see it go lower."  On the Commodity Exchange in New York Friday, gold for current delivery settled at $363.30 an ounce, down 10 cents.  Estimated volume was a light two million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Monday, gold was quoted at about $368.27 an ounce, up $2.81 an ounce from Saturday's close of $365.46.  ARBITRAGE: Technically, the simultaneous buying and selling of related securities to take advantage of small differences in price.  The term has come to be applied to buying stocks in companies that are, or are rumored to be, takeover targets.  INDEX ARBITRAGE: The simultaneous trading in stock-index markets and the underlying groups of stocks to take advantage of temporary discrepancies in prices.  JUNK BONDS: High-yielding, high-risk debt securities rated double-B or lower by the credit-rating agencies.  LEVERAGED BUY-OUT: The purchase of a company by a small group of investors financed largely by debt, often junk bonds.  MARGIN CALL: A demand upon an investor to put up more collateral for securities bought on credit.  The lender, usually a bank or brokerage firm, makes the call when the equity in the investor's account falls below a standard set by a stock exchange or firm.  OPTIONS: A "put" option permits a holder to sell a stock at a specified price within a limited period.  A "call" option permits an investor to buy stock at a specified price within a limited period.  An index option lets the investor buy or sell the "basket" of stocks represented by a stock-market index.  PORTFOLIO INSURANCE: A method of hedging a stock portfolio, usually by selling futures contracts on stock indexes when the market falls.  STOCK-INDEX FUTURES: Contracts for future delivery of an amount of cash based on an index of stock prices, such as the Standard & Poor's 500 index or the Major Market Index.  A trader buying a December S&P 500 stock-index futures contract at a price of $200 today, for instance, would be agreeing to take delivery next month of 500 times that amount in cash, or $100,000.  Traders would almost always close out that position by selling an offsetting futures contract.  If the stock market -- and correspondingly the stock index -- rose before the trader closed out his position, he would make a profit because he could sell an offsetting contract at a higher price, taking in more money than he had to spend.  If the market fell, the trader would lose money because he would have to sell an offsetting contract at a lower price.  Futures are used to hedge against fluctuations in stock prices or to speculate on market moves.  (The Major Market Index encompasses 20 blue-chip stocks, including 17 that are also in the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  Futures on the MMI are traded on the Chicago Board of Trade.  Options on the index are traded on the American Stock Exchange.)  "Circuit-breaker" trading halts on this city's futures and options exchanges may have speeded the stock market's fall on Friday.  Stock-index futures trading on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange and stock-index options trading on the Chicago Board Options Exchange initially closed within a few minutes of each other Friday afternoon.  But trading in the nation's most active stock-index option on the CBOE didn't reopen for the day.  As a result, options traders were forced to sell elsewhere, driving futures and stock prices lower, traders said.  And when trading in the Chicago Merc's stock-index futures had finally halted for the day as well, sell orders cascaded onto the floor of the New York Stock Exchange, adding to the rout.  What's more, in anticipation of the trading halts many traders -- worried about being unable to trade at lower prices -- sold futures and options contracts, thereby knocking prices still lower.  The wildly fluctuating markets appeared to have claimed at least one victim.  Fossett Corp., an options-trading firm, said last night that it is transferring all of its customer accounts to First Options of Chicago.  Stephen Fossett, president and sole owner of the company, said that he was making the transfers as a result of a substantial cash squeeze stemming from numerous calls for cash and margin money on Friday by several stock-option and futures exchanges.  "All of our obligations were met," Mr. Fossett said.  Although few other trading firms here or in New York appeared to be in immediate financial difficulty, Friday's volatility also underscored the need for exchanges in Chicago to hasten the common clearing of futures and options contracts, traders said.  "I'm very disappointed.  The trading halts in futures and options may have done more harm than good," said Jeffrey Tabak, a partner in the investment firm of Miller Tabak Hirsch & Co., and a member of the presidential commission that recommended intermarket circuit breakers be adopted.  The situation "is clearly uncorrected," said Glenn W. Clark, a Washington, D.C., author on the futures markets.  "All {a trading halt} does is smooth the movement."  The stock-index futures and options also are likely to weigh heavily on the stock market this morning.  The S&P 500 index future that expires in December closed at 328.85, nearly five index points below the 333.65 closing price of the S&P 500 index itself, which is based on the value of the 500 stocks in the index.  The wide discount of the index futures price against the actual index may tempt program traders, who profit from price discrepancies between stocks and futures, to buy the relatively cheap futures and sell stocks, sending the stock market still lower.  That selling could pull futures prices lower as well, triggering another round of program selling.  Traders emphasized, however, that the price relationship between stocks and futures could change substantially by this morning's start of trading, based on trading overnight in Japan, an influx of new orders or other events.  Trading first halted in the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index futures contract on the Chicago Mercantile Exchange at 2:07 p.m. CST, after the contract had fallen 12 index points.  It reopened at 2:30 p.m., but traded freely for only 15 minutes before hitting its daily limit of 30 points below the previous day's close.  Sporadic trading occurred at that level for the next half-hour until the contract's normal closing time of 3:15 p.m.  The trading halts' main effect, as designed, was to permit the stock market to catch up with the futures markets.  When the Merc imposed its first halt in the S&P 500 futures contract after the 12-point drop, the stock index on which the contract is based went down from eight points to 13 points, roughly in line with the futures contract.  But conflicting steps by some Chicago exchanges caused consternation among traders.  Chicago Board Options Exchange officials, for instance, halted trading in their S&P 100-stock index option contract, as expected, shortly after the Merc imposed its initial trading halt.  The CBOE decided not to reopen the nation's largest stock-index option market after the S&P 500 index contract reopened and halted again a short time later.  The CBOE said in a statement that "the interests of fair and orderly markets wouldn't be served by a resumption of trading."  But some options traders said they were furious that they had been denied a chance to trade while other markets were open.  The CBOE action also may have driven prices lower in the Chicago Merc's huge S&P 500 index futures pit, traders said.  As much as 25% of the volume in S&P 500 futures on most days comes from CBOE traders hedging their risks in the options markets.  With their own market closed late Friday, some options traders deluged the S&P 500 futures pit with sell orders to hedge their frozen options positions, traders said.  As a result, one of the largest options-trading firms in the country offered to sell 1,000 S&P 500 contracts at the limit of 30 index points below the previous day's close, an S&P 500 futures trader said.  That offer and others like it killed any chance of a late rally and drove down stock-index futures prices to the daily limit, the trader added.  With the Chicago markets closed, traders were left with no choice but to "bang the bids {sell stocks} in New York," Mr. Tabak said.  The Major Market Index futures contract on the Chicago Board of Trade, traded much less actively, touched its daily limit of 50 points below the previous day's close several times Friday, but bounced back slightly and never halted trading.  To provide an added cash cushion to compensate for the increased price volatility in their markets, the Chicago Merc required traders to increase the margin, or amount of cash they put up to trade S&P 500 contracts, by one-third to $12,000 a contract from $9,000, effective this morning.  The Board of Trade doubled margin requirements for the Major Market Index futures to $8,000 a contract.  Officials of the exchanges said they communicated well with each other and with government regulators during Fri day's sell-off, compared with the sense of chaos that prevailed at times on Black Monday two years ago.  But while top offi cials are talking, the exchange's clearing arms are still largely in the dark about the financial risks their members may be exposed to in other markets.  The Chicago Merc has begun limited cross-margining of stock-index futures accounts with the Options Clearing Corp., which processes all options trades for U.S. exchanges.  But for the most part, stock, options and futures markets still each have different clearing and margin systems.  That means that brokers and institutions trading on several exchanges face different cash requirements on each, making it extremely difficult during a crisis for an exchange to ascertain a firm's overall, or net, financial position.  Just such a cash squeeze two years ago, at a leading Wall Street firm that was facing duplicate margin calls for futures and options positions, led several studies of the markets to call for the coordinated margining of positions in different markets.  Take $10 out of your wallet.  That's how much the collapse of Lincoln Savings & Loan will cost you and every other American.  Liquidating the Irvine, Calif., thrift will drain the federal deposit insurance fund by more than $2.5 billion, making it the largest thrift failure in history.  Now, finally, there may be an investigation to explore how five senatorial shills helped perpetuate this fiscal black hole.  Back in June, we recounted how five U.S. Senators -- Alan Cranston of California, Dennis DeConcini and John McCain of Arizona, John Glenn of Ohio and Donald Riegle of Michigan -- intervened with regulators to ease up on Lincoln, whose risk-fraught loans were more worthy of a casino than a federally insured thrift.  Last Friday, Common Cause, a political-reform lobby, asked for a Senate Ethics Committee probe of the five Senators.  It wants both an outside counsel to conduct the probe and a parallel Justice Department investigation, things it has not initially asked for in previous ethics cases.  Perhaps Common Cause has come to recognize that Congress is generally incapable of investigating itself.  Charles Keating Jr., the chairman of American Continental, Lincoln's parent company, needed the Senators' help in his running battle with federal regulators.  He admits he made large contributions to each of them so they would "take up my cause."  In one case, 57 Keating executives gave $66,100 to Senator Riegle at the same March 1987 fund-raiser.  Mr. Riegle later returned the money.  In April 1987, the Senators,, absent Mr. Riegle, asked to meet with Ed Gray, then head of the Federal Home Loan Bank Board, and according to Mr. Gray, unsuccessfully pressed him to drop a key regulation detrimental to Lincoln -- "a clear subversion of the regulatory process."  Senator McCain now calls the meeting "improper" and after several previous denials, Senator Cranston now admits the regulation probably came up.  Days later, the four senators -- joined by Mr. Riegle -- met with other regulators to press Lincoln's case.  Senators Glenn, Riegle and McCain apparently stopped doing favors for Mr. Keating after that, but Senators Cranston and DeConcini persisted, intervening on behalf of Lincoln until just before its closure this year.  It now turns out that at least four of the five Senators may have been indebted to Mr. Keating far beyond mere campaign contributions:  -- The Arizona Republic reports that two of Senator DeConcini's top aides received more than $50 million in real-estate loans from Lincoln.  -- Senator McCain recently reimbursed Mr. Keating for $13,400 in previously unreported airplane trips, and revealed that his wife and father-in-law invested $359,100 in a Keating shopping-center partnership in 1986.  -- Senator Cranston solicited $850,000 in contributions from Mr. Keating for three "nonpartisan" voter-registration groups, which some former employees now say were fronts for the Democratic Party.  -- Senator Glenn solicited $200,000 in contributions from Mr. Keating for a political committee he controlled that paid him to travel around the country.  Some $43,000 was used for the Glenn Senate campaign -- a possible violation of federal election law.  The lack of attention to the Keating drama is astonishing in light of the magnitude of the savings-and-loan disaster.  The S&L bailout promises to cost the taxpayers some $200 billion, with Lincoln accounting for $2.5 billion alone.  By contrast, the extensively covered HUD political scandals may cost the taxpayers $2.0 billion, the centerpiece being a $0.0003 billion check to James Watt, the legality of which seems to be uncontested.  Similarly, the spate of dubious prosecutions in finance obscures the seriousness of the allegations against Mr. Keating and his associates.  This is not a matter of whispering "bunny."  The 160-page civil suit filed against Mr. Keating last month by the Resolution Trust Corp., the vehicle for the S&L bailout, traces a clear thread.  Money was taken into Lincoln, for example by selling $250 million in uninsured debentures near retirement communities, and allegedly taken out of the parent company by insiders, for example by the sale of their personal stock to the company's employee stock ownership plan.  The case remains to be tested in court, of course, but if the allegations hold up the Senators were defending a classic scam.  Common Cause isn't the only body that thinks the Keating Five's interventions deserve scrutiny.  The House Banking Committee has voted to subpoena Mr. Keating and top federal regulators to testify about Lincoln.  The hearings begin tomorrow, and will focus on why thrift regulator M. Danny Wall, a former Senate staffer, overruled staff recommendations to close Lincoln and transferred regulatory oversight of Lincoln to Washington.  Between April, 1987, when the five senators intervened, and April, 1988, when Lincoln was finally closed, the losses to taxpayers grew by some $1.5 billion.  It was Common Cause's demand last year for a House Ethics Committee probe of Speaker Jim Wright that prompted the committee to hire Richard Phelan as an outside counsel.  Mr. Phelan found that Mr. Wright had improperly intervened with federal regulators on behalf of S&Ls, but the Ethics Committee disagreed, saying such actions were an integral part of a Member's job and it could not second-guess "the technique and personality of the legislator."  If the Senate Ethics Committee chooses to investigate, it will be interesting to see if it reaches the same conclusion in the case of the five Senators.  No, it wasn't Black Monday.  But while the New York Stock Exchange didn't fall apart Friday as the Dow Jones Industrial Average plunged 190.58 points -- most of it in the final hour -- it barely managed to stay this side of chaos.  Some "circuit breakers" installed after the October 1987 crash failed their first test, traders say, unable to cool the selling panic in both stocks and futures.  The 49 stock specialist firms on the Big Board floor -- the buyers and sellers of last resort who were criticized after the 1987 crash -- once again couldn't handle the selling pressure.  Big investment banks refused to step up to the plate to support the beleaguered floor traders by buying big blocks of stock, traders say.  Heavy selling of Standard & Poor's 500-stock index futures in Chicago relentlessly beat stocks downward.  Seven Big Board stocks -- UAL, AMR, BankAmerica, Walt Disney, Capital Cities/ABC, Philip Morris and Pacific Telesis Group -- stopped trading and never resumed.  The finger-pointing has already begun.  "The equity market was illiquid.  Once again {the specialists} were not able to handle the imbalances on the floor of the New York Stock Exchange," said Christopher Pedersen, senior vice president at Twenty-First Securities Corp.  Countered James Maguire, chairman of specialists Henderson Brothers Inc.: "It is easy to say the specialist isn't doing his job.  When the dollar is in a free-fall, even central banks can't stop it.  Speculators are calling for a degree of liquidity that is not there in the market."  Many money managers and some traders had already left their offices early Friday afternoon on a warm autumn day -- because the stock market was so quiet.  Then in a lightning plunge, the Dow Jones industrials in barely an hour surrendered about a third of their gains this year, chalking up a 190.58-point, or 6.9%, loss on the day in gargantuan trading volume.  Final-hour trading accelerated to 108.1 million shares, a record for the Big Board.  At the end of the day, 251.2 million shares were traded.  The Dow Jones industrials closed at 2569.26.  The Dow's decline was second in point terms only to the 508-point Black Monday crash that occurred Oct. 19, 1987.  In percentage terms, however, the Dow's dive was the 12th-worst ever and the sharpest since the market fell 156.83, or 8%, a week after Black Monday.  The Dow fell 22.6% on Black Monday.  Shares of UAL, the parent of United Airlines, were extremely active all day Friday, reacting to news and rumors about the proposed $6.79 billion buy-out of the airline by an employee-management group.  Wall Street's takeover-stock speculators, or "risk arbitragers," had placed unusually large bets that a takeover would succeed and UAL stock would rise.  At 2:43 p.m. EDT, came the sickening news: The Big Board was halting trading in UAL, "pending news."  On the exchange floor, "as soon as UAL stopped trading, we braced for a panic," said one top floor trader.  Several traders could be seen shaking their heads when the news flashed.  For weeks, the market had been nervous about takeovers, after Campeau Corp.'s cash crunch spurred concern about the prospects for future highly leveraged takeovers.  And 10 minutes after the UAL trading halt came news that the UAL group couldn't get financing for its bid.  At this point, the Dow was down about 35 points.  The market crumbled.  Arbitragers couldn't dump their UAL stock -- but they rid themselves of nearly every "rumor" stock they had.  For example, their selling caused trading halts to be declared in USAir Group, which closed down 3 7/8 to 41 1/2, Delta Air Lines, which fell 7 3/4 to 69 1/4, and Philips Industries, which sank 3 to 21 1/2.  These stocks eventually reopened.  But as panic spread, speculators began to sell blue-chip stocks such as Philip Morris and International Business Machines to offset their losses.  When trading was halted in Philip Morris, the stock was trading at 41, down 3 3/8, while IBM closed 5 5/8 lower at 102.  Selling snowballed because of waves of automatic "stop-loss" orders, which are triggered by computer when prices fall to certain levels.  Most of the stock selling pressure came from Wall Street professionals, including computer-guided program traders.  Traders said most of their major institutional investors, on the other hand, sat tight.  Now, at 3:07, one of the market's post-crash "reforms" took hold as the S&P 500 futures contract had plunged 12 points, equivalent to around a 100-point drop in the Dow industrials.  Under an agreement signed by the Big Board and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange, trading was temporarily halted in Chicago.  After the trading halt in the S&P 500 pit in Chicago, waves of selling continued to hit stocks themselves on the Big Board, and specialists continued to notch prices down.  As a result, the link between the futures and stock markets ripped apart.  Without the guidepost of stock-index futures -- the barometer of where traders think the overall stock market is headed -- many traders were afraid to trust stock prices quoted on the Big Board.  The futures halt was even assailed by Big Board floor traders.  "It screwed things up," said one major specialist.  This confusion effectively halted one form of program trading, stock index arbitrage, that closely links the futures and stock markets, and has been blamed by some for the market's big swings. (In a stock-index arbitrage sell program, traders buy or sell big baskets of stocks and offset the trade in futures to lock in a price difference.)  "When the airline information came through, it cracked every model we had for the marketplace," said a managing director at one of the largest program-trading firms.  "We didn't even get a chance to do the programs we wanted to do."  But stocks kept falling.  The Dow industrials were down 55 points at 3 p.m. before the futures-trading halt.  At 3:30 p.m., at the end of the "cooling off" period, the average was down 114.76 points.  Meanwhile, during the the S&P trading halt, S&P futures sell orders began piling up, while stocks in New York kept falling sharply.  Big Board Chairman John J. Phelan said yesterday the circuit breaker "worked well mechanically.  I just think it's nonproductive at this point to get into a debate if index arbitrage would have helped or hurt things."  Under another post-crash system, Big Board President Richard Grasso (Mr.  Phelan was flying to Bangkok as the market was falling) was talking on an "inter-exchange hot line" to the other exchanges, the Securities and Exchange Commission and the Federal Reserve Board.  He camped out at a high-tech nerve center on the floor of the Big Board, where he could watch updates on prices and pending stock orders.  At about 3:30 p.m. EDT, S&P futures resumed trading, and for a brief time the futures and stock markets started to come back in line.  Buyers stepped in to the futures pit.  But the build-up of S&P futures sell orders weighed on the market, and the link with stocks began to fray again.  At about 3:45, the S&P market careened to still another limit, of 30 points down, and trading was locked again.  Futures traders say the S&P was signaling that the Dow could fall as much as 200 points.  During this time, small investors began ringing their brokers, wondering whether another crash had begun.  At Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., which is trying to cater to small investors, some demoralized brokers thought this would be the final confidence-crusher.  That's when George L. Ball, chairman of the Prudential Insurance Co. of America unit, took to the internal intercom system to declare that the plunge was only "mechanical."  "I have a hunch that this particular decline today is something `more ado about less.' It would be my inclination to advise clients not to sell, to look for an opportunity to buy," Mr. Ball told the brokers.  At Merrill Lynch & Co., the nation's biggest brokerage firm, a news release was prepared headlined "Merrill Lynch Comments on Market Drop."  The release cautioned that "there are significant differences between the current environment and that of October 1987" and that there are still "attractive investment opportunities" in the stock market.  However, Jeffrey B. Lane, president of Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc., said that Friday's plunge is "going to set back" relations with customers, "because it reinforces the concern of volatility.  And I think a lot of people will harp on program trading.  It's going to bring the debate right back to the forefront."  As the Dow average ground to its final 190.58 loss Friday, the S&P pit stayed locked at its 30-point trading limit.  Jeffrey Yass of program trader Susquehanna Investment Group said 2,000 S&P contracts were for sale on the close, the equivalent of $330 million in stock.  But there were no buyers.  While Friday's debacle involved mainly professional traders rather than investors, it left the market vulnerable to continued selling this morning, traders said.  Stock-index futures contracts settled at much lower prices than indexes of the stock market itself.  At those levels, stocks are set up to be hammered by index arbitragers, who lock in profits by buying futures when futures prices fall, and simultaneously sell off stocks.  But nobody knows at what level the futures and stocks will open today.  The de-linkage between the stock and futures markets Friday will undoubtedly cause renewed debate about whether Wall Street is properly prepared for another crash situation.  The Big Board's Mr. Grasso said, "Our systemic performance was good."  But the exchange will "look at the performance of all specialists in all stocks.  Obviously we'll take a close look at any situation in which we think the dealer-community obligations weren't met," he said.  (See related story: "Fed Ready to Inject Big Funds" -- WSJ Oct. 16, 1989)  But specialists complain privately that just as in the 1987 crash, the "upstairs" firms -- big investment banks that support the market by trading big blocks of stock -- stayed on the sidelines during Friday's blood-letting.  Mr. Phelan said, "It will take another day or two" to analyze who was buying and selling Friday.  (See related story: "Fed Is Prepared To Offer Banks Massive Funds" -- WSJ Oct. 16, 1989)  ---  @ Days with Greatest  @ Percentage Loss:  @ DJ Industrials  @ Net  @Date Close Change % Chg.  @Oct. 19, 1987 1738.74 -508.00 -22.61  @Oct. 28, 1929 260.64 - 38.33 -12.82  @Oct. 29, 1929 230.07 - 30.57 -11.73  @Nov. 6, 1929 232.13 - 25.55 - 9.92  @Aug. 12, 1932 63.11 - 5.79 - 8.40  @Oct. 26, 1987 1793.93 -156.83 - 8.04  @July 21, 1933 88.71 - 7.55 - 7.84  @Oct. 18, 1937 125.73 - 10.57 - 7.75  @Oct. 5, 1932 66.07 - 5.09 - 7.15  @Sept. 24, 1931 107.79 - 8.20 - 7.07  @July 20, 1933 96.26 - 7.32 - 7.07  @Oct. 13, 1989 2569.26 -190.58 - 6.91  Concerning your Sept. 21 page-one article on Prince Charles and the leeches: It's a few hundred years since England has been a kingdom.  It's now the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland, comprising Wales, Northern Ireland, Scotland, and . . . oh yes, England, too.  Just thought you'd like to know.  George Morton  San Diego  Ports of Call Inc. reached agreements to sell its remaining seven aircraft to buyers that weren't disclosed.  The agreements bring to a total of nine the number of planes the travel company has sold this year as part of a restructuring.  The company said a portion of the $32 million realized from the sales will be used to repay its bank debt and other obligations resulting from the currently suspended air-charter operations.  Earlier the company announced it would sell its aging fleet of Boeing Co. 707s because of increasing maintenance costs.  A consortium of private investors operating as LJH Funding Co. said it has made a $409 million cash bid for most of L.J. Hooker Corp.'s real-estate and shopping-center holdings.  The $409 million bid includes the assumption of an estimated $300 million in secured liabilities on those properties, according to those making the bid.  The group is led by Jay Shidler, chief executive officer of Shidler Investment Corp. in Honolulu, and A. Boyd Simpson, chief executive of the Atlanta-based Simpson Organization Inc. Mr. Shidler's company specializes in commercial real-estate investment and claims to have $1 billion in assets; Mr. Simpson is a developer and a former senior executive of L.J. Hooker.  "The assets are good, but they require more money and management" than can be provided in L.J. Hooker's current situation, said Mr. Simpson in an interview.  "Hooker's philosophy was to build and sell.  We want to build and hold."  L.J. Hooker, based in Atlanta, is operating with protection from its creditors under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code.  Its parent company, Hooker Corp. of Sydney, Australia, is currently being managed by a court-appointed provisional liquidator.  Sanford Sigoloff, chief executive of L.J. Hooker, said yesterday in a statement that he has not yet seen the bid but that he would review it and bring it to the attention of the creditors committee.  The $409 million bid is estimated by Mr. Simpson as representing 75% of the value of all Hooker real-estate holdings in the U.S.  Not included in the bid are Bonwit Teller or B. Altman & Co., L.J. Hooker's department-store chains.  The offer covers the massive 1.8 million-square-foot Forest Fair Mall in Cincinnati, the 800,000 square-foot Richland Fashion Mall in Columbia, S.C., and the 700,000 square-foot Thornton Town Center mall in Thornton, Colo.  The Thornton mall opened Sept. 19 with a Bigg's hypermarket as its anchor; the Columbia mall is expected to open Nov. 15.  Other Hooker properties included are a 20-story office tower in midtown Atlanta, expected to be completed next February; vacant land sites in Florida and Ohio; L.J. Hooker International, the commercial real-estate brokerage company that once did business as Merrill Lynch Commercial Real Estate, plus other shopping centers.  The consortium was put together by Hoare Govett, the London-based investment banking company that is a subsidiary of Security Pacific Corp.  "We don't anticipate any problems in raising the funding for the bid," said Allan Campbell, the head of mergers and acquisitions at Hoare Govett, in an interview.  Hoare Govett is acting as the consortium's investment bankers.  According to people familiar with the consortium, the bid was code-named Project Klute, a reference to the film "Klute" in which a prostitute played by actress Jane Fonda is saved from a psychotic businessman by a police officer named John Klute.  L.J. Hooker was a small home-building company based in Atlanta in 1979 when Mr. Simpson was hired to push it into commercial development.  The company grew modestly until 1986, when a majority position in Hooker Corp. was acquired by Australian developer George Herscu, currently Hooker's chairman.  Mr. Herscu proceeded to launch an ambitious, but ill-fated, $1 billion acquisition binge that included Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co., as well as majority positions in Merksamer Jewelers, a Sacramento chain; Sakowitz Inc., the Houston-based retailer, and Parisian Inc., the Southeast department-store chain.  Eventually Mr. Simpson and Mr. Herscu had a falling out over the direction of the company, and Mr. Simpson said he resigned in 1988.  Since then, Hooker Corp. has sold its interest in the Parisian chain back to Parisian's management and is currently attempting to sell the B. Altman & Co. chain.  In addition, Robert Sakowitz, chief executive of the Sakowitz chain, is seeking funds to buy out the Hooker interest in his company.  The Merksamer chain is currently being offered for sale by First Boston Corp.  Reached in Honolulu, Mr. Shidler said that he believes the various Hooker malls can become profitable with new management.  "These aren't mature assets, but they have the potential to be so," said Mr. Shidler.  "Managed properly, and with a long-term outlook, these can become investment-grade quality properties."  Canadian steel-ingot production totaled 291,890 metric tons in the week ended Oct. 7, up 14.8% from the preceding week's total of 254,280 tons, Statistics Canada, a federal agency, said.  The week's total was up 6.2% from 274,963 tons a year earlier.  The year-to-date total was 12,006,883 tons, up 7.8% from 11,141,711 tons a year earlier.  The Treasury plans to raise $175 million in new cash Thursday by selling about $9.75 billion of 52-week bills and redeeming $9.58 billion of maturing bills.  The bills will be dated Oct. 26 and will mature Oct. 25, 1990.  They will be available in minimum denominations of $10,000.  Bids must be received by 1 p.m. EDT Thursday at the Treasury or at Federal Reserve banks or branches.  As small investors peppered their mutual funds with phone calls over the weekend, big fund managers said they have a strong defense against any wave of withdrawals: cash.  Unlike the weekend before Black Monday, the funds weren't swamped with heavy withdrawal requests.  And many fund managers have built up cash levels and say they will be buying stock this week.  At Fidelity Investments, the nation's largest fund company, telephone volume was up sharply, but it was still at just half the level of the weekend preceding Black Monday in 1987.  The Boston firm said stock-fund redemptions were running at less than one-third the level two years ago.  As of yesterday afternoon, the redemptions represented less than 15% of the total cash position of about $2 billion of Fidelity's stock funds.  "Two years ago there were massive redemption levels over the weekend and a lot of fear around," said C. Bruce Johnstone, who runs Fidelity Investments' $5 billion Equity-Income Fund.  "This feels more like a one-shot deal.  People aren't panicking."  The test may come today.  Friday's stock market sell-off came too late for many investors to act.  Some shareholders have held off until today because any fund exchanges made after Friday's close would take place at today's closing prices.  Stock fund redemptions during the 1987 debacle didn't begin to snowball until after the market opened on Black Monday.  But fund managers say they're ready.  Many have raised cash levels, which act as a buffer against steep market declines.  Mario Gabelli, for instance, holds cash positions well above 20% in several of his funds.  Windsor Fund's John Neff and Mutual Series' Michael Price said they had raised their cash levels to more than 20% and 30%, respectively, this year.  Even Peter Lynch, manager of Fidelity's $12.7 billion Magellan Fund, the nation's largest stock fund, built up cash to 7% or $850 million.  One reason is that after two years of monthly net redemptions, the fund posted net inflows of money from investors in August and September.  "I've let the money build up," Mr. Lynch said, who added that he has had trouble finding stocks he likes.  Not all funds have raised cash levels, of course.  As a group, stock funds held 10.2% of assets in cash as of August, the latest figures available from the Investment Company Institute.  That was modestly higher than the 8.8% and 9.2% levels in August and September of 1987.  Also, persistent redemptions would force some fund managers to dump stocks to raise cash.  But a strong level of investor withdrawals is much more unlikely this time around, fund managers said.  A major reason is that investors already have sharply scaled back their purchases of stock funds since Black Monday.  Stock-fund sales have rebounded in recent months, but monthly net purchases are still running at less than half 1987 levels.  "There's not nearly as much froth," said John Bogle, chairman of Vanguard Group Inc., a big Valley Forge, Pa., fund company.  Many fund managers argue that now's the time to buy.  Vincent Bajakian, manager of the $1.8 billion Wellington Fund, added to his positions in Bristol-Myers Squibb, Woolworth and Dun & Bradstreet Friday.  And today he'll be looking to buy drug stocks like Eli Lilly, Pfizer and American Home Products whose dividend yields have been bolstered by stock declines.  Fidelity's Mr. Lynch, for his part, snapped up Southern Co. shares Friday after the stock got hammered.  If the market drops further today, he said he'll be buying blue chips such as Bristol-Myers and Kellogg.  "If they croak stocks like that," he said, it presents an opportunity that is "the kind of thing you dream about."  Major mutual-fund groups said phone calls were arriving at twice the normal weekend pace yesterday.  But most investors were seeking share prices and other information.  Trading volume was only modestly higher than normal.  Still, fund groups aren't taking any chances.  They hope to avoid the jammed phone lines and other snags that infuriated some fund investors in October 1987.  Fidelity on Saturday opened its 54 walk-in investor centers across the country.  The centers normally are closed through the weekend.  In addition, East Coast centers will open at 7:30 EDT this morning, instead of the normal 8:30.  T. Rowe Price Associates Inc. increased its staff of phone representatives to handle investor requests.  The Baltimore-based group noted that some investors moved money from stock funds to money-market funds.  But most investors seemed to be "in an information mode rather than in a transaction mode," said Steven Norwitz, a vice president.  And Vanguard, among other groups, said it was adding more phone representatives today to help investors get through.  In an unusual move, several funds moved to calm investors with recordings on their toll-free phone lines.  "We view {Friday's} market decline as offering us a buying opportunity as long-term investors," a recording at Gabelli & Co. funds said over the weekend.  The Janus Group had a similar recording for investors.  Several fund managers expect a rough market this morning before prices stabilize.  Some early selling is likely to stem from investors and portfolio managers who want to lock in this year's fat profits.  Stock funds have averaged a staggering gain of 25% through September, according to Lipper Analytical Services Inc.  Elaine Garzarelli, who runs Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.'s $335 million Sector Analysis Portfolio, predicts the market will open down at least 50 points on technical factors and "some panic selling."  But she expects prices to rebound soon and is telling investors she expects the stock market won't decline more than 10% to 15% from recent highs.  "This is not a major crash," she said.  Nevertheless, Ms. Garzarelli said she was swamped with phone calls over the weekend from nervous shareholders.  "Half of them are really scared and want to sell," she said, "but I'm trying to talk them out of it."  She added, "If they all were bullish, I'd really be upset."  The backdrop to Friday's slide was markedly different from that of the October 1987 crash, fund managers argue.  Two years ago, unlike today, the dollar was weak, interest rates were rising and the market was very overvalued, they say.  "From the investors' standpoint, institutions and individuals learned a painful lesson . . . by selling at the lows" on Black Monday, said Stephen Boesel, manager of the $580 million T. Rowe Price Growth and Income Fund.  This time, "I don't think we'll get a panic reaction."  Newport Corp. said it expects to report fiscal-first-quarter earnings of between 15 cents and 19 cents a share, somewhat below analysts' estimates of 19 cents to 23 cents.  The maker of scientific instruments and laser parts said orders fell below expectations in recent months.  A spokesman added that sales in the current quarter will about equal the yearearlier quarter's figure, when Newport reported net income of $1.7 million, or 21 cents a share, on $14.1 million in sales.  Ripples from the strike by 55,000 Machinists union members against Boeing Co. reached air carriers Friday as America West Airlines announced it will postpone its new service out of Houston because of delays in receiving aircraft from the Seattle jet maker.  Peter Otradovec, vice president for planning at the Phoenix, Ariz., carrier, said in an interview that the work stoppage at Boeing, now entering its 13th day, "has caused some turmoil in our scheduling" and that more than 500 passengers who were booked to fly out of Houston on America West would now be put on other airlines.  Mr. Otradovec said Boeing told America West that the 757 it was supposed to get this Thursday wouldn't be delivered until Nov. 7 -- the day after the airline had been planning to initiate service at Houston with four daily flights, including three nonstops to Phoenix and one nonstop to Las Vegas.  Now, those routes aren't expected to begin until Jan. 2.  Boeing is also supposed to send to America West another 757 twin-engine aircraft as well as a 737 by year's end.  Those, too, are almost certain to arrive late.  At this point, no other America West flights -- including its new service at San Antonio, Texas; Newark, N.J.; and Palmdale, Calif. -- have been affected by the delays in Boeing deliveries.  Nevertheless, the company's reaction underscores the domino effect that a huge manufacturer such as Boeing can have on other parts of the economy.  It also is sure to help the machinists put added pressure on the company.  "I just don't feel that the company can really stand or would want a prolonged walkout," Tom Baker, president of Machinists' District 751, said in an interview yesterday.  "I don't think their customers would like it very much."  America West, though, is a smaller airline and therefore more affected by the delayed delivery of a single plane than many of its competitors would be.  "I figure that American and United probably have such a hard time counting all the planes in their fleets, they might not miss one at all," Mr. Otradovec said.  Indeed, a random check Friday didn't seem to indicate that the strike was having much of an effect on other airline operations.  Southwest Airlines has a Boeing 737-300 set for delivery at the end of this month and expects to have the plane on time.  "It's so close to completion, Boeing's told us there won't be a problem," said a Southwest spokesman.  A spokesman for AMR Corp. said Boeing has assured American Airlines it will deliver a 757 on time later this month.  American is preparing to take delivery of another 757 in early December and 20 more next year and isn't anticipating any changes in that timetable.  In Seattle, a Boeing spokesman explained that the company has been in constant communication with all of its customers and that it was impossible to predict what further disruptions might be triggered by the strike.  Meanwhile, supervisors and non-striking employees have been trying to finish some 40 aircraft -- mostly 747 and 767 jumbo jets at the company's Everett, Wash., plant -- that were all but completed before the walkout.  As of Friday, four had been delivered and a fifth plane, a 747-400, was supposed to be flown out over the weekend to Air China.  No date has yet been set to get back to the bargaining table.  "We want to make sure they know what they want before they come back," said Doug Hammond, the federal mediator who has been in contact with both sides since the strike began.  The investment community, for one, has been anticipating a speedy resolution.  Though Boeing's stock price was battered along with the rest of the market Friday, it actually has risen over the last two weeks on the strength of new orders.  "The market has taken two views: that the labor situation will get settled in the short term and that things look very rosy for Boeing in the long term," said Howard Rubel, an analyst at Cyrus J. Lawrence Inc. Boeing's shares fell $4 Friday to close at $57.375 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  But Mr. Baker said he thinks the earliest a pact could be struck would be the end of this month, hinting that the company and union may resume negotiations as early as this week.  Still, he said, it's possible that the strike could last considerably longer.  "I wouldn't expect an immediate resolution to anything."  Last week, Boeing Chairman Frank Shrontz sent striking workers a letter, saying that "to my knowledge, Boeing's offer represents the best overall three-year contract of any major U.S. industrial firm in recent history."  But Mr. Baker called the letter -- and the company's offer of a 10% wage increase over the life of the pact, plus bonuses -- "very weak."  He added that the company miscalculated the union's resolve and the workers' disgust with being forced to work many hours overtime.  In separate developments:  -- Talks have broken off between Machinists representatives at Lockheed Corp. and the Calabasas, Calif., aerospace company.  The union is continuing to work through its expired contract, however.  It had planned a strike vote for next Sunday, but that has been pushed back indefinitely.  -- United Auto Workers Local 1069, which represents 3,000 workers at Boeing's helicopter unit in Delaware County, Pa., said it agreed to extend its contract on a day-by-day basis, with a 10-day notification to cancel, while it continues bargaining.  The accord expired yesterday.  -- And Boeing on Friday said it received an order from Martinair Holland for four model 767-300 wide-body jetliners valued at a total of about $326 million.  The planes, long range versions of the medium-haul twin-jet, will be delivered with Pratt & Whitney PW4060 engines.  Pratt & Whitney is a unit of United Technologies Inc. Martinair Holland is based in Amsterdam.  A Boeing spokeswoman said a delivery date for the planes is still being worked out "for a variety of reasons, but not because of the strike."  ---  Bridget O'Brian contributed to this article.  Atco Ltd. said its utilities arm is considering building new electric power plants, some valued at more than one billion Canadian dollars (US$851 million), in Great Britain and elsewhere.  C.S. Richardson, Atco's senior vice president, finance, said its 50.1%-owned Canadian Utilities Ltd. unit is reviewing cogeneration projects in eastern Canada, and conventional electric power generating plants elsewhere, including Britain, where the British government plans to allow limited competition in electrical generation from private-sector suppliers as part of its privatization program.  "The projects are big.  They can be C$1 billion plus," Mr. Richardson said.  "But we wouldn't go into them alone," and Canadian Utilities' equity stake would be small, he said.  "Ideally, we'd like to be the operator {of the project} and a modest equity investor.  Our long suit is our proven ability to operate" power plants, he said.  Mr. Richardson wouldn't offer specifics regarding Atco's proposed British project, but he said it would compete for customers with two huge British power generating companies that would be formed under the country's plan to privatize its massive water and electric utilities.  Britain's government plans to raise about #20 billion ($31.05 billion) from the sale of most of its giant water and electric utilities, beginning next month.  The planned electric utility sale, scheduled for next year, is alone expected to raise #13 billion, making it the world's largest public offering.  Under terms of the plan, independent generators would be able to compete for 15% of customers until 1994, and for another 10% between 1994 and 1998.  Canadian Utilities had 1988 revenue of C$1.16 billion, mainly from its natural gas and electric utility businesses in Alberta, where the company serves about 800,000 customers.  "There seems to be a move around the world to deregulate the generation of electricity," Mr. Richardson said, and Canadian Utilities hopes to capitalize on it.  "This is a real thrust on our utility side," he said, adding that Canadian Utilities is also mulling projects in underdeveloped countries, though he would be specific.  Canadian Utilities isn't alone in exploring power generation opportunities in Britain, in anticipation of the privatization program.  "We're certainly looking at some power generating projects in England," said Bruce Stram, vice president, corporate strategy and corporate planning, with Enron Corp., Houston, a big natural gas producer and pipeline operator.  Mr. Stram said Enron is considering building gas-fired power plants in the U.K. capable of producing about 500 megawatts of power at a cost of about $300 million to $400 million.  PSE Inc. said it expects to report third earnings of $1.3 million to $1.7 million, or 14 cents to 18 cents a share.  In the year-ago quarter, the designer and operator of cogeneration and waste heat recovery plants had net income of $326,000, or four cents a share, on revenue of about $41.4 million.  The company said the improvement is related to additional cogeneration facilities that have been put into operation.  CONCORDE trans-Atlantic flights are $2,400 to Paris and $3,200 to London.  In a Centennial Journal article Oct. 5, the fares were reversed.  (See: "Centennial Journal: 100 Years in Business --- Look, Up in the Sky, It's a...SST, 1969" -- WSJ Oct. 5, 1989)  Diamond Shamrock Offshore Partners said it had discovered gas offshore Louisiana.  The well flowed at a rate of 2.016 million cubic feet of gas a day through a 16/ 64-inch opening at depths between 5,782 and 5,824 feet.  Diamond Shamrock is the operator, with a 100% interest in the well.  Diamond Shamrock Offshore's stock rose 12.5 cents Friday to close at $8.25 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Kaufman & Broad Home Corp. said it formed a $53.4 million limited partnership subsidiary to buy land in California suitable for residential development.  The partnership, Kaufman & Broad Land Development Venture Limited Partnership, is a 50-50 joint venture with a trust created by institutional clients of Heitman Advisory Corp., a unit of Heitman Financial Corp., a real estate advisory, management and development company with offices in Chicago and Beverly Hills, Calif.  Kaufman & Broad, a home building company, declined to identify the institutional investors.  The land to be purchased by the joint venture hasn't yet received zoning and other approvals required for development, and part of Kaufman & Broad's job will be to obtain such approvals.  The partnership runs the risk that it may not get the approvals for development, but in return, it can buy land at wholesale rather than retail prices, which can result in sizable savings, said Bruce Karatz, president and chief executive officer of Kaufman & Broad.  "There are really very few companies that have adequate capital to buy properties in a raw state for cash.  Typically, developers option property, and then once they get the administrative approvals, they buy it," said Mr. Karatz, adding that he believes the joint venture is the first of its kind.  "We usually operate in that conservative manner."  By setting up the joint venture, Kaufman & Broad can take the more aggressive approach of buying raw land, while avoiding the negative impacts to its own balance sheet, Mr. Karatz said.  The company is putting up only 10% of the capital, although it is responsible for providing management, planning and processing services to the joint venture.  "This is one of the best ways to assure a pipeline of land to fuel our growth at a minimum risk to our company," Mr. Karatz said.  When the price of plastics took off in 1987, Quantum Chemical Corp. went along for the ride.  The timing of Quantum's chief executive officer, John Hoyt Stookey, appeared to be nothing less than inspired, because he had just increased Quantum's reliance on plastics.  The company outpaced much of the chemical industry as annual profit grew fivefold in two years.  Mr. Stookey said of the boom, "It's going to last a whole lot longer than anybody thinks."  But now prices have nose-dived and Quantum's profit is plummeting.  Some securities analysts are looking for no better than break-even results from the company for the third quarter, compared with year-earlier profit of $99.8 million, or $3.92 a share, on sales of $724.4 million.  The stock, having lost nearly a quarter of its value since Sept. 1, closed at $34.375 share, down $1.125, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading Friday.  To a degree, Quantum represents the new times that have arrived for producers of the so-called commodity plastics that pervade modern life.  Having just passed through one of the most profitable periods in their history, these producers now see their prices eroding.  Pricing cycles, to be sure, are nothing new for plastics producers.  And the financial decline of some looks steep only in comparison with the heady period that is just behind them.  "We were all wonderful heroes last year," says an executive at one of Quantum's competitors.  "Now we're at the bottom of the heap."  At Quantum, which is based in New York, the trouble is magnified by the company's heavy dependence on plastics.  Once known as National Distillers & Chemical Corp., the company exited the wine and spirits business and plowed more of its resources into plastics after Mr. Stookey took the chief executive's job in 1986.  Mr. Stookey, 59 years old, declined to be interviewed for this article, but he has consistently argued that over the long haul -- across both the peaks and the troughs of the plastics market -- Quantum will prosper through its new direction.  Quantum's lot is mostly tied to polyethylene resin, used to make garbage bags, milk jugs, housewares, toys and meat packaging, among other items.  In the U.S. polyethylene market, Quantum has claimed the largest share, about 20%.  But its competitors -- including Dow Chemical Co., Union Carbide Corp. and several oil giants -- have much broader business interests and so are better cushioned against price swings.  When the price of polyethylene moves a mere penny a pound, Quantum's annual profit fluctuates by about 85 cents a share, provided no other variables are changing.  In recent months the price of polyethylene, even more than that of other commodity plastics, has taken a dive.  Benchmark grades, which still sold for as much as 50 cents a pound last spring, have skidded to between 35 cents and 40 cents.  Meanwhile, the price of ethylene, the chemical building block of polyethylene, hasn't dropped nearly so fast.  That discrepancy hurts Quantum badly, because its own plants cover only about half of its ethylene needs.  By many accounts, an early hint of a price rout in the making came at the start of this year.  China, which had been putting in huge orders for polyethylene, abruptly halted them.  Calculating that excess polyethylene would soon be sloshing around the world, other buyers then bet that prices had peaked and so began to draw down inventories rather than order new product.  Kenneth Mitchell, director of Dow's polyethylene business, says producers were surprised to learn how much inventories had swelled throughout the distribution chain as prices spiraled up.  "People were even hoarding bags," he says.  Now producers hope prices have hit bottom.  They recently announced increases of a few cents a pound to take effect in the next several weeks.  No one knows, however, whether the new posted prices will stick once producers and customers start to haggle.  One doubter is George Krug, a chemical-industry analyst at Oppenheimer & Co. and a bear on plastics stocks.  Noting others' estimates of when price increases can be sustained, he remarks, "Some say October.  Some say November.  I say 1992."  He argues that efforts to firm up prices will be undermined by producers' plans to expand production capacity.  A quick turnaround is crucial to Quantum because its cash requirements remain heavy.  The company is trying to carry out a three-year, $1.3 billion plant-expansion program started this year.  At the same time, its annual payments on long-term debt will more than double from a year ago to about $240 million, largely because of debt taken on to pay a $50-a-share special dividend earlier this year.  Quantum described the payout at the time as a way for it to share the bonanza with its holders, because its stock price wasn't reflecting the huge profit increases.  Some analysts saw the payment as an effort also to dispel takeover speculation.  Whether a cash crunch might eventually force the company to cut its quarterly dividend, raised 36% to 75 cents a share only a year ago, has become a topic of intense speculation on Wall Street since Mr. Stookey deflected dividend questions in a Sept. 29 meeting with analysts.  Some viewed his response -- that company directors review the dividend regularly -- as nothing more than the standard line from executives.  But others came away thinking he had given something less than his usual straight-from-the-shoulder performance.  In any case, on the day of the meeting, Quantum's shares slid $2.625 to $36.625 in Big Board trading.  On top of everything else, Quantum confronts a disaster at its plant in Morris, Ill.  After an explosion idled the plant in June, the company progressed in September to within 12 hours of completing the drawn-out process of restarting it.  Then a second explosion occurred.  Two workers died and six remain in the hospital.  This human toll adds the most painful dimension yet to the sudden change in Quantum's fortunes.  Until this year, the company had been steadily lowering its accident rate and picking up trade-group safety awards.  A prolonged production halt at the plant could introduce another imponderable into Quantum's financial future.  When a plant has just been running flat out to meet demand, calculating lost profit and thus claims under business-interruption insurance is straightforward.  But the numbers become trickier -- and subject to dickering between insured and insurer -- when demand is shifting.  "You say you could have sold X percent of this product and Y percent of that," recalls Theodore Semegran, an analyst at Shearson Lehman Hutton who went through this exercise during his former career as a chemical engineer.  "And then you still have to negotiate."  Quantum hopes the Morris plant, where limited production got under way last week, will resume full operation by year's end.  The plant usually accounts for 20% to 25% of Quantum's polyethylene production and 50% of its ethylene production.  Not everything looks grim for Quantum.  The plant expansion should strengthen the company's sway in the polyethylene business, where market share is often taken through sheer capacity.  By lifting ethylene production, the expansion will also lower the company's raw material costs.  Quantum is also tightening its grip on its one large business outside chemicals, propane marketing.  Through a venture with its investment banker, First Boston Corp., Quantum completed in August an acquisition of Petrolane Inc. in a transaction valued at $1.18 billion.  Petrolane is the second-largest propane distributor in the U.S.  The largest, Suburban Propane, was already owned by Quantum.  Still, Quantum has a crisis to get past right now.  Some analysts speculate the weakening stock may yet attract a suitor.  The name surfacing in rumors is British Petroleum Co., which is looking to expand its polyethylene business in the U.S.  Asked about a bid for Quantum, a BP spokesman says, "We pretty much have a policy of not commenting on rumors, and I think that falls in that category."  RJR Nabisco Inc. is disbanding its division responsible for buying network advertising time, just a month after moving 11 of the group's 14 employees to New York from Atlanta.  A spokesman for the New York-based food and tobacco giant, taken private earlier this year in a $25 billion leveraged buy-out by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co., confirmed that it is shutting down the RJR Nabisco Broadcast unit, and dismissing its 14 employees, in a move to save money.  The spokesman said RJR is discussing its network-buying plans with its two main advertising firms, FCB/Leber Katz and McCann Erickson.  "We found with the size of our media purchases that an ad agency could do just as good a job at significantly lower cost," said the spokesman, who declined to specify how much RJR spends on network television time.  An executive close to the company said RJR is spending about $140 million on network television time this year, down from roughly $200 million last year.  The spokesman said the broadcast unit will be disbanded Dec. 1, and the move won't affect RJR's print, radio and spot-television buying practices.  The broadcast group had been based in New York until a year ago, when RJR's previous management moved it to Atlanta, the company's headquarters before this summer.  One employee with the group said RJR moved 11 employees of the group back to New York in September because "there was supposed to be a future."  He said the company hired three more buyers for the unit within the past two weeks, wooing them from jobs with advertising agencies.  The RJR spokesman said the company moved the 11 employees to New York last month because the group had then been in the midst of purchasing ad time for the networks' upcoming season.  "The studies {on closing the unit} couldn't be completed until now," he said.  The group's president, Peter Chrisanthopoulos, wasn't in his office Friday afternoon to comment.  The U.S., which is finalizing its steel-import quotas, is allocating a larger share of its steel market to developing and newly industrialized countries which have relatively unsubsidized steel industries.  Meanwhile, the U.S. has negotiated a significant cut in Japan's steel quota, and made only a minor increase to the steel allotment for the European Community.  Brazil, similar to Mexico and South Korea, is expected to negotiate a somewhat bigger share of the U.S. market than it had under the previous five-year steel quotas, which expired Sept. 30.  Brazil and Venezuela are the only two countries that haven't completed steel talks with the U.S. for the year ending Oct. 1, 1990.  In recent years, U.S. steelmakers have supplied about 80% of the 100 million tons of steel used annually by the nation.  Of the remaining 20% needed, the steel-quota negotiations allocate about 15% to foreign suppliers, with the difference supplied mainly by Canada -- which isn't included in the quota program.  Other countries that don't have formal steel quotas with the U.S., such as Taiwan, Sweden and Argentina, also have supplied steel.  Some of these countries have in recent years made informal agreements with the U.S. that are similar to quotas.  The Bush administration earlier this year said it would extend steel quotas, known as voluntary restraint agreements, until March 31, 1992.  It also said it would use that two-and-a-half year period to work toward an international consensus on freeing up the international steel trade, which has been notoriously managed, subsidized and protected by governments.  The U.S. termed its plan, a "trade liberalization program," despite the fact that it is merely an extension.  Mexico, which was one of the first countries to conclude its steel talks with the U.S., virtually doubled its quota to 0.95% of the U.S. steel market from 0.48% under the previous quotas.  South Korea, which had 1.9% under the previous quotas, is set to get a small increase to about 1.95%.  That increase rises to slightly more than 2% of the U.S. market if a joint Korean-U.S. steel project is included.  Meanwhile, Brazil is expected to increase its allowance from the 1.43% share it has had in recent years.  The EC and Japan -- the U.S.'s largest steel suppliers -- haven't been filling their quotas to the full extent.  The EC steel industry, which has been coping with strong European demand, has been supplying about 5% of the U.S. market compared with recent quotas of about 6.7%.  Japan has been shipping steel to total about 4.5% of the U.S. market compared with a quota of 5.9%.  In the recent talks, the EC had its quota increased about 300,000 tons, to 7% of the U.S. market from 6.7% in 1988.  But its quota has been as high as 6.9% in 1984.  Japan, however, has agreed to cut its quota to about 5% from 5.9% previously.  Japan, the EC, Brazil, Mexico and South Korea provide about 80% of the steel imported to the U.S. under the quota program.  The balance is supplied by a host of smaller exporters, such as Australia and Venezuela.  The U.S. had about an extra 2% of the domestic steel market to give to foreign suppliers in its quota talks.  That was essentially made up of a 1% increase in the overall quota program and 1% from cutting Japan's allowance.  Negotiators from the White House trade office will repeat these quota negotiations next year when they will have another 1% of the U.S. steel market to allocate.  These optional 1%-a-year increases to the steel quota program are built into the Bush administration's steel-quota program to give its negotiators leverage with foreign steel suppliers to try to get them to withdraw subsidies and protectionism from their own steel industries.  Elcotel Inc. expects fiscal second-quarter earnings to trail 1988 results, but anticipates that several new products will lead to a "much stronger" performance in its second half.  Elcotel, a telecommunications company, had net income of $272,000, or five cents a share, in its year-earlier second quarter, ended Sept. 30.  Revenue totaled $5 million.  George Pierce, chairman and chief executive officer, said in an interview that earnings in the most recent quarter will be about two cents a share on revenue of just under $4 million.  The lower results, Mr. Pierce said, reflect a 12-month decline in industry sales of privately owned pay telephones, Elcotel's primary business.  Although Mr. Pierce expects that line of business to strengthen in the next year, he said Elcotel will also benefit from moving into other areas.  Foremost among those is the company's entrance into the public facsimile business, Mr. Pierce said.  Within the next year, Elcotel expects to place 10,000 fax machines, made by Minolta in Japan, in hotels, municipal buildings, drugstores and other public settings around the country.  Elcotel will provide a credit-card reader for the machines to collect, store and forward billing data.  Mr. Pierce said Elcotel should realize a minimum of $10 of recurring net earnings for each machine each month.  Elcotel has also developed an automatic call processor that will make further use of the company's system for automating and handling credit-card calls and collect calls.  Automatic call processors will provide that system for virtually any telephone, Mr. Pierce said, not just phones produced by Elcotel.  The company will also be producing a new line of convenience telephones, which don't accept coins, for use in hotel lobbies, office lobbies, hospitality lounges and similar settings.  Mr. Pierce estimated that the processors and convenience phones would produce about $5 of recurring net earnings for each machine each month.  Britain's retail price index rose 0.7% in September from August and was up 7.6% for the year, the Central Statistical Office said.  Quest Medical Inc. said it adopted a shareholders' rights plan in which rights to purchase shares of common stock will be distributed as a dividend to shareholders of record as of Oct. 23.  The company said the plan wasn't adopted in response to any known offers for Quest, a maker and marketer of hospital products.  The rights allow shareholders to purchase Quest stock at a discount if any person or group acquires more than 15% of the company's common stock or announces a tender offer.  Measuring cups may soon be replaced by tablespoons in the laundry room.  Procter & Gamble Co. plans to begin testing next month a superconcentrated detergent that will require only a few spoonfuls per washload.  The move stems from lessons learned in Japan where local competitors have had phenomenal success with concentrated soapsuds.  It also marks P&G's growing concern that its Japanese rivals, such as Kao Corp., may bring their superconcentrates to the U.S.  The Cincinnati consumer-products giant got clobbered two years ago in Japan when Kao introduced a powerful detergent, called Attack, which quickly won a 30% stake in the Japanese markets.  "They don't want to get caught again," says one industry watcher.  Retailers in Phoenix, Ariz., say P&G's new powdered detergent -- to be called Cheer with Color Guard -- will be on shelves in that market by early November.  A P&G spokeswoman confirmed that shipments to Phoenix started late last month.  She said the company will study results from this market before expanding to others.  Superconcentrates aren't entirely new for P&G.  The company introduced a superconcentrated Lemon Cheer in Japan after watching the success of Attack.  When Attack hit the shelves in 1987, P&G's share of the Japanese market fell to about 8% from more than 20%.  With the help of Lemon Cheer, P&G's share is now estimated to be 12%.  While the Japanese have embraced the compact packaging and convenience of concentrated products, the true test for P&G will be in the $4 billion U.S. detergent market, where growth is slow and liquids have gained prominence over powders.  The company may have chosen to market the product under the Cheer name since it's already expanded its best-selling Tide into 16 different varieties, including this year's big hit, Tide with Bleach.  With superconcentrates, however, it isn't always easy to persuade consumers that less is more; many people tend to dump too much detergent into the washing machine, believing that it takes a cup of powder to really clean the laundry.  In the early 1980s, P&G tried to launch here a concentrated detergent under the Ariel brand name that it markets in Europe.  But the product, which wasn't as concentrated as the new Cheer, bombed in a market test in Denver and was dropped.  P&G and others also have tried repeatedly to hook consumers on detergent and fabric softener combinations in pouches, but they haven't sold well, despite the convenience.  But P&G contends the new Cheer is a unique formula that also offers an ingredient that prevents colors from fading.  And retailers are expected to embrace the product, in part because it will take up less shelf space.  "When shelf space was cheap, bigger was better," says Hugh Zurkuhlen, an analyst at Salomon Bros.  But with so many brands vying for space, that's no longer the case.  If the new Cheer sells well, the trend toward smaller packaging is likely to accelerate as competitors follow with their own superconcentrates.  Then retailers "will probably push the {less-established} brands out altogether," he says.  Competition is bound to get tougher if Kao introduces a product like Attack in the U.S.  To be sure, Kao wouldn't have an easy time taking U.S. market share away from the mighty P&G, which has about 23% of the market.  Kao officials previously have said they are interested in selling detergents in the U.S., but so far the company has focused on acquisitions, such as last year's purchase of Andrew Jergens Co., a Cincinnati hand-lotion maker.  It also has a product-testing facility in California.  Some believe P&G's interest in a superconcentrated detergent goes beyond the concern for the Japanese.  "This is something P&G would do with or without Kao," says Mr. Zurkuhlen.  With economic tension between the U.S. and Japan worsening, many Japanese had feared last week's visit from U.S. Trade Representative Carla Hills.  They expected a new barrage of demands that Japan do something quickly to reduce its trade surplus with the U.S.  Instead, they got a discussion of the need for the U.S. and Japan to work together and of the importance of the long-term view.  Mrs. Hills' first trip to Japan as America's chief trade negotiator had a completely different tone from last month's visit by Commerce Secretary Robert A. Mosbacher.  Mr. Mosbacher called for concrete results by next spring in negotiations over fundamental Japanese business practices that supposedly inhibit free trade.  He said such results should be "measurable in dollars and cents" in reducing the U.S. trade deficit with Japan.  But Mrs. Hills, speaking at a breakfast meeting of the American Chamber of Commerce in Japan on Saturday, stressed that the objective "is not to get definitive action by spring or summer, it is rather to have a blueprint for action."  She added that she expected "perhaps to have a down payment . . . some small step to convince the American people and the Japanese people that we're moving in earnest."  How such remarks translate into policy won't become clear for months.  American and Japanese officials offered several theories for the difference in approach betwen Mr. Mosbacher and Mrs. Hills.  Many called it simply a contrast in styles.  But some saw it as a classic negotiating tactic.  Others said the Bush administration may feel the rhetoric on both sides is getting out of hand.  And some said it reflected the growing debate in Washington over pursuing free trade with Japan versus some kind of managed trade.  Asked to compare her visit to Mr. Mosbacher's, Mrs. Hills replied: "I didn't hear every word he spoke, but as a general proposition, I think we have a very consistent trade strategy in the Bush administration."  Yet more than one American official who sat in with her during three days of talks with Japanese officials said her tone often was surprisingly "conciliatory."  "I think my line has been very consistent," Mrs. Hills said at a news conference Saturday afternoon.  "I am painted sometimes as ferocious, perhaps because I have a ferocious list of statutes to implement.  I don't feel very ferocious.  I don't feel either hard or soft.  I feel committed to the program of opening markets and expanding trade."  When she met the local press for the first time on Friday, Mrs. Hills firmly reiterated the need for progress in removing barriers to trade in forest products, satellites and supercomputers, three areas targeted under the Super 301 provision of the 1988 trade bill.  She highlighted exclusionary business practices that the U.S. government has identified.  But her main thrust was to promote the importance of world-wide free trade and open competition.  She said the trade imbalance was mainly due to macroeconomic factors and shouldn't be tackled by setting quantitative targets.  At her news conference for Japanese reporters, one economics journalist summed up the Japanese sense of relief.  "My impression was that you would be a scary old lady," he said, drawing a few nervous chuckles from his colleagues.  "But I am relieved to see that you are beautiful and gentle and intelligent and a person of integrity."  Mrs. Hills' remarks did raise questions, at least among some U.S. officials, about what exactly her stance is on U.S. access to the Japanese semiconductor market.  The U.S. share of the Japanese market has been stuck around 10% for years.  Many Americans have interpreted a 1986 agreement as assuring U.S. companies a 20% share by 1991, but the Japanese have denied making any such promise.  At one of her news conferences, Mrs. Hills said, "I believe we can do much better than 20%."  But she stressed, "I am against managed trade.  I will not enter into an agreement that stipulates to a percentage of the market."  Traditional Industries Inc. said it expects to report a net loss for the fourth quarter that ended June 30 and is seeking new financing.  The seller of photographic products and services said it is considering a number of financing alternatives, including seeking increases in its credit lines.  Traditional declined to estimate the amount of the loss and wouldn't say if it expects to show a profit for the year.  In the year ended June 30, 1988, Traditional reported net income of $4.9 million, or $1.21 a share.  The company didn't break out its fourth-quarter results.  In the latest nine months net income was $4.7 million, or $1.31 a share, on revenue of $44.3 million.  Separately, the company said it would file a delayed fiscal-year report with the Securities and Exchange Commission "within approximately 45 days."  It said the delay resulted from difficulties in resolving its accounting of a settlement with the Federal Trade Commission.  Under an agreement filed in federal court in August to settle FTC objections to some Traditional sales practices, Traditional said it would establish a $250,000 trust fund to provide refunds to certain customers.  Information International Inc. said it was sued by a buyer of its computerized newspaper-publishing system, alleging that the company failed to correct deficiencies in the system.  A spokesman for Information International said the lawsuit by two units of Morris Communications Corp. seeks restitution of the system's about $3 million purchase price and cancellation of a software license provided by the Morris units to Information International for alleged failure to pay royalties.  Information International said it believes that the complaints, filed in federal court in Georgia, are without merit.  Closely held Morris Communications is based in Augusta, Ga.  The units that filed the suit are Southeastern Newspapers Corp. and Florida Publishing Co.  Syms Corp. completed the sale of its A. Sulka & Co. subsidiary, a men's luxury haberdashery, to Luxco Investments.  Terms weren't disclosed.  As Syms's "core business of off-price retailing grows, a small subsidiary that is operationally unrelated becomes a difficult distraction," said Marcy Syms, president of the parent, in a statement.  A spokeswoman said Sulka operates a total of seven stores in the U.S. and overseas.  Syms operates 25 off-price apparel stores in the U.S.  The oil industry's middling profits could persist through the rest of the year.  Major oil companies in the next few days are expected to report much less robust earnings than they did for the third quarter a year ago, largely reflecting deteriorating chemical prices and gasoline profitability.  The gasoline picture may improve this quarter, but chemicals are likely to remain weak, industry executives and analysts say, reducing chances that profits could equal their year-earlier performance.  The industry is "seeing a softening somewhat in volume and certainly in price in petrochemicals," Glenn Cox, president of Phillips Petroleum Co., said in an interview.  "That change will obviously impact third and fourth quarter earnings" for the industry in general, he added.  He didn't forecast Phillips's results.  But securities analysts say Phillips will be among the companies hard-hit by weak chemical prices and will probably post a drop in third-quarter earnings.  So, too, many analysts predict, will Exxon Corp., Chevron Corp. and Amoco Corp.  Typical is what happened to the price of ethylene, a major commodity chemical produced in vast amounts by many oil companies.  It has plunged 13% since July to around 26 cents a pound.  A year ago ethylene sold for 33 cents, peaking at about 34 cents last December.  A big reason for the chemical price retreat is overexpansion.  Beginning in mid-1987, prices began accelerating as a growing U.S. economy and the weak dollar spurred demand.  Companies added capacity furiously.  Now, greatly increased supplies are on the market, while the dollar is stronger, and domestic economic growth is slower.  Third-quarter profits from gasoline were weaker.  "Refining margins were so good in the third quarter of last year and generally not very good this year," said William Randol, a securities analyst at First Boston Corp.  Oil company refineries ran flat out to prepare for a robust holiday driving season in July and August that didn't materialize.  The excess supply pushed gasoline prices down in that period.  In addition, crude oil prices were up some from a year earlier, further pressuring profitability.  Refiners say margins picked up in September, and many industry officials believe gasoline profits will rebound this quarter, though still not to the level of 1988's fourth quarter.  During the 1988 second half, many companies posted record gasoline and chemical profits.  Crude oil production may turn out to be the most surprising element of companies' earnings this year.  Prices -- averaging roughly $2 a barrel higher in the third quarter than a year earlier -- have stayed well above most companies' expectations.  Demand has been much stronger than anticipated, and it typically accelerates in the fourth quarter.  "We could see higher oil prices this year," said Bryan Jacoboski, an analyst at PaineWebber Inc.  That will translate into sharply higher production profits, particularly compared with last year when oil prices steadily fell to below $13 a barrel in the fourth quarter.  While oil prices have been better than expected, natural gas prices have been worse.  In the third quarter, they averaged about 5% less than they were in 1988.  The main reason remains weather.  Last summer was notable for a heat wave and drought that caused utilities to burn more natural gas to feed increased electrical demand from air conditioning use.  This summer, on the other hand, had milder weather than usual.  "We've been very disappointed in the performance of natural gas prices," said Mr. Cox, Phillips's president.  "The lagging gas price is not going to assist fourth quarter performance as many had expected."  Going into the fourth quarter, natural gas prices are anywhere from 8% to 17% lower than a year earlier.  For instance, natural gas currently produced along the Gulf Coast is selling on the spot market for around $1.47 a thousand cubic feet, down 13% from $1.69 a thousand cubic feet a year ago.  The Bush administration, trying to blunt growing demands from Western Europe for a relaxation of controls on exports to the Soviet bloc, is questioning whether Italy's Ing.  C. Olivetti & Co. supplied militarily valuable technology to the Soviets.  Most of the Western European members of Coordinating Committee on Multilateral Export Controls, the unofficial forum through which the U.S. and its allies align their export-control policies, are expected to argue for more liberal export rules at a meeting to be held in Paris Oct. 25 and 26.  They plan to press specifically for a relaxation of rules governing exports of machine tools, computers and other high-technology products.  But the Bush administration says it wants to see evidence that all Cocom members are complying fully with existing export-control procedures before it will support further liberalization.  To make its point, it is challenging the Italian government to explain reports that Olivetti may have supplied the Soviet Union with sophisticated computer-driven devices that could be used to build parts for combat aircraft.  The London Sunday Times, which first reported the U.S. concerns, cited a U.S. intelligence report as the source of the allegations that Olivetti exported $25 million in "embargoed, state-of-the-art, flexible manufacturing systems to the Soviet aviation industry."  Olivetti reportedly began shipping these tools in 1984.  A State Department spokesman acknowledged that the U.S. is discussing the allegations with the Italian government and Cocom, but declined to confirm any details.  Italian President Francesco Cossiga promised a quick investigation into whether Olivetti broke Cocom rules.  President Bush called his attention to the matter during the Italian leader's visit here last week.  Olivetti has denied that it violated Cocom rules, asserting that the reported shipments were properly licensed by the Italian authorities.  Although the legality of these sales is still an open question, the disclosure couldn't be better timed to support the position of export-control hawks in the Pentagon and the intelligence community.  "It seems to me that a story like this breaks just before every important Cocom meeting," said a Washington lobbyist for a number of U.S. computer companies.  The Bush administration has sent conflicting signals about its export-control policies, reflecting unhealed divisions among several competing agencies.  Last summer, Mr. Bush moved the administration in the direction of gradual liberalization when he told a North Atlantic Treaty Organization meeting that he would allow some exceptions to the Cocom embargo of strategic goods.  But more recently, the Pentagon and the Commerce Department openly feuded over the extent to which Cocom should liberalize exports of personal computers to the bloc.  However, these agencies generally agree that the West should be cautious about any further liberalization.  "There's no evidence that the Soviet program to (illegally) acquire Western technology has diminished," said a State Department spokesman.  Salomon Brothers International Ltd., a British subsidiary of Salomon Inc., announced it will issue warrants on shares of Hong Kong Telecommunications Ltd.  The move closely follows a similar offer by Salomon of warrants for shares of Hongkong & Shanghai Banking Corp.  Under the latest offer, HK$62.5 million (US$8 million) of three-year warrants will be issued in London, each giving buyers the right to buy one Hong Kong Telecommunications share at a price to be determined Friday.  The 50 million warrants will be priced at HK$1.25 each and are expected to carry a premium to the share price of about 26%.  In trading on the Stock Exchange of Hong Kong, the shares closed Wednesday at HK$4.80 each.  At this price, the shares would have to rise above HK$6.05 for subscribers to Salomon's issue to profitably convert their warrants.  While Hong Kong companies have in the past issued warrants on their own shares, Salomon's warrants are the first here to be issued by a third party.  Salomon will "cover" the warrants by buying sufficient shares, or options to purchase shares, to cover its entire position.  Bankers said warrants for Hong Kong stocks are attractive because they give foreign investors, wary of volatility in the colony's stock market, an opportunity to buy shares without taking too great a risk.  The Hong Kong Telecommunications warrants should be attractive to buyers in Europe, the bankers added, because the group is one of a handful of blue-chip stocks on the Hong Kong market that has international appeal.  Financial Corp. of Santa Barbara filed suit against former stock speculator Ivan F. Boesky and Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., charging they defrauded the thrift by concealing their relationship when persuading it to buy $284 million in high-yield, high-risk junk bonds.  In a suit filed in federal court Thursday, the S&L alleged that a "disproportionate number" of the bonds it purchased in 1984 declined in value.  Financial Corp. purchased the bonds, the suit alleged, after Mr. Boesky and Drexel negotiated an agreement for Vagabond Hotels to purchase a 51% stake in the thrift for about $34 million.  Vagabond Hotels was controlled by Mr. Boesky, who currently is serving a prison term for securities violations.  Officials at Drexel said they hadn't seen the suit and thus couldn't comment.  In addition to $33 million compensatory damages, the suit seeks $100 million in punitive damages.  Also named in the suit is Ivan F. Boesky Corp. and Northview Corp., the successor company to Vagabonds Hotels.  Northview officials couldn't be located.  Financial Corp. said it agreed to buy the bonds after a representative of Ivan F. Boesky Corp. visited it in November 1983 and said Financial Corp. could improve its financial condition by purchasing the bonds.  Shortly before the visit, Mr. Boesky and Drexel representives had met with Financial Corp. officials and had signed a letter of intent to acquire the 51% stake in the company.  However, the agreement was canceled in June 1984.  Financial Corp. purchased the bonds in at least 70 different transactions in 1984 and since then has realized $11 million in losses on them, the company said.  Ideal Basic Industries Inc. said its directors reached an agreement in principle calling for HOFI North America Inc. to combine its North American cement holdings with Ideal in a transaction that will leave Ideal's minority shareholders with 12.8% of the combined company.  HOFI, the North American holding company of Swiss concern Holderbank Financiere Glaris Ltd., previously proposed combining its 100% stake in St. Lawrence Cement Inc. and its 60% stake in Dundee Cement Co. with its 67% stake in Ideal.  But HOFI's first offer would have given Ideal's other shareholders about 10% of the combined company.  Ideal's directors rejected that offer, although they said they endorsed the merger proposal.  Under the agreement, HOFI will own 87.2% of the combined company.  Ideal's current operations will represent about 39.2% of the combined company.  The transaction is subject to a definitive agreement and approval by Ideal shareholders.  Ideal said it expects to complete the transaction early next year.  While corn and soybean prices have slumped well below their drought-induced peaks of 1988, wheat prices remain stubbornly high.  And they're likely to stay that way for months to come, analysts say.  For one thing, even with many farmers planting more winter wheat this year than last, tight wheat supplies are likely to support prices well into 1990, the analysts say.  And if rain doesn't fall soon across many of the Great Plains' wheat-growing areas, yields in the crop now being planted could be reduced, further squeezing supplies.  Also supporting prices are expectations that the Soviet Union will place substantial buying orders over the next few months.  By next May 31, stocks of U.S. wheat to be carried over into the next season -- before the winter wheat now being planted is harvested -- are projected to drop to 443 million bushels.  That would be the lowest level since the early 1970s.  Stocks were 698 million bushels on May 31 of this year.  In response to dwindling domestic supplies, Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter last month said the U.S. government would slightly increase the number of acres farmers can plant in wheat for next year and still qualify for federal support payments.  The government estimates that the new plan will boost production next year by about 66 million bushels.  It now estimates production for next year at just under 2.6 billion bushels, compared with this year's estimated 2.04 billion and a drought-stunted 1.81 billion in 1988.  But the full effect on prices of the winter wheat now being planted won't be felt until the second half of next year.  Until then, limited stocks are likely to keep prices near the $4-a-bushel level, analysts say.  On the Chicago Board of Trade Friday, wheat for December delivery settled at $4.0675 a bushel, unchanged.  In theory at least, tight supplies next spring could leave the wheat futures market susceptible to a supply-demand squeeze, said Daniel Basse, a futures analyst with AgResource Co. in Chicago.  Such a situation can wreak havoc, as was shown by the emergency that developed in soybean futures trading this summer on the Chicago Board of Trade.  In July, the CBOT ordered Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A. to liquidate futures positions equal to about 23 million bushels of soybeans.  The exchange said it feared that some members wouldn't be able to find enough soybeans to deliver and would have to default on their contractual obligation to the Italian conglomerate, which had refused requests to reduce its holdings.  Ferruzzi has denied it was trying to manipulate the soybean futures market.  Unseasonably hot, dry weather across large portions of the Great Plains and in wheat-growing areas in Washington and Oregon is threatening to reduce the yield from this season's winter wheat crop, said Conrad Leslie, a futures analyst and head of Leslie Analytical in Chicago.  For example, in the Oklahoma panhandle, 40% or more of the topsoil is short of moisture.  That figure climbs to about 47% in wheat-growing portions of Kansas, he said.  The Soviet Union hasn't given any clear indication of its wheat purchase plans, but many analysts expect Moscow to place sizable orders for U.S. wheat in the next few months, further supporting prices.  "Wheat prices will increasingly pivot off of Soviet demand" in coming weeks, predicted Richard Feltes, vice president, research, for Refco Inc. in Chicago.  Looking ahead to other commodity markets this week:  Orange Juice  Traders will be watching to see how long and how far the price decline that began Friday will go.  Late Thursday, after the close of trading, the market received what would normally have been a bullish U.S. Department of Agriculture estimate of the 1989-90 Florida orange crop.  It was near the low range of estimates, at 130 million 90-pound boxes, compared with 146.6 million boxes last season.  However, as expected, Brazil waited for the crop estimate to come out and then cut the export price of its juice concentrate to about $1.34 a pound from around $1.55.  Friday's consequent selling of futures contracts erased whatever supportive effect the U.S. report might have had and sent the November orange juice contract down as much as 6.55 cents a pound at one time.  It settled with a loss of 4.95 cents at $1.3210 a pound.  Brazilian juice, after a delay caused by drought at the start of its crop season, is beginning to arrive in the U.S. in large quantities.  Brazil wants to stimulate demand for its product, which is going to be in plentiful supply.  The price cut, one analyst said, appeared to be aimed even more at Europe, where consumption of Brazilian juice has fallen.  It's a dollar-priced product, and the strong dollar has made it more expensive in Europe, the analyst said.  New York futures prices have dropped significantly from more than $2 a pound at midyear.  Barring a cold snap or other crop problems in the growing areas, downward pressure on prices is likely to continue into January, when harvesting and processing of oranges in Florida reach their peak, the analyst said.  Energy  Although some analysts look for profit-taking in the wake of Friday's leap in crude oil prices, last week's rally is generally expected to continue this week.  "I would continue to look for a stable crude market, at least in futures" trading, said William Hinton, an energy futures broker with Stotler & Co.  Friday capped a week of steadily rising crude oil prices in both futures and spot markets.  On the New York Mercantile Exchange, West Texas Intermediate crude for November delivery finished at $20.89 a barrel, up 42 cents on the day.  On European markets, meanwhile, spot prices of North Sea crudes were up 35 to 75 cents a barrel.  "This market still wants to go higher," said Nauman Barakat, a first vice president at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  He predicted that the November contract will reach $21.50 a barrel or more on the New York Mercantile Exchange.  There has been little news to account for such buoyancy in the oil markets.  Analysts generally cite a lack of bearish developments as well as rumors of a possible tightening of supplies of some fuels and crudes.  There also are recurring reports that the Soviet Union is having difficulties with its oil exports and that Nigeria has about reached its production limit and can't produce as much as it could sell.  Many traders foresee a tightening of near-term supplies, particularly of high-quality crudes such as those produced in the North Sea and in Nigeria.  If a hostile predator emerges for Saatchi & Saatchi Co., co-founders Charles and Maurice Saatchi will lead a management buy-out attempt, an official close to the company said.  Financing for any takeover attempt may be problematic in the wake of Friday's stock-market sell-off in New York and turmoil in the junk-bond market.  But the beleaguered British advertising and consulting giant, which last week named a new chief executive officer to replace Maurice Saatchi, has been the subject of intense takeover speculation for weeks.  Last week, Saatchi's largest shareholder, Southeastern Asset Management, said it had been approached by one or more third parties interested in a possible restructuring.  And Carl Spielvogel, chief executive officer of Saatchi's big Backer Spielvogel Bates advertising unit, said he had offered to lead a management buy-out of the company, but was rebuffed by Charles Saatchi.  Mr. Spielvogel said he wouldn't launch a hostile bid.  The executive close to Saatchi & Saatchi said that "if a bidder came up with a ludicrously high offer, a crazy offer which Saatchi knew it couldn't beat, it would have no choice but to recommend it to shareholders.  But {otherwise} it would undoubtedly come back" with an offer by management.  The executive said any buy-out would be led by the current board, whose chairman is Maurice Saatchi and whose strategic guiding force is believed to be Charles Saatchi.  Mr. Spielvogel isn't part of the board, nor are any of the other heads of Saatchi's big U.S.-based ad agencies.  The executive didn't name any price, but securities analysts have said Saatchi would fetch upward of $1.3 billion.  The executive denied speculation that Saatchi was bringing in the new chief executive officer only to clean up the company financially so that the brothers could lead a buy-back.  That speculation abounded Friday as industry executives analyzed the appointment of the new chief executive, Robert Louis-Dreyfus, who joins Saatchi and becomes a member of its board on Jan. 1.  Mr. Louis-Dreyfus, formerly chief executive of the pharmaceutical research firm IMS International Inc., has a reputation as a savvy financial manager, and will be charged largely with repairing Saatchi's poor financial state.  Asked about the speculation that Mr. Louis-Dreyfus has been hired to pave the way for a buy-out by the brothers, the executive replied, "That isn't the reason Dreyfus has been brought in.  He was brought in to turn around the company."  Separately, several Saatchi agency clients said they believe the company's management shakeup will have little affect on them.  "It hasn't had any impact on us, nor do we expect it to," said a spokeswoman for Miller Brewing Co., a major client of Backer Spielvogel.  John Lampe, director of advertising at PaineWebber Inc., a Saatchi & Saatchi Advertising client, said: "We have no problem with the announcement, because we don't know what change it's going to bring about.  We aren't going to change agencies because of a change in London."  Executives at Backer Spielvogel client Avis Inc., as well as at Saatchi client Philips Lighting Co., also said they saw no effect.  Executives at Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., a Backer Spielvogel client that is reviewing its account, declined comment.  Mr. Spielvogel had said that Prudential-Bache was prepared to finance either a management buy-out and restructuring, or a buy-out of Backer Spielvogel alone, led by him.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNT: California's Glendale Federal Bank awarded its $12 million to $15 million account to the Los Angeles office of Omnicom Group's BBDO agency.  The account was previously handled by Davis, Ball & Colombatto Advertising Inc., a Los Angeles agency.  ACCOUNT REVIEW: Royal Crown Cola Co. has ended its relationship with the Boston office of Hill, Holliday, Connors, Cosmopulos.  The account had billed about $6 million in 1988, according to Leading National Advertisers.  NOT-GUILTY PLEA: As expected, Young & Rubicam Inc. along with two senior executives and a former employee, pleaded not guilty in federal court in New Haven, Conn., to conspiracy and racketeering charges.  The government has charged that they bribed Jamaican officials to win the Jamaica Tourist Board ad account in 1981.  A spokesman for the U.S. Attorney's office said extradition proceedings are "just beginning" for the other two defendants in the case, Eric Anthony Abrahams, former Jamaican tourism minister, and Jamaican businessman Arnold Foote Jr.  KOREAN AGENCY: The Samsung Group and Bozell Inc. agreed to establish a joint venture advertising agency in South Korea.  Bozell Cheil Corp., as the new agency will be called, will be based in Seoul and is 70% owned by Samsung and 30% owned by Bozell.  Samsung already owns Korea First Advertising Co., that country's largest agency.  Bozell joins Backer Spielvogel Bates and Ogilvy Group as U.S. agencies with interests in Korean agencies.  Citing a payment from a supplier and strong sales of certain data-storage products, Maxtor Corp. said earnings and revenue jumped in its second quarter ended Sept. 24.  The maker of computer-data-storage products said net income rose to $4.8 million, or 23 cents a share, from year-earlier net of $1.1 million, or five cents a share.  Revenue soared to $117 million from $81.5 million.  Maxtor said its results were boosted by $2 million in payments received from a supplier, for a certain line of products that Maxtor isn't going to sell anymore.  Maxtor said effects from discontinuing the line may have a positive effect on future earnings and revenue.  A spokeswoman wouldn't elaborate, but the company said the discontinued product has never been a major source of revenue or profit.  Operationally, Maxtor benefited from robust sales of products that store data for high-end personal computers and computer workstations.  In the fiscal first half, net was $7 million, or 34 cents a share, up from the year-earlier $3.1 million, or 15 cents a share.  Revenue rose to $225.5 million from $161.8 million.  Robert G. Walden, 62 years old, was elected a director of this provider of advanced technology systems and services, increasing the board to eight members.  He retired as senior vice president, finance and administration, and chief financial officer of the company Oct. 1.  Southmark Corp. said that it filed part of its 10-K report with the Securities and Exchange Commission, but that the filing doesn't include its audited financial statements and related information.  The real estate and thrift concern, operating under bankruptcy-law proceedings, said it told the SEC it couldn't provide financial statements by the end of its first extension "without unreasonable burden or expense."  The company asked for a 15-day extension Sept. 30, when the financial reports were due.  Southmark said it plans to amend its 10K to provide financial results as soon as its audit is completed.  Alan Seelenfreund, 52 years old, was named chairman of this processor of prescription claims, succeeding Thomas W. Field Jr., 55, who resigned last month.  Mr. Field also had been chairman of McKesson Corp., resigning that post after a dispute with the board over corporate strategy.  Mr. Seelenfreund is executive vice president and chief financial officer of McKesson and will continue in those roles.  PCS also named Rex R. Malson, 57, executive vice president at McKesson, as a director, filling the seat vacated by Mr. Field.  Messrs.  Malson and Seelenfreund are directors of McKesson, which has an 86% stake in PCS.  MedChem Products Inc. said a U.S. District Court in Boston ruled that a challenge by MedChem to the validity of a U.S. patent held by Pharmacia Inc. was "without merit."  Pharmacia, based in Upsala, Sweden, had charged in a lawsuit against MedChem that MedChem's AMVISC product line infringes on the Pharmacia patent.  The patent is related to hyaluronic acid, a rooster-comb extract used in eye surgery.  In its lawsuit, Pharmacia is seeking unspecified damages and a preliminary injunction to block MedChem from selling the AMVISC products.  A MedChem spokesman said the products contribute about a third of MedChem's sales and 10% to 20% of its earnings.  In the year ended Aug. 31, 1988, MedChem earned $2.9 million, or 72 cents a share, on sales of $17.4 million.  MedChem said the court's ruling was issued as part of a "first-phase trial" in the patent-infringement proceedings and concerns only one of its defenses in the case.  It said it is considering "all of its options in light of the decision, including a possible appeal."  The medical-products company added that it plans to "assert its other defenses" against Pharmacia's lawsuit, including the claim that it hasn't infringed on Pharmacia's patent.  MedChem said that the court scheduled a conference for next Monday -- to set a date for proceedings on Pharmacia's motion for a preliminary injunction.  Newspaper publishers are reporting mixed third-quarter results, aided by favorable newsprint prices and hampered by flat or declining advertising linage, especially in the Northeast.  Adding to unsteadiness in the industry, seasonal retail ad spending patterns in newspapers have been upset by shifts in ownership and general hardships within the retail industry.  In New York, the Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co. department stores have filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code, while the R.H. Macy & Co., Bloomingdale's and Saks Fifth Avenue department-store chains are for sale.  Many papers throughout the country are also faced with a slowdown in classified-ad spending, a booming category for newspapers in recent years.  Until recently, industry analysts believed decreases in retail ad spending had bottomed out and would in fact increase in this year's third and fourth quarters.  All bets are off, analysts say, because of the shifting ownership of the retail chains.  "Improved paper prices will help offset weakness in linage, but the retailers' problems have affected the amount of ad linage they usually run," said Edward J. Atorino, industry analyst for Salomon Brothers Inc. "Retailers are just in disarray."  For instance, Gannett Co. posted an 11% gain in net income, as total ad pages dropped at USA Today, but advertising revenue rose because of a higher circulation rate base and increased rates.  Gannett's 83 daily and 35 non-daily newspapers reported a 3% increase in advertising and circulation revenue.  Total advertising linage was "modestly" lower as classified-ad volume increased, while there was "softer demand" for retail and national ad linage, said John Curley, Gannett's chief executive officer.  At USA Today, ad pages totaled 785 for the quarter, down 9.2% from the 1988 period, which was helped by increased ad spending from the Summer Olympics.  While USA Today's total paid ad pages for the year to date totaled 2,735, a decrease of 4% from last year, the paper's ad revenue increased 8% in the quarter and 13% in the nine months.  In the nine months, Gannett's net rose 9.5% to $270 million, or $1.68 a share, from $247 million, or $1.52 a share.  Revenue gained 6% to $2.55 billion from $2.4 billion.  At Dow Jones & Co., third-quarter net income fell 9.9% from the year-earlier period.  Net fell to $28.8 million, or 29 cents a share, from $32 million, or 33 cents a share.  The year-earlier period included a one-time gain of $3.5 million, or four cents a share.  Revenue gained 5.3% to $404.1 million from $383.8 million.  The drop in profit reflected, in part, continued softness in financial advertising at The Wall Street Journal and Barron's magazine.  Ad linage at the Journal fell 6.1% in the third quarter.  Affiliated Publications Inc. reversed a year-earlier third quarter net loss.  The publisher of the Boston Globe reported net of $8.5 million, or 12 cents a share, compared with a loss of $26.5 million, or 38 cents a share, for the third quarter in 1988.  William O. Taylor, the parent's chairman and chief executive officer, said earnings continued to be hurt by softness in ad volume at the Boston newspaper.  Third-quarter profit estimates for several companies are being strongly affected by the price of newsprint, which in the last two years has had several price increases.  After a supply crunch caused prices to rise 14% since 1986 to $650 a metric ton, analysts are encouraged, because they don't expect a price increase for the rest of this year.  Companies with daily newspapers in the Northeast will need the stable newsprint prices to ease damage from weak ad linage.  Mr. Atorino at Salomon Brothers said he estimates that Times Mirror Co.'s earnings were down for the third quarter, because of soft advertising levels at its Long Island Newsday and Hartford Courant newspapers.  Trouble on the East Coast was likely offset by improved ad linage at the Los Angeles Times, which this week also unveiled a redesign.  New York Times Co. is expected to report lower earnings for the third quarter because of continued weak advertising levels at its flagship New York Times and deep discounting of newsprint at its affiliate, Forest Products Group.  "Times Co.'s regional daily newspapers are holding up well, but there is little sign that things will improve in the New York market," said Alan Kassan, an analyst with Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Washington Post Co. is expected to report improved earnings, largely because of increased cable revenue and publishing revenue helped by an improved retail market in the Washington area.  According to analysts, profits were also helped by successful cost-cutting measures at Newsweek.  The news-weekly has faced heightened competition from rival Time magazine and a relatively flat magazine advertising market.  Knight-Ridder Inc. is faced with continued uncertainty over the pending joint operating agreement between its Detroit Free Press and Gannett's Detroit News, and has told analysts that earnings were down in the third quarter.  However, analysts point to positive advertising spending at several of its major daily newspapers, such as the Miami Herald and San Jose Mercury News.  "The Miami market is coming back strong after a tough couple of years" when Knight-Ridder "was starting up a Hispanic edition and circulation was falling," said Bruce Thorp, an analyst for Provident National Bank.  General Motors Corp., in a series of moves that angered union officials in the U.S. and Canada, has signaled that as many as five North American assembly plants may not survive the mid-1990s as the corporation struggles to cut its excess vehicle-making capacity.  In announcements to workers late last week, GM effectively signed death notices for two full-sized van assembly plants, and cast serious doubt on the futures of three U.S. car factories.  GM is under intense pressure to close factories that became unprofitable as the giant auto maker's U.S. market share skidded during the past decade.  The company, currently using about 80% of its North American vehicle capacity, has vowed it will run at 100% of capacity by 1992.  Just a month ago, GM announced it would make an aging assembly plant in Lakewood, Ga., the eighth U.S. assembly facility to close since 1987.  Now, GM appears to be stepping up the pace of its factory consolidation to get in shape for the 1990s.  One reason is mounting competition from new Japanese car plants in the U.S. that are pouring out more than one million vehicles a year at costs lower than GM can match.  Another is that United Auto Workers union officials have signaled they want tighter no-layoff provisions in the new Big Three national contract that will be negotiated next year.  GM officials want to get their strategy to reduce capacity and the work force in place before those talks begin.  The problem, however, is that GM's moves are coming at a time when UAW leaders are trying to silence dissidents who charge the union is too passive in the face of GM layoffs.  Against that backdrop, UAW Vice President Stephen P. Yokich, who recently became head of the union's GM department, issued a statement Friday blasting GM's "flagrant insensitivity" toward union members.  The auto maker's decision to let word of the latest shutdowns and product reassignments trickle out in separate communiques to the affected plants showed "disarray" and an "inability or unwillingness to provide consistent information," Mr. Yokich said.  GM officials told workers late last week of the following moves:  Production of full-sized vans will be consolidated into a single plant in Flint, Mich.  That means two plants -- one in Scarborough, Ontario, and the other in Lordstown, Ohio -- probably will be shut down after the end of 1991.  The shutdowns will idle about 3,000 Canadian assembly workers and about 2,500 workers in Ohio.  Robert White, Canadian Auto Workers union president, used the impending Scarborough shutdown to criticize the U.S.-Canada free trade agreement and its champion, Prime Minister Brian Mulroney.  But Canadian auto workers may benefit from a separate GM move that affects three U.S. car plants and one in Quebec.  Workers at plants in Van Nuys, Calif., Oklahoma City and Pontiac, Mich., were told their facilities are no longer being considered to build the next generation of the Pontiac Firebird and Chevrolet Camaro muscle cars.  GM is studying whether it can build the new Camaro-Firebird profitably at a plant in St. Therese, Quebec, company and union officials said.  That announcement left union officials in Van Nuys and Oklahoma City uncertain about their futures.  The Van Nuys plant, which employs about 3,000 workers, doesn't have a product to build after 1993.  Jerry Shrieves, UAW local president, said the facility was asked to draw up plans to continue working as a "flex plant," which could build several different types of products on short notice to satisfy demand.  At the Oklahoma City plant, which employs about 6,000 workers building the eight-year-old A-body mid-sized cars, Steve Featherston, UAW local vice president, said the plant has no new product lined up, and "none of us knows" when the A-body cars will die.  He said he believes GM has plans to keep building A-body cars into the mid-1990s.  At Pontiac, however, the Camaro-Firebird decision appears to erase UAW hopes that GM would reopen the shuttered assembly plant that last built the plastic-bodied, two-seater Pontiac Fiero model.  The Fiero plant was viewed as a model of union-management cooperation at GM before slow sales of the Fiero forced the company to close the factory last year.  Union officials have taken a beating politically as a result.  Dissident UAW members have used the Fiero plant as a symbol of labor-management cooperation's failure.  Institut Merieux S.A. of France said the Canadian government raised an obstacle to its proposed acquisition of Connaught BioSciences Inc. for 942 million Canadian dollars (US$801.6 million).  Merieux said the government's minister of industry, science and technology told it that he wasn't convinced that the purchase is likely to be of "net benefit" to Canada.  Canadian investment rules require that big foreign takeovers meet that standard.  The French company said the government gave it 30 days in which to submit information to further support its takeover plan.  Both Merieux and Connaught are biotechnology research and vaccine manufacturing concerns.  The government's action was unusual.  Alan Nymark, executive vice president of Investment Canada, which oversees foreign takeovers, said it marked the first time in its four-year history that the agency has made an adverse net-benefit decision about the acquisition of a publicly traded company.  He said it has reached the same conclusions about some attempts to buy closely held concerns, but eventually allowed those acquisitions to proceed.  "This isn't a change in government policy; this provision has been used before," said Jodi Redmond, press secretary for Harvie Andre, Canada's minister of industry, science and technology.  Mr. Andre issued the ruling based on a recommendation by Investment Canada.  Spokesmen for Merieux and Connaught said they hadn't been informed of specific areas of concern by either the government or Investment Canada, but added they hope to have more information early this week.  Investment Canada declined to comment on the reasons for the government decision.  Viren Mehta, a partner with Mehta & Isaly, a New York-based pharmaceutical industry research firm, said the government's ruling wasn't unexpected.  "This has become a very politicized deal, concerning Canada's only large, world-class bio-research or pharmaceutical company," Mr. Mehta said.  Mr. Mehta said the move that could allow the transaction to go ahead as planned could be an out-of-court settlement of Connaught's dispute with the University of Toronto.  The University is seeking to block the acquisition of Connaught by foreign interests, citing concerns about the amount of research that would be done in Canada.  The university is considering a settlement proposal made by Connaught.  While neither side will disclose its contents, Mr. Mehta expects it to contain more specific guarantees on research and development spending levels in Canada than Merieux offered to Investment Canada.  Some analysts, such as Murray Grossner of Toronto-based Richardson Greenshields Inc., believe the government ruling leaves the door open for other bidders, such as Switzerland's Ciba-Geigy and Chiron Corp. of Emeryville, Calif.  Officials for the two concerns, which are bidding C$30 a share for Connaught, couldn't be reached for comment.  French state-owned Rhone-Poulenc S.A. holds 51% of Merieux.  Weatherford International Inc. said it canceled plans for a preferred-stock swap but may resume payment of dividends on the stock, and added that it expects to publicly offer about 10 million common shares.  The company said it planned to offer an undetermined number of common shares in exchange for the 585,000 shares of its preferred stock outstanding.  The exchange ratio was never established.  Weatherford said market conditions led to the cancellation of the planned exchange.  The energy-services concern said, however, that in January 1990, it may resume payments of dividends on the preferred stock.  Weatherford suspended its preferred-dividend payment in October 1985 and said it hasn't any plans to catch up on dividends in arrears about $6 million, but will do so some time in the future.  Additionally, the company said it filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for the proposed offering of 10 million shares of common stock, expected to be offered in November.  The company said Salomon Brothers Inc. and Howard, Weil, Labouisse, Friedrichs Inc., underwriters for the offering, were granted an option to buy as much as an additional 1.5 million shares to cover over-allotments.  Proceeds will be used to eliminate and restructure bank debt.  Weatherford currently has approximately 11.1 million common shares outstanding.  Earnings for most of the nation's major pharmaceutical makers are believed to have moved ahead briskly in the third quarter, as companies with newer, big-selling prescription drugs fared especially well.  For the third consecutive quarter, however, most of the companies' revenues were battered by adverse foreign-currency translations as a result of the strong dollar abroad.  Analysts said that Merck & Co., Eli Lilly & Co., Warner-Lambert Co. and the Squibb Corp. unit of Bristol-Myers Squibb Co. all benefited from strong sales of relatively new, higher-priced medicines that provide wide profit margins.  Less robust earnings at Pfizer Inc. and Upjohn Co. were attributed to those companies' older products, many of which face stiffening competition from generic drugs and other medicines.  Joseph Riccardo, an analyst with Bear, Stearns & Co., said that over the past few years most drug makers have shed their slow-growing businesses and instituted other cost savings, such as consolidating manufacturing plants and administrative staffs.  As a result, "major new products are having significant impact, even on a company with very large revenues," Mr. Riccardo said.  Analysts said profit for the dozen or so big drug makers, as a group, is estimated to have climbed between 11% and 14%.  While that's not spectacular, Neil Sweig, an analyst with Prudential Bache, said that the rate of growth will "look especially good as compared to other companies if the economy turns downward."  Mr. Sweig estimated that Merck's profit for the quarter rose by about 22%, propelled by sales of its line-up of fast-growing prescription drugs, including its anti-cholesterol drug, Mevacor; a high blood pressure medicine, Vasotec; Primaxin, an antibiotic, and Pepcid, an anti-ulcer medication.  Profit climbed even though Merck's sales were reduced by "one to three percentage points" as a result of the strong dollar, Mr. Sweig said.  In the third quarter of 1988, Merck earned $311.8 million, or 79 cents a share.  In Rahway, N.J., a Merck spokesman said the company doesn't make earnings projections.  Mr. Sweig said he estimated that Lilly's earnings for the quarter jumped about 20%, largely because of the performance of its new anti-depressant Prozac.  The drug, introduced last year, is expected to generate sales of about $300 million this year.  "It's turning out to be a real blockbuster," Mr. Sweig said.  In last year's third quarter, Lilly earned $171.4 million, or $1.20 a share.  In Indianapolis, Lilly declined comment.  Several analysts said they expected Warner-Lambert's profit also to increase by more than 20% from $87.7 million, or $1.25 a share, it reported in the like period last year.  The company is praised by analysts for sharply lowering its costs in recent years and shedding numerous companies with low profit margins.  The company's lean operation, analysts said, allowed sharp-rising sales from its cholesterol drug, Lopid, to power earnings growth.  Lopid sales are expected to be about $300 million this year, up from $190 million in 1988.  In Morris Plains, N.J., a spokesman for the company said the analysts' projections are "in the ballpark."  Squibb's profit, estimated by analysts to be about 18% above the $123 million, or $1.25 a share, it earned in the third quarter of 1988, was the result of especially strong sales of its Capoten drug for treating high blood pressure and other heart disease.  The company was officially merged with Bristol-Myers Co. earlier this month.  Bristol-Myers declined to comment.  Mr. Riccardo of Bear Stearns said that Schering-Plough Corp.'s expected profit rise of about 18% to 20%, and Bristol-Meyers's expected profit increase of about 13% are largely because "those companies are really managed well."  ScheringPlough earned $94.4 million, or 84 cents a share, while Bristol-Myers earned $232.3 million, or 81 cents a share, in the like period a year earlier.  In Madison, N.J., a spokesman for Schering-Plough said the company has "no problems" with the average estimate by a analysts that third-quarter earnings per share rose by about 19%, to $1.  The company expects to achieve the 20% increase in full-year earnings per share, as it projected in the spring, the spokesman said.  Meanwhile, analysts said Pfizer's recent string of lackluster quarterly performances continued, as earnings in the quarter were expected to decline by about 5%.  Sales of Pfizer's important drugs, Feldene for treating arthritis, and Procardia, a heart medicine, have shrunk because of increased competition.  "The (strong) dollar hurt Pfizer a lot, too," Mr. Sweig said.  In the third quarter last year, Pfizer earned $216.8 million, or $1.29 a share.  In New York, the company declined comment.  Analysts said they expected Upjohn's profit to be flat or rise by only about 2% to 4% as compared with $89.6 million, or 49 cents a share, it earned a year ago.  Upjohn's biggest-selling drugs are Xanax, a tranquilizer, and Halcion, a sedative.  Sales of both drugs have been hurt by new state laws restricting the prescriptions of certain tranquilizing medicines and adverse publicity about the excessive use of the drugs.  Also, the company's hair-growing drug, Rogaine, is selling well -- at about $125 million for the year, but the company's profit from the drug has been reduced by Upjohn's expensive print and television campaigns for advertising, analysts said.  In Kalamazoo, Mich., Upjohn declined comment.  Amid a crowd of crashing stocks, Relational Technology Inc.'s stock fell particularly hard Friday, dropping 23% because its problems were compounded by disclosure of an unexpected loss for its fiscal first quarter.  The database software company said it expects a $2 million net loss for the fiscal first quarter ended Sept. 30.  It said analysts had been expecting a small profit for the period.  Revenue is expected to be "up modestly" from the $26.5 million reported a year ago.  Relational Technology reported net income of $1.5 million, or 12 cents a share, in the year-earlier period.  "While our international operations showed strong growth, our domestic business was substantially below expectations," said Paul Newton, president and chief executive officer.  A spokesman said the company's first quarter is historically soft, and computer companies in general are experiencing slower sales.  Mr. Newton said he accepted the resignation of Thomas Wilson, vice president of corporate sales, and that his marketing responsibilities have been reassigned.  The company said Mr. Wilson's resignation wasn't related to the sales shortfall.  Relational Technology went public in May 1988 at $14 a share.  It fell $1.875 a share Friday, to $6.25, a new low, in over-the-counter trading.  Its high for the past year was $16.375 a share.  In the previous quarter, the company earned $4.5 million, or 37 cents a share, on sales of $47.2 million.  The Bronx has a wonderful botanical garden, a great zoo, its own charming Little Italy (on Arthur Avenue) and, of course, the Yankees.  However, most people, having been subjected to news footage of the devastated South Bronx, look at the borough the way Tom Wolfe's Sherman McCoy did in "Bonfire of the Vanities" -- as a wrong turn into hell.  But Laura Cunningham's Bronx, her childhood Bronx of the '50s, is something else altogether.  In a lovely, novelistic memoir, "Sleeping Arrangements" (Knopf, 195 pages, $18.95), she remembers an exotic playground, peopled mainly by Jewish eccentrics and the occasional Catholic (real oddballs like her sexpot friend, the hell-kitten Diana, age five).  Ms. Cunningham, a novelist and playwright, has a vivid and dramatically outsized sense of recall.  She transforms her "Bronx of the emotions, a place where the flats of mediocrity are only relieved by steep descents into hysteria" into the "Babylonian Bronx," a world simmering with sex and death and intrigue.  In the Babylonian Bronx, Jewish working-class people lived in drab, Soviet-style buildings "glamorized" with names like AnaMor Towers (after owners Anna and Morris Snezak), whose lobbies and hallways were decorated with murals of ancient Syrians and Greeks, friezes of Pompeii.  For Ms. Cunningham the architectural discombobulation matched the discrepancy she felt living in the AnaMor Towers as a little girl: ". . . outwardly ordinary, inwardly ornate, owing all inspiration to heathen cultures."  Sharp-witted and funny but never mean, she's a memorialist a bit like Truman Capote, if he'd been Jewish and female and less bitchy.  Little Lily, as Ms. Cunningham calls herself in the book, really wasn't ordinary.  She was raised, for the first eight years, by her mother, Rosie, whom she remembers as a loving liar, who realigned history to explain why Lily's father didn't live with them.  Rosie reinvented this man, who may or may not have known about his child, as a war hero for Lily's benefit.  Rosie died young and Lily has remembered her as a romantic figure, who didn't interfere much with her child's education on the streets.  The games Bronx children played (holding kids down and stripping them, for example) seem tame by today's crack standards, but Ms. Cunningham makes it all sound like a great adventure.  "Without official knowledge of sex or death, we flirted with both," she writes.  She analyzed families by their sleeping arrangements.  Her friend Susan, whose parents kept reminding her she was unwanted, slept on a narrow bed wedged into her parents' bedroom, as though she were a temporary visitor.  Her friend Diana's father was a professional thief; they didn't seem to have any bedrooms at all.  Maybe Lily became so obsessed with where people slept and how because her own arrangements kept shifting.  When Rosie died, her uncles moved in -- and let her make the sleeping and other household arrangements.  They painted the apartment orange, pink and white, according to her instructions.  With loving detail she recalls her Uncle Gabe, an Orthodox Jew and song lyricist (who rhymed river with liver in a love song); and Uncle Len, a mysterious part-time investigator who looked like Lincoln and carried a change of clothing in a Manila envelope, like an "undercover President on a good-will mission."  They came by their strangeness honestly.  Lily's grandmother, no cookie baker, excised the heads of disliked relatives from the family album, and lugged around her perennial work-in-progress, "Philosophy for Women."  The book loses some momentum toward the end, when Lily becomes more preoccupied with dating boys and less with her delightfully weird family.  For the most part, though, there's much pleasure in her saucy, poignant probe into the mysteries of the Babylonian Bronx.  The Bronx also figures in Bruce Jay Friedman's latest novel, which flashes back to the New York of the '50s.  But both the past and present worlds of "The Current Climate" (Atlantic Monthly Press, 200 pages, $18.95) feel cramped and static.  For his sixth novel, Mr. Friedman tried to resuscitate the protagonist of his 1972 work, "About Harry Towns."  Harry is now a 57-year-old writer, whose continuing flirtation with drugs and marginal types in Hollywood and New York seems quaintly out-of-synch.  Harry fondly remembers the "old" days of the early '70s, when people like his friend Travis would take a psychiatrist on a date to analyze what Travis was doing wrong.  "An L.A. solution," explains Mr. Friedman.  Line by line Mr. Friedman's weary cynicism can be amusing, especially when he's riffing on the Hollywood social scheme -- the way people size each other up, immediately canceling the desperate ones who merely almost made it.  Harry has avoided all that by living in a Long Island suburb with his wife, who's so addicted to soap operas and mystery novels she barely seems to notice when her husband disappears for drug-seeking forays into Manhattan.  But it doesn't take too many lines to figure Harry out.  He's a bore.  Gulf Resources & Chemical Corp. said it agreed to pay $1.5 million as part of an accord with the Environmental Protection Agency regarding an environmental cleanup of a defunct smelter the company formerly operated in Idaho.  In 1984 the EPA notified Gulf Resources, which was a part-owner of the smelter, that it was potentially liable for sharing cleanup costs at the site under the federal Superfund program.  The 21-square-mile area is contaminated with lead, zinc and other metals.  Gulf Resources earlier this year proposed a reorganization plan that would make it a unit of a Bermuda concern, potentially exempting it from liability for the smelter's cleanup costs.  The company said that as part of its agreement with the EPA, it "made certain voluntary undertakings with respect to intercorporate transactions entered into after the reorganization."  The company, which issued a statement on the agreement late Friday, said that $1 million of the payment was previously provided for in its financial statements and that $500,000 will be recognized in its 1989 third-quarter statement.  The agreement and consent decree are subject to court approval, the company said.  Gulf Resources added that it "will seek to recover equitable contribution from others for both the amount of the settlement and any other liabilities it may incur under the Superfund law."  Under the agreement, Gulf must give the U.S. government 45 days' advance written notice before issuing any dividends on common stock.  The company's net worth cannot fall below $185 million after the dividends are issued.  "The terms of that agreement only become effective the date of Gulf's reorganization, which we anticipate will occur sometime in early 1990," said Lawrence R. Mehl, Gulf's general counsel.  In addition, Gulf must give the government 20 days' advance written notice of any loans exceeding $50 million that are made to the Bermuda-based holding company.  Gulf's net worth after those transaction must be at least $150 million.  Separately, the company said it expects to hold a special meeting for shareholders in early 1990 to vote on its proposed reorganization.  Many of the nation's highest-ranking executives saluted Friday's market plunge as an overdue comeuppance for speculators and takeover players.  Assuming that the market doesn't head into a bottomless free fall, some executives think Friday's action could prove a harbinger of good news -- as a sign that the leveraged buy-out and takeover frenzy of recent years may be abating.  "This is a reaction to artificial LBO valuations, rather than to any fundamentals," said John Young, chairman of Hewlett-Packard Co., whose shares dropped $3.125 to $48.125.  "If we get rid of a lot of that nonsense, it will be a big plus."  A few of the executives here for the fall meeting of the Business Council, a group that meets to discuss national issues, were only too happy to personalize their criticism.  "People wish the government would do something about leveraged buy-outs, do something about takeovers, do something about Donald Trump," said Rand Araskog, chairman of ITT Corp., whose stock dropped $3.375.  "Where's the leadership?  Where's the guy who can say: `Enough is enough'"?  The executives were remarkably unperturbed by the plunge even though it lopped billions of dollars off the value of their companies -- and millions off their personal fortunes.  "I'm not going to worry about one day's decline," said Kenneth Olsen, Digital Equipment Corp. president, who was leisurely strolling through the bright orange and yellow leaves of the mountains here after his company's shares plunged $5.75 to close at $86.50.  "I didn't bother calling anybody; I didn't even turn on TV."  "There hasn't been any fundamental change in the economy," added John Smale, whose Procter & Gamble Co. took an $8.75 slide to close at $120.75.  "The fact that this happened two years ago and there was a recovery gives people some comfort that this won't be a problem."  Of course, established corporate managements often tend to applaud the setbacks of stock speculators and takeover artists.  Indeed, one chief executive who was downright delighted by Friday's events was Robert Crandall, chairman of AMR Corp., the parent of American Airlines and the target of a takeover offer by Mr. Trump.  Asked whether Friday's action could help him avoid being Trumped by the New York real estate magnate, Mr. Crandall smiled broadly and said: "No comment."  On Friday morning, before the market's sell-off, the business leaders issued a report predicting the economy would grow at roughly an inflation-adjusted 2% annual rate, through next year, then accelerate anew in 1991.  Of the 19 economists who worked on the Business Council forecast, only two projected periods of decline in the nation's output over the next two years, and in "both instances the declines are too modest to warrant the phrase recession," said Lewis Preston, chairman of J.P. Morgan & Co. and vice chairman of the Business Council.  The real estate slump that's pushing down the price of New York office space and housing is also affecting the city's retail real estate market.  In Manhattan, once-desirable store sites sit vacant and newly constructed space has been slow to fill.  Retail real estate brokers say tenants are reluctant to sign leases because of uncertainty about the local economy, turmoil in their own industries and a belief that rents have not yet hit bottom.  "There is an unbelievable amount of space available," says Faith Consolo, senior vice president at Garrick-Aug Associates Store Leasing Inc.  There are about 2,000 stores for rent, up from a more typical range of 1,200 to 1,500.  "This further confuses retailers," she says.  "They wonder should they sign a lease if prices are still coming down?  Is this the wrong time to open a store?  Who is going to be in the space next door?"  In addition, Ms. Consolo says, tenants usually can negotiate to pay rents that are about one-quarter lower than landlords' initial asking price.  A handful of hot retail locations, such as the 57th Street and Madison and Fifth Avenue areas, have been able to sustain what many see as astronomical rents.  And, in some neighborhoods, rents have merely hit a plateau.  But on average, Manhattan retail rents have dropped 10% to 15% in the past six months alone, experts say.  That follows a more subtle decline in the prior six months, after Manhattan rents had run up rapidly since 1986.  The same factors limiting demand for office space have affected retailing.  "As businesses contract or depart, the number of employees who might use retail services shrinks," says Edward A. Friedman, senior vice president of Helmsley Spear Inc.  He says financial problems plaguing electronics, fur and furniture companies -- key categories in the local retail economy -- have further deflated the market.  Hardest hit are what he calls "secondary" sites that primarily serve neighborhood residents.  In these locations, Mr. Friedman says, "Retailers are increasingly cautious about expanding and rents have remained steady or in some cases have declined."  Weakness in the restaurant industry, which is leaving retail space vacant, exacerbates the problem for landlords.  It is also no comfort to landlords and small New York retailers when the future of larger department stores, which anchor retail neighborhoods, are in doubt.  Hooker Corp., parent of Bonwit Teller and B. Altman's, is mired in bankruptcy proceedings and Bloomingdale's is for sale by its owner, Campeau Corp.  The trend toward lower rents may seem surprising given that some communities in New York are bemoaning the loss of favorite local businesses to high rents.  But, despite the recent softening, for many of these retailers there's still been too big a jump from the rental rates of the late 1970s, when their leases were signed.  Certainly, the recent drop in prices doesn't mean Manhattan comes cheap.  New York retail rents still run well above the going rate in other U.S. cities.  Madison and Fifth Avenues and East 57th Street can command rents of up to $500 a square foot, and $250 is not uncommon.  The thriving 34th Street area offers rents of about $100 a square foot, as do up-and-coming locations along lower Fifth Avenue.  By contrast, rentals in the best retail locations in Boston, San Francisco and Chicago rarely top $100 a square foot.  And rents on Beverly Hills' Rodeo Drive generally don't exceed about $125 a square foot.  The New York Stock Exchange said two securities will begin trading this week.  Precision Castparts Corp., Portland, Ore., will begin trading with the symbol PCP.  It makes investment castings and has traded over-the-counter.  Royal Bank of Scotland Group PLC, an Edinburgh, Scotland, financial services company, will list American depositary shares, representing preferred shares, with the symbol RBSPr.  It will continue to trade on the International Stock Exchange, London.  The American Stock Exchange listed shares of two companies.  AIM Telephones Inc., a Parsippany, N.J., telecommunications equipment supply company, started trading with the symbol AIM.  It had traded over-the-counter.  Columbia Laboratories Inc., Miami, began trading with the symbol COB.  The pharmaceuticals maker had traded over-the-counter.  The National Market System of the Nasdaq over-the-counter market listed shares of one company.  Employee Benefit Plans Inc., a Minneapolis health-care services company, was listed with the symbol EBPI.  When Justice William Brennan marks the start of his 34th year on the Supreme Court today, the occasion will differ sharply from previous anniversaries of his tenure.  For the first time, the 83-year-old justice finds his influence almost exclusively in dissent, rather than as a force in the high court's majority.  This role reversal holds true, as well, for his three liberal and moderate allies, Justices Thurgood Marshall, Harry Blackmun and John Stevens.  But are these four players, three of them in their 80s, ready to assume a different role after 88 years, collectively, of service on the high court?  Every indication is that the four are prepared to accept this new role, and the frustrations that go with it, but in different ways.  Justices Brennan and Stevens appear philosophical about it; Justices Marshall and Blackmun appear fighting mad.  The four justices are no newcomers to dissent, often joining forces in the past decade to criticize the court's conservative drift.  But always, in years past, they have bucked the trend and have been able to pick up a fifth vote to eke out a number of major victories in civil rights and liberties cases.  Now, however, as the court's new five-member conservative majority continues to solidify, victories for the liberals are rare.  The change is most dramatic for Justice Brennan, the last survivor of the mid-1960s liberal majority under Chief Justice Earl Warren.  In the seven Supreme Court terms from the fall of 1962 through the spring of 1967, the height of the Warren Court's power, Justice Brennan cast only 25 dissenting votes in 555 cases decided by the court.  Last term alone he cast 52 dissenting votes in 133 decisions, with the contentious flag-burning ruling as his only big victory.  But Justice Brennan foresaw his new role, strongly defending the importance of dissents in a 1985 speech.  "Each time the court revisits an issue, the justices will be forced by a dissent to reconsider the fundamental questions and to rethink the result," he said.  Moreover, in recent months he has said that when he was on the winning side in the 1960s, he knew that the tables might turn in the future.  He has said that he now knows how Justice John Harlan felt, a reference to the late conservative justice who was the most frequent dissenter from the Warren Court's opinions.  Associates of 81-year-old Justice Marshall say he was "depressed" about the court's direction last spring, but is feisty about his role and determined to speak out against the court's cutbacks in civil rights.  "We could sweep it under the rug and hide it, but I'm not going to do it," he said in a speech last month.  He, like Justice Brennan, considers dissents highly important for the future, a point that hasn't escaped legal scholars.  Harvard Law School Professor Laurence Tribe says there is a "generation-skipping" flavor to current dissents.  The dissenters in the Warren Court, he says, appeared to be writing for the short-term, suggesting that the court's direction might change soon.  "Brennan and Marshall are speaking in their dissents to a more distant future," he says.  Justice Blackmun, who will turn 81 next month, also seems feisty about his new role.  Associates say he takes some defeats more personally than his colleagues, especially attempts to curtail the right to abortion first recognized in his 1973 opinion, Roe vs.  Wade.  Friends and associates who saw Justice Blackmun during the summer said he was no more discouraged about the court than in recent years.  And his outlook improved after successful cataract surgery in August.  But his level of frustration showed in a recent, impassioned speech to a group of hundreds of lawyers in Chicago.  He concluded his remarks by quoting, emotionally and at some length, according to those present, the late Martin Luther King's famous "I Have a Dream" speech from the 1963 March on Washington.  Justice Stevens, 69, is probably the most philosophical of the dissenters about his role, in part because he may be the least liberal of the four, but also because he enjoys the intellectual challenge of arguing with the majority more than the others.  If the role these four dissenters are assuming is a familiar one in modern Supreme Court history, it also differs in an important way from recent history, court watchers say.  "The dissenters of the Warren Court were often defending a legal legacy that they inherited," says Prof.  A.E. Dick Howard of the University of Virginia Law School, "but the dissenters today are defending a legacy that they created."  The government sold the deposits of four savings-and-loan institutions, in its first wave of sales of big, sick thrifts, but low bids prevented the sale of a fifth.  The four S&Ls were sold to large banks, as was the case with most of the 28 previous transactions initiated by the Resolution Trust Corp. since it was created in the S&L bailout legislation two months ago.  Two of the four big thrifts were sold to NCNB Corp., Charlotte, N.C., which has aggressively expanded its markets, particularly in Texas and Florida.  A Canadian bank bought another thrift, in the first RTC transaction with a foreign bank.  Under these deals, the RTC sells just the deposits and the healthy assets.  These "clean-bank" transactions leave the bulk of bad assets, mostly real estate, with the government, to be sold later.  In these four, for instance, the RTC is stuck with $4.51 billion in bad assets.  Acquirers paid premiums ranging from 1.5% to 3.7% for the deposits and branch systems, roughly in line with what analysts were expecting.  The buyers will also be locked into deposit rates for just two weeks, as has been the case with previous deals.  After that, the buyers may repudiate the rates paid by the former thrifts.  But it's uncertain whether these institutions will take those steps.  NCNB, for example, has been one of the highest rate payers in the Texas market, and in Florida, rates are especially sensitive in retirement communities.  The RTC had previously targeted five thrifts for quick sales in order to spend cash by certain budgetary deadlines, but the delays illustrate the tough chore facing the agency.  "These thrifts are beached whales," said Bert Ely, an industry consultant based in Alexandria, Va.  For example, the delay in selling People's Heritage Savings, Salina, Kan., with $1.7 billion in assets, has forced the RTC to consider selling off the thrift branch-by-branch, instead of as a whole institution.  NCNB continued its foray into the Florida and Texas markets.  NCNB will acquire University Federal Savings Association, Houston, which had assets of $2.8 billion.  NCNB Texas National Bank will pay the RTC a premium of $129 million for $3.5 billion in deposits.  As a measure of the depths to which the Texas real estate market has sunk, the RTC will pay $3.8 billion to NCNB to take $750 million of bad assets.  NCNB also acquired Freedom Savings & Loan Association, Tampa, Fla., which had total assets of $900 million.  NCNB will pay the RTC a premium of $40.4 million for $1.1 billion in deposits.  NCNB will also acquire $266 million of Freedom's assets from the RTC, which will require $875 million in assistance.  Meridian Bancorp Inc., Reading, Pa., will acquire Hill Financial Savings Association, Red Hill, Pa., which had $2.3 billion in assets.  Meridian will pay a premium of $30.5 million to assume $2 billion in deposits.  It will also purchase $845 million of the thrift's assets, with $1.9 billion in RTC assistance.  In the first RTC transaction with a foreign buyer, Royal Trustco Ltd., Toronto, will acquire Pacific Savings Bank, Costa Mesa, Calif., which had $949 million in assets.  Royal Trustco will pay the RTC $25 million to assume $989 million in deposits.  It will also purchase $473 million in assets, and receive $550 million in assistance from the RTC.  The following issues were recently filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission:  American Cyanamid Co., offering of 1,250,000 common shares, via Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Limited Inc., offering of up to $300 million of debt securities and warrants.  Nuveen California Performance Plus Municipal Fund Inc., initial offering of five million common shares, via Alex.  Brown & Sons Inc., John Nuveen & Co., Prudential-Bache Capital Funding, and Bateman Eichler, Hill Richards.  PacifiCare Health Systems Inc., proposed offering of 1.5 million common shares, of which 700,000 shares will be offered by PacifiCare and 800,000 shares by UniHealth America Inc.(PacifiCare's 71%), via Dillon, Read & Co. Inc., Goldman, Sachs & Co. and Dean Witter Reynolds Inc.  Pricor Inc., offering of one million new shares of common stock and 300,000 shares by holders, via Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. and J.C. Bradford & Co.  Trans World Airlines Inc., offering of $150 million senior notes, via Drexel Burnham.  Time magazine, in a move to reduce the costs of wooing new subscribers, is lowering its circulation guarantee to advertisers for the second consecutive year, increasing its subscription rates and cutting back on merchandise giveaways.  In an announcement to its staff last week, executives at Time Warner Inc.'s weekly magazine said Time will "dramatically de-emphasize" its use of electronic giveaways such as telephones in television subscription drives; cut the circulation it guarantees advertisers by 300,000, to four million; and increase the cost of its annual subscription rate by about $4 to $55.  In a related development, the news-weekly, for the fourth year in a row, said it won't increase its advertising rates in 1990; a full, four-color page in the magazine costs about $120,000.  However, because the guaranteed circulation base is being lowered, ad rates will be effectively 7.5% higher per subscriber, according to Richard Heinemann, Time associate publisher.  Time is following the course of some other mass-circulation magazines that in recent years have challenged the publishing myth that maintaining artificially high, and expensive, circulations is the way to draw advertisers.  In recent years, Reader's Digest, New York Times Co.'s McCall's, and most recently News Corp.'s TV Guide, have cut their massive circulation rate bases to eliminate marginal circulation and hold down rates for advertisers.  Deep discounts in subscriptions and offers of free clock radios and watches have become accepted forms of attracting new subscribers in the hyper-competitive world of magazine news-weeklies.  But Time, as part of the more cost-conscious Time Warner, wants to wean itself away from expensive gimmicks.  Besides, Time executives think selling a news magazine with a clock radio is tacky.  "Giveaways just give people the wrong image," said Mr. Heinemann.  "That perception takes the focus off the magazine."  Time magazine executives predictably paint the circulation cut as a show of strength and actually a benefit to advertisers.  "What we are doing is screening out the readers who are only casually related to the magazine and don't really read it," said Mr. Heinemann.  "We are trying to create quality and involvement."  However, Time executives used the same explanation when in October 1988 the magazine cut its guaranteed circulation from 4.6 million to 4.3 million.  And Time's paid circulation, according to Audit Bureau of Circulations, dropped 7.3% to 4,393,237 in the six months ended June 30, 1989.  Still, Time's move is being received well, once again.  "It's terrific for advertisers to know the reader will be paying more," said Michael Drexler, national media director at Bozell Inc. ad agency.  "A few drops in circulation are of no consequence.  It's not a show of weakness; they are improving the quality of circulation while insuring their profits."  Mr. Heinemann said the changes represent a new focus in the magazine industry: a magazine's net revenue per subscriber, or the actual revenue from subscribers after discounts and the cost of premiums have been stripped away.  "The question is how much are we getting from each reader," said Mr. Heinemann.  Time's rivals news-weeklies, Washington Post Co.'s Newsweek and U.S. News & World Report, are less reliant on electronic giveaways, and in recent years both have been increasing their circulation rate bases.  Both magazines are expected to announce their ad rates and circulation levels for 1990 within a month.  When the news broke of an attempted coup in Panama two weeks ago, Sen. Christopher Dodd called the State Department for a briefing.  "They said, `follow CNN,'" he told reporters.  That shows how far Ted Turner's Cable News Network has come since its birth nine years ago, when it was considered the laughingstock of television news.  It is bigger, faster and more profitable than the news divisions of any of the three major broadcast networks.  Its niche as the "network of record" during major crises draws elite audiences around the world.  But for all its success, CNN has hit a plateau.  Although viewership soars when big news breaks, it ebbs during periods of calm.  CNN executives worry that the network's punchy but repetitive news format may be getting stale and won't keep viewers coming back as the alternatives multiply for news and information on cable-TV.  "Just the fact we're on 24 hours is no longer bulletin," says Ed Turner, CNN's executive vice president, news gathering (and no relation to Ted Turner).  "You can't live on that."  So CNN, a unit of Atlanta-based Turner Broadcasting System Inc., is trying to reposition itself as a primary channel, or what people in the television industry call a "top of mind" network.  Tonight, to kick off the effort, CNN will premiere its first prime-time newscast in years, an hourlong show at 6 p.m. Eastern time to air head-to-head against the network newscasts.  The show will be co-anchored by Bernard Shaw and Catherine Crier, a 34-year-old former Texas judge and campus beauty queen who has never held a job in television or journalism.  The new show is perhaps the boldest in a number of steps the network is taking to build audience loyalty by shifting away from its current format toward more full-length "signature" programming with recognizable stars.  To distinguish itself, CNN is also expanding international coverage and adding a second global-news program.  It is paying higher salaries -- after years of scrimping -- to lure and keep experienced staffers.  And it is embarking on an expensive gamble to break major stories with a large investigative-reporting team.  "The next stage is to get beyond the opinion leaders who use us as a point of reference to become a point of reference at ordinary dinner tables," says Jon Petrovich, executive vice president of Headline News, CNN's sister network.  But that won't be easy.  Networks, like other consumer products, develop images in peoples' minds that aren't easy to change.  It also takes money that CNN has been reluctant to spend to make programs and hire talent that viewers will tune in specially to see.  And the cable-TV operators -- CNN's distributors and part owners -- like things just the way they are.  The repositioning bid is aimed at CNN's unsteady viewership -- and what may happen to it as the cable-TV news market grows more competitive.  Already, CNN is facing stronger competition from Financial News Network Inc. and General Electric Co.'s Consumer News and Business Channel, both of which are likely to pursue more general news in the future.  In addition, many cable-TV systems themselves are airing more local and regional news programs produced by local broadcast stations.  CNN wants to change its viewers' habits.  Its watchers are, on the whole, a disloyal group of channel-zapping "grazers" and news junkies, who spend an average of just 26 minutes a day watching CNN, according to audience research.  That's less than one-third the time that viewers watch the major broadcast networks.  The brief attention viewers give CNN could put it at a disadvantage as ratings data, and advertising, become more important to cable-TV channels.  CNN's viewer habits have been molded by its format.  Its strategy in the past has been to serve as a TV wire service.  It focused on building up its news bureaus around the world, so as events took place it could go live quicker and longer than other networks.  It filled its daily schedule with newscasts called "Daybreak," "Daywatch," "Newsday," and "Newsnight," but the shows varied little in content, personality or look.  Now, the push is on for more-distinctive shows.  "Our goal is to create more programs with an individual identity," says Paul Amos, CNN executive vice president for programming.  Accordingly, CNN is adding a world-affairs show in the morning because surveys show its global-news hour in the afternoon is among its most "differentiated" programs in viewers' minds, says Mr. Amos.  And it is exploring other original programs, similar to its "Larry King Live" and "Crossfire" talk shows, which executives hope will keep people tuned in.  Then there's "The World Today," the prime-time newscast featuring Mr. Shaw and Ms. Crier.  Until now, CNN has featured its Hollywood gossip show during the key evening period.  But 70% of the cable-television-equipped households that watch news do so between 6:30 p.m. and 7 p.m., the network discovered, so CNN wants in.  Mr. Amos says the Shaw-Crier team will probably do two live interviews a day, with most of the program, at least for now, appearing similar to CNN's other newcasts.  Some in the industry are skeptical.  "I find it hard to conceive of people switching over to CNN for what, at least in the public's mind, is the same news," says Reuven Frank, the former two-time president of NBC News and creator of the Huntley-Brinkley Report.  The evening news is also slated as CNN's stage for its big push into investigative journalism.  In August, the network hired award-winning producer Pamela Hill, the former head of news specials at ABC.  She's assembling a staff of about 35 investigative reporters who will produce weekly, in-depth segments, with an eye toward breaking big stories.  CNN executives hope the headlines created by such scoops will generate excitement for its "branded" programs, in the way "60 Minutes" did so well for CBS.  That's such a departure from the past that many in the industry are skeptical CNN will follow through with its investigative commitment, especially after it sees the cost of producing in-depth pieces.  "They've never shown any inclination to spend money on production," says Michael Mosettig, a senior producer with MacNeil-Lehrer NewsHour, who notes that CNN is indispensable to his job.  The network's salaries have always ranged far below industry standards, resulting in a less-experienced work force.  CNN recently gave most employees raises of as much as 15%, but they're still drastically underpaid compared with the networks.  Says Mr. Mosettig: "CNN is my wire service; they're on top of everything.  But to improve, they've really got to make the investment in people."  In any case, cable-TV-system operators have reason to fear any tinkering with CNN's format.  They market cable-TV on the very grazing opportunities CNN seeks to discourage.  "We would obviously be upset if those kinds of services evolved into more general-interest, long-format programming," says Robert Stengel, senior vice president, programming, of Continental Cablevision Inc., which holds a 2% stake in Turner Broadcasting.  ---  @ CNN's Top Five Ratings Days  @ June 30, 1985  @ (TWA Hijacking in Beirut) 2.5  @ April 15, 1986  @ (U.S.  Bombing of Libya) 2.4  @ Dec. 27, 1985  @ (Hurricane Gloria) 1.9  @ Jan. 28, 1986  @ (Shuttle Challenger Explosion) 1.8  @ Jan. 29, 1985  @ (TWA Hijacking in Beirut) 1.7  @ Overall One Day Average .7  @ Note: A rating of one means 1% of CNN's approximately 52 million households were tuned to CNN during an average viewing minute 